
--**--**--
     You need it not.
   POSTHUMUS. Proceed.
   IACHIMO. First, her bedchamber,
     Where I confess I slept not, but profess
     Had that was well worth watching-it was hang'd
     With tapestry of silk and silver; the story,
     Proud Cleopatra when she met her Roman
     And Cydnus swell'd above the banks, or for
     The press of boats or pride. A piece of work
     So bravely done, so rich, that it did strive
     In workmanship and value; which I wonder'd
     Could be so rarely and exactly wrought,
     Since the true life on't was-
   POSTHUMUS. This is true;
     And this you might have heard of here, by me
     Or by some other.
   IACHIMO. More particulars
     Must justify my knowledge.
   POSTHUMUS. So they must,
     Or do your honour injury.
   IACHIMO. The chimney
     Is south the chamber, and the chimneypiece
     Chaste Dian bathing. Never saw I figures
     So likely to report themselves. The cutter
     Was as another nature, dumb; outwent her,
     Motion and breath left out.
   POSTHUMUS. This is a thing
     Which you might from relation likewise reap,
     Being, as it is, much spoke of.
   IACHIMO. The roof o' th' chamber
     With golden cherubins is fretted; her andirons-
     I had forgot them- were two winking Cupids
     Of silver, each on one foot standing, nicely
     Depending on their brands.
   POSTHUMUS. This is her honour!
     Let it be granted you have seen all this, and praise
     Be given to your remembrance; the description
     Of what is in her chamber nothing saves
     The wager you have laid.
   IACHIMO. Then, if you can,                [Shows the bracelet]
     Be pale. I beg but leave to air this jewel. See!
     And now 'tis up again. It must be married
     To that your diamond; I'll keep them.
   POSTHUMUS. Jove!
     Once more let me behold it. Is it that
     Which I left with her?
   IACHIMO. Sir- I thank her- that.
--**--**--
     Thy Caesar knighted me; my youth I spent
     Much under him; of him I gather'd honour,
     Which he to seek of me again, perforce,
     Behoves me keep at utterance. I am perfect
     That the Pannonians and Dalmatians for
     Their liberties are now in arms, a precedent
     Which not to read would show the Britons cold;
     So Caesar shall not find them.
   LUCIUS. Let proof speak.
   CLOTEN. His majesty bids you welcome. Make pastime with us a day or
     two, or longer. If you seek us afterwards in other terms, you
     shall find us in our salt-water girdle. If you beat us out of it,
     it is yours; if you fall in the adventure, our crows shall fare
     the better for you; and there's an end.
   LUCIUS. So, sir.
   CYMBELINE. I know your master's pleasure, and he mine;
     All the remain is, welcome.                           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 Britain. Another room in CYMBELINE'S palace
 
 Enter PISANIO reading of a letter
 
   PISANIO. How? of adultery? Wherefore write you not
     What monsters her accuse? Leonatus!
     O master, what a strange infection
     Is fall'n into thy ear! What false Italian-
     As poisonous-tongu'd as handed- hath prevail'd
     On thy too ready hearing? Disloyal? No.
     She's punish'd for her truth, and undergoes,
     More goddess-like than wife-like, such assaults
     As would take in some virtue. O my master!
     Thy mind to her is now as low as were
     Thy fortunes. How? that I should murder her?
     Upon the love, and truth, and vows, which I
     Have made to thy command? I, her? Her blood?
     If it be so to do good service, never
     Let me be counted serviceable. How look I
     That I should seem to lack humanity
     So much as this fact comes to? [Reads] 'Do't. The letter
     That I have sent her, by her own command
--**--**--
     And we will fear no poison, which attends
     In place of greater state. I'll meet you in the valleys.
                                   Exeunt GUIDERIUS and ARVIRAGUS
     How hard it is to hide the sparks of nature!
     These boys know little they are sons to th' King,
     Nor Cymbeline dreams that they are alive.
     They think they are mine; and though train'd up thus meanly
     I' th' cave wherein they bow, their thoughts do hit
     The roofs of palaces, and nature prompts them
     In simple and low things to prince it much
     Beyond the trick of others. This Polydore,
     The heir of Cymbeline and Britain, who
     The King his father call'd Guiderius- Jove!
     When on my three-foot stool I sit and tell
     The warlike feats I have done, his spirits fly out
     Into my story; say 'Thus mine enemy fell,
     And thus I set my foot on's neck'; even then
     The princely blood flows in his cheek, he sweats,
     Strains his young nerves, and puts himself in posture
     That acts my words. The younger brother, Cadwal,
     Once Arviragus, in as like a figure
     Strikes life into my speech, and shows much more
     His own conceiving. Hark, the game is rous'd!
     O Cymbeline, heaven and my conscience knows
     Thou didst unjustly banish me! Whereon,
     At three and two years old, I stole these babes,
     Thinking to bar thee of succession as
     Thou refts me of my lands. Euriphile,
     Thou wast their nurse; they took thee for their mother,
     And every day do honour to her grave.
     Myself, Belarius, that am Morgan call'd,
     They take for natural father. The game is up.           Exit
 
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.
 Wales, near Milford Haven
 
 Enter PISANIO and IMOGEN
 
   IMOGEN. Thou told'st me, when we came from horse, the place
     Was near at hand. Ne'er long'd my mother so
     To see me first as I have now. Pisanio! Man!
--**--**--
   PISANIO. Then, madam,
     I thought you would not back again.
   IMOGEN. Most like-
     Bringing me here to kill me.
   PISANIO. Not so, neither;
     But if I were as wise as honest, then
     My purpose would prove well. It cannot be
     But that my master is abus'd. Some villain,
     Ay, and singular in his art, hath done you both
     This cursed injury.
   IMOGEN. Some Roman courtezan!
   PISANIO. No, on my life!
     I'll give but notice you are dead, and send him
     Some bloody sign of it, for 'tis commanded
     I should do so. You shall be miss'd at court,
     And that will well confirm it.
   IMOGEN. Why, good fellow,
     What shall I do the while? where bide? how live?
     Or in my life what comfort, when I am
     Dead to my husband?
   PISANIO. If you'll back to th' court-
   IMOGEN. No court, no father, nor no more ado
     With that harsh, noble, simple nothing-
     That Cloten, whose love-suit hath been to me
     As fearful as a siege.
   PISANIO. If not at court,
     Then not in Britain must you bide.
   IMOGEN. Where then?
     Hath Britain all the sun that shines? Day, night,
     Are they not but in Britain? I' th' world's volume
     Our Britain seems as of it, but not in't;
     In a great pool a swan's nest. Prithee think
     There's livers out of Britain.
   PISANIO. I am most glad
     You think of other place. Th' ambassador,
   LUCIUS the Roman, comes to Milford Haven
     To-morrow. Now, if you could wear a mind
     Dark as your fortune is, and but disguise
     That which t' appear itself must not yet be
     But by self-danger, you should tread a course
     Pretty and full of view; yea, happily, near
     The residence of Posthumus; so nigh, at least,
     That though his actions were not visible, yet
--**--**--
     Can snore upon the flint, when resty sloth
     Finds the down pillow hard. Now, peace be here,
     Poor house, that keep'st thyself!
   GUIDERIUS. I am thoroughly weary.
   ARVIRAGUS. I am weak with toil, yet strong in appetite.
   GUIDERIUS. There is cold meat i' th' cave; we'll browse on that
     Whilst what we have kill'd be cook'd.
   BELARIUS. [Looking into the cave] Stay, come not in.
     But that it eats our victuals, I should think
     Here were a fairy.
   GUIDERIUS. What's the matter, sir?
   BELARIUS.. By Jupiter, an angel! or, if not,
     An earthly paragon! Behold divineness
     No elder than a boy!
 
                        Re-enter IMOGEN
 
   IMOGEN. Good masters, harm me not.
     Before I enter'd here I call'd, and thought
     To have begg'd or bought what I have took. Good troth,
     I have stol'n nought; nor would not though I had found
     Gold strew'd i' th' floor. Here's money for my meat.
     I would have left it on the board, so soon
     As I had made my meal, and parted
     With pray'rs for the provider.
   GUIDERIUS. Money, youth?
   ARVIRAGUS. All gold and silver rather turn to dirt,
     As 'tis no better reckon'd but of those
     Who worship dirty gods.
   IMOGEN. I see you're angry.
     Know, if you kill me for my fault, I should
     Have died had I not made it.
   BELARIUS. Whither bound?
   IMOGEN. To Milford Haven.
   BELARIUS. What's your name?
   IMOGEN. Fidele, sir. I have a kinsman who
     Is bound for Italy; he embark'd at Milford;
     To whom being going, almost spent with hunger,
     I am fall'n in this offence.
   BELARIUS. Prithee, fair youth,
     Think us no churls, nor measure our good minds
     By this rude place we live in. Well encounter'd!
     'Tis almost night; you shall have better cheer
     Ere you depart, and thanks to stay and eat it.
--**--**--
     Which he did wave against my throat, I have ta'en
     His head from him. I'll throw't into the creek
     Behind our rock, and let it to the sea
     And tell the fishes he's the Queen's son, Cloten.
     That's all I reck.                                      Exit
   BELARIUS. I fear'twill be reveng'd.
     Would, Polydore, thou hadst not done't! though valour
     Becomes thee well enough.
   ARVIRAGUS. Would I had done't,
     So the revenge alone pursu'd me! Polydore,
     I love thee brotherly, but envy much
     Thou hast robb'd me of this deed. I would revenges,
     That possible strength might meet, would seek us through,
     And put us to our answer.
   BELARIUS. Well, 'tis done.
     We'll hunt no more to-day, nor seek for danger
     Where there's no profit. I prithee to our rock.
     You and Fidele play the cooks; I'll stay
     Till hasty Polydore return, and bring him
     To dinner presently.
   ARVIRAGUS. Poor sick Fidele!
     I'll willingly to him; to gain his colour
     I'd let a parish of such Cloten's blood,
     And praise myself for charity.                          Exit
   BELARIUS. O thou goddess,
     Thou divine Nature, thou thyself thou blazon'st
     In these two princely boys! They are as gentle
     As zephyrs blowing below the violet,
     Not wagging his sweet head; and yet as rough,
     Their royal blood enchaf'd, as the rud'st wind
     That by the top doth take the mountain pine
     And make him stoop to th' vale. 'Tis wonder
     That an invisible instinct should frame them
     To royalty unlearn'd, honour untaught,
     Civility not seen from other, valour
     That wildly grows in them, but yields a crop
     As if it had been sow'd. Yet still it's strange
     What Cloten's being here to us portends,
     Or what his death will bring us.
 
                     Re-enter GUIDERIUS
 
   GUIDERIUS. Where's my brother?
     I have sent Cloten's clotpoll down the stream,
     In embassy to his mother; his body's hostage
--**--**--
 
            Enter LUCIUS, CAPTAINS, and a SOOTHSAYER
 
   CAPTAIN. To them the legions garrison'd in Gallia,
     After your will, have cross'd the sea, attending
     You here at Milford Haven; with your ships,
     They are in readiness.
   LUCIUS. But what from Rome?
   CAPTAIN. The Senate hath stirr'd up the confiners
     And gentlemen of Italy, most willing spirits,
     That promise noble service; and they come
     Under the conduct of bold Iachimo,
     Sienna's brother.
   LUCIUS. When expect you them?
   CAPTAIN. With the next benefit o' th' wind.
   LUCIUS. This forwardness
     Makes our hopes fair. Command our present numbers
     Be muster'd; bid the captains look to't. Now, sir,
     What have you dream'd of late of this war's purpose?
   SOOTHSAYER. Last night the very gods show'd me a vision-
     I fast and pray'd for their intelligence- thus:
     I saw Jove's bird, the Roman eagle, wing'd
     From the spongy south to this part of the west,
     There vanish'd in the sunbeams; which portends,
     Unless my sins abuse my divination,
     Success to th' Roman host.
   LUCIUS. Dream often so,
     And never false. Soft, ho! what trunk is here
     Without his top? The ruin speaks that sometime
     It was a worthy building. How? a page?
     Or dead or sleeping on him? But dead, rather;
     For nature doth abhor to make his bed
     With the defunct, or sleep upon the dead.
     Let's see the boy's face.
   CAPTAIN. He's alive, my lord.
   LUCIUS. He'll then instruct us of this body. Young one,
     Inform us of thy fortunes; for it seems
     They crave to be demanded. Who is this
     Thou mak'st thy bloody pillow? Or who was he
     That, otherwise than noble nature did,
     Hath alter'd that good picture? What's thy interest
     In this sad wreck? How came't? Who is't? What art thou?
   IMOGEN. I am nothing; or if not,
     Nothing to be were better. This was my master,
--**--**--
     Is every breath a death. And thus unknown,
     Pitied nor hated, to the face of peril
     Myself I'll dedicate. Let me make men know
     More valour in me than my habits show.
     Gods, put the strength o' th' Leonati in me!
     To shame the guise o' th' world, I will begin
     The fashion- less without and more within.              Exit
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 Britain. A field of battle between the British and Roman camps
 
 Enter LUCIUS, IACHIMO, and the Roman army at one door, and the British army
 at another, LEONATUS POSTHUMUS following like a poor soldier.
 They march over and go out.  Alarums.  Then enter again, in skirmish,
 IACHIMO and POSTHUMUS.  He vanquisheth and disarmeth IACHIMO,
 and then leaves him
 
   IACHIMO. The heaviness and guilt within my bosom
     Takes off my manhood. I have belied a lady,
     The Princess of this country, and the air on't
     Revengingly enfeebles me; or could this carl,
     A very drudge of nature's, have subdu'd me
     In my profession? Knighthoods and honours borne
     As I wear mine are titles but of scorn.
     If that thy gentry, Britain, go before
     This lout as he exceeds our lords, the odds
     Is that we scarce are men, and you are gods.            Exit
 
     The battle continues; the BRITONS fly; CYMBELINE is taken.
     Then enter to his rescue BELARIUS, GUIDERIUS, and ARVIRAGUS
 
   BELARIUS. Stand, stand! We have th' advantage of the ground;
     The lane is guarded; nothing routs us but
     The villainy of our fears.
   GUIDERIUS and ARVIRAGUS. Stand, stand, and fight!
 
     Re-enter POSTHUMUS, and seconds the Britons; they rescue
     CYMBELINE, and exeunt. Then re-enter LUCIUS and IACHIMO,
                          with IMOGEN
 
   LUCIUS. Away, boy, from the troops, and save thyself;
     For friends kill friends, and the disorder's such
     As war were hoodwink'd.
   IACHIMO. 'Tis their fresh supplies.
   LUCIUS. It is a day turn'd strangely. Or betimes
--**--**--
     No care of yours it is; you know 'tis ours.
     Whom best I love I cross; to make my gift,
     The more delay'd, delighted. Be content;
     Your low-laid son our godhead will uplift;
     His comforts thrive, his trials well are spent.
     Our Jovial star reign'd at his birth, and in
     Our temple was he married. Rise and fade!
     He shall be lord of Lady Imogen,
     And happier much by his affliction made.
     This tablet lay upon his breast, wherein
     Our pleasure his full fortune doth confine;
     And so, away; no farther with your din
     Express impatience, lest you stir up mine.
     Mount, eagle, to my palace crystalline.            [Ascends]
   SICILIUS. He came in thunder; his celestial breath
     Was sulpherous to smell; the holy eagle
     Stoop'd as to foot us. His ascension is
     More sweet than our blest fields. His royal bird
     Prunes the immortal wing, and cloys his beak,
     As when his god is pleas'd.
   ALL. Thanks, Jupiter!
   SICILIUS. The marble pavement closes, he is enter'd
     His radiant roof. Away! and, to be blest,
     Let us with care perform his great behest.   [GHOSTS vanish]
 
   POSTHUMUS. [Waking] Sleep, thou has been a grandsire and begot
     A father to me; and thou hast created
     A mother and two brothers. But, O scorn,
     Gone! They went hence so soon as they were born.
     And so I am awake. Poor wretches, that depend
     On greatness' favour, dream as I have done;
     Wake and find nothing. But, alas, I swerve;
     Many dream not to find, neither deserve,
     And yet are steep'd in favours; so am I,
     That have this golden chance, and know not why.
     What fairies haunt this ground? A book? O rare one!
     Be not, as is our fangled world, a garment
     Nobler than that it covers. Let thy effects
     So follow to be most unlike our courtiers,
--**--**--
     And but she spoke it dying, I would not
     Believe her lips in opening it. Proceed.
   CORNELIUS. Your daughter, whom she bore in hand to love
     With such integrity, she did confess
     Was as a scorpion to her sight; whose life,
     But that her flight prevented it, she had
     Ta'en off by poison.
   CYMBELINE. O most delicate fiend!
     Who is't can read a woman? Is there more?
   CORNELIUS. More, sir, and worse. She did confess she had
     For you a mortal mineral, which, being took,
     Should by the minute feed on life, and ling'ring,
     By inches waste you. In which time she purpos'd,
     By watching, weeping, tendance, kissing, to
     O'ercome you with her show; and in time,
     When she had fitted you with her craft, to work
     Her son into th' adoption of the crown;
     But failing of her end by his strange absence,
     Grew shameless-desperate, open'd, in despite
     Of heaven and men, her purposes, repented
     The evils she hatch'd were not effected; so,
     Despairing, died.
   CYMBELINE. Heard you all this, her women?
   LADY. We did, so please your Highness.
   CYMBELINE. Mine eyes
     Were not in fault, for she was beautiful;
     Mine ears, that heard her flattery; nor my heart
     That thought her like her seeming. It had been vicious
     To have mistrusted her; yet, O my daughter!
     That it was folly in me thou mayst say,
     And prove it in thy feeling. Heaven mend all!
 
          Enter LUCIUS, IACHIMO, the SOOTHSAYER, and other
       Roman prisoners, guarded; POSTHUMUS behind, and IMOGEN
 
     Thou com'st not, Caius, now for tribute; that
     The Britons have raz'd out, though with the loss
     Of many a bold one, whose kinsmen have made suit
     That their good souls may be appeas'd with slaughter
     Of you their captives, which ourself have granted;
     So think of your estate.
--**--**--
     My lady's honour. What became of him
     I further know not.
   GUIDERIUS. Let me end the story:
     I slew him there.
   CYMBELINE. Marry, the gods forfend!
     I would not thy good deeds should from my lips
     Pluck a hard sentence. Prithee, valiant youth,
     Deny't again.
   GUIDERIUS. I have spoke it, and I did it.
   CYMBELINE. He was a prince.
   GUIDERIUS. A most incivil one. The wrongs he did me
     Were nothing prince-like; for he did provoke me
     With language that would make me spurn the sea,
     If it could so roar to me. I cut off's head,
     And am right glad he is not standing here
     To tell this tale of mine.
   CYMBELINE. I am sorry for thee.
     By thine own tongue thou art condemn'd, and must
     Endure our law. Thou'rt dead.
   IMOGEN. That headless man
     I thought had been my lord.
   CYMBELINE. Bind the offender,
     And take him from our presence.
   BELARIUS. Stay, sir King.
     This man is better than the man he slew,
     As well descended as thyself, and hath
     More of thee merited than a band of Clotens
     Had ever scar for. [To the guard] Let his arms alone;
     They were not born for bondage.
   CYMBELINE. Why, old soldier,
     Wilt thou undo the worth thou art unpaid for
     By tasting of our wrath? How of descent
     As good as we?
   ARVIRAGUS. In that he spake too far.
   CYMBELINE. And thou shalt die for't.
   BELARIUS. We will die all three;
     But I will prove that two on's are as good
     As I have given out him. My sons, I must
     For mine own part unfold a dangerous speech,
     Though haply well for you.
   ARVIRAGUS. Your danger's ours.
   GUIDERIUS. And our good his.
   BELARIUS. Have at it then by leave!
     Thou hadst, great King, a subject who
     Was call'd Belarius.
--**--**--
   Mar. And liegemen to the Dane.
   Fran. Give you good night.
   Mar. O, farewell, honest soldier.
     Who hath reliev'd you?
   Fran. Bernardo hath my place.
     Give you good night.                                   Exit.
   Mar. Holla, Bernardo!
   Ber. Say-
     What, is Horatio there ?
   Hor. A piece of him.
   Ber. Welcome, Horatio. Welcome, good Marcellus.
   Mar. What, has this thing appear'd again to-night?
   Ber. I have seen nothing.
   Mar. Horatio says 'tis but our fantasy,
     And will not let belief take hold of him
     Touching this dreaded sight, twice seen of us.
     Therefore I have entreated him along,
     With us to watch the minutes of this night,
     That, if again this apparition come,
     He may approve our eyes and speak to it.
   Hor. Tush, tush, 'twill not appear.
   Ber. Sit down awhile,
     And let us once again assail your ears,
     That are so fortified against our story,
     What we two nights have seen.
   Hor. Well, sit we down,
     And let us hear Bernardo speak of this.
   Ber. Last night of all,
     When yond same star that's westward from the pole
     Had made his course t' illume that part of heaven
     Where now it burns, Marcellus and myself,
     The bell then beating one-
 
                         Enter Ghost.
 
   Mar. Peace! break thee off! Look where it comes again!
   Ber. In the same figure, like the King that's dead.
   Mar. Thou art a scholar; speak to it, Horatio.
   Ber. Looks it not like the King? Mark it, Horatio.
   Hor. Most like. It harrows me with fear and wonder.
   Ber. It would be spoke to.
   Mar. Question it, Horatio.
   Hor. What art thou that usurp'st this time of night
     Together with that fair and warlike form
     In which the majesty of buried Denmark
     Did sometimes march? By heaven I charge thee speak!
   Mar. It is offended.
   Ber. See, it stalks away!
--**--**--
                       Enter Ghost again.
 
     But soft! behold! Lo, where it comes again!
     I'll cross it, though it blast me.- Stay illusion!
                                                Spreads his arms.
     If thou hast any sound, or use of voice,
     Speak to me.
     If there be any good thing to be done,
     That may to thee do ease, and, race to me,
     Speak to me.
     If thou art privy to thy country's fate,
     Which happily foreknowing may avoid,
     O, speak!
     Or if thou hast uphoarded in thy life
     Extorted treasure in the womb of earth
     (For which, they say, you spirits oft walk in death),
                                                  The cock crows.
     Speak of it! Stay, and speak!- Stop it, Marcellus!
   Mar. Shall I strike at it with my partisan?
   Hor. Do, if it will not stand.
   Ber. 'Tis here!
   Hor. 'Tis here!
   Mar. 'Tis gone!
                                                      Exit Ghost.
     We do it wrong, being so majestical,
     To offer it the show of violence;
     For it is as the air, invulnerable,
     And our vain blows malicious mockery.
   Ber. It was about to speak, when the cock crew.
   Hor. And then it started, like a guilty thing
     Upon a fearful summons. I have heard
     The cock, that is the trumpet to the morn,
     Doth with his lofty and shrill-sounding throat
     Awake the god of day; and at his warning,
     Whether in sea or fire, in earth or air,
     Th' extravagant and erring spirit hies
     To his confine; and of the truth herein
     This present object made probation.
   Mar. It faded on the crowing of the cock.
     Some say that ever, 'gainst that season comes
     Wherein our Saviour's birth is celebrated,
     The bird of dawning singeth all night long;
     And then, they say, no spirit dare stir abroad,
     The nights are wholesome, then no planets strike,
     No fairy takes, nor witch hath power to charm,
--**--**--
     With mirth in funeral, and with dirge in marriage,
     In equal scale weighing delight and dole,
     Taken to wife; nor have we herein barr'd
     Your better wisdoms, which have freely gone
     With this affair along. For all, our thanks.
     Now follows, that you know, young Fortinbras,
     Holding a weak supposal of our worth,
     Or thinking by our late dear brother's death
     Our state to be disjoint and out of frame,
     Colleagued with this dream of his advantage,
     He hath not fail'd to pester us with message
     Importing the surrender of those lands
     Lost by his father, with all bands of law,
     To our most valiant brother. So much for him.
     Now for ourself and for this time of meeting.
     Thus much the business is: we have here writ
     To Norway, uncle of young Fortinbras,
     Who, impotent and bedrid, scarcely hears
     Of this his nephew's purpose, to suppress
     His further gait herein, in that the levies,
     The lists, and full proportions are all made
     Out of his subject; and we here dispatch
     You, good Cornelius, and you, Voltemand,
     For bearers of this greeting to old Norway,
     Giving to you no further personal power
     To business with the King, more than the scope
     Of these dilated articles allow.            [Gives a paper.]
     Farewell, and let your haste commend your duty.
   Cor., Volt. In that, and all things, will we show our duty.
   King. We doubt it nothing. Heartily farewell.
                                  Exeunt Voltemand and Cornelius.
     And now, Laertes, what's the news with you?
     You told us of some suit. What is't, Laertes?
     You cannot speak of reason to the Dane
     And lose your voice. What wouldst thou beg, Laertes,
     That shall not be my offer, not thy asking?
     The head is not more native to the heart,
     The hand more instrumental to the mouth,
--**--**--
     Stand dumb and speak not to him. This to me
     In dreadful secrecy impart they did,
     And I with them the third night kept the watch;
     Where, as they had deliver'd, both in time,
     Form of the thing, each word made true and good,
     The apparition comes. I knew your father.
     These hands are not more like.
   Ham. But where was this?
   Mar. My lord, upon the platform where we watch'd.
   Ham. Did you not speak to it?
   Hor. My lord, I did;
     But answer made it none. Yet once methought
     It lifted up it head and did address
     Itself to motion, like as it would speak;
     But even then the morning cock crew loud,
     And at the sound it shrunk in haste away
     And vanish'd from our sight.
   Ham. 'Tis very strange.
   Hor. As I do live, my honour'd lord, 'tis true;
     And we did think it writ down in our duty
     To let you know of it.
   Ham. Indeed, indeed, sirs. But this troubles me.
     Hold you the watch to-night?
   Both [Mar. and Ber.] We do, my lord.
   Ham. Arm'd, say you?
   Both. Arm'd, my lord.
   Ham. From top to toe?
   Both. My lord, from head to foot.
   Ham. Then saw you not his face?
   Hor. O, yes, my lord! He wore his beaver up.
   Ham. What, look'd he frowningly.
   Hor. A countenance more in sorrow than in anger.
   Ham. Pale or red?
   Hor. Nay, very pale.
   Ham. And fix'd his eyes upon you?
   Hor. Most constantly.
   Ham. I would I had been there.
   Hor. It would have much amaz'd you.
   Ham. Very like, very like. Stay'd it long?
   Hor. While one with moderate haste might tell a hundred.
   Both. Longer, longer.
   Hor. Not when I saw't.
   Ham. His beard was grizzled- no?
   Hor. It was, as I have seen it in his life,
--**--**--
     For he himself is subject to his birth.
     He may not, as unvalued persons do,
     Carve for himself, for on his choice depends
     The safety and health of this whole state,
     And therefore must his choice be circumscrib'd
     Unto the voice and yielding of that body
     Whereof he is the head. Then if he says he loves you,
     It fits your wisdom so far to believe it
     As he in his particular act and place
     May give his saying deed; which is no further
     Than the main voice of Denmark goes withal.
     Then weigh what loss your honour may sustain
     If with too credent ear you list his songs,
     Or lose your heart, or your chaste treasure open
     To his unmast'red importunity.
     Fear it, Ophelia, fear it, my dear sister,
     And keep you in the rear of your affection,
     Out of the shot and danger of desire.
     The chariest maid is prodigal enough
     If she unmask her beauty to the moon.
     Virtue itself scopes not calumnious strokes.
     The canker galls the infants of the spring
     Too oft before their buttons be disclos'd,
     And in the morn and liquid dew of youth
     Contagious blastments are most imminent.
     Be wary then; best safety lies in fear.
     Youth to itself rebels, though none else near.
   Oph. I shall th' effect of this good lesson keep
     As watchman to my heart. But, good my brother,
     Do not as some ungracious pastors do,
     Show me the steep and thorny way to heaven,
     Whiles, like a puff'd and reckless libertine,
     Himself the primrose path of dalliance treads
     And recks not his own rede.
   Laer. O, fear me not!
 
                        Enter Polonius.
 
     I stay too long. But here my father comes.
     A double blessing is a double grace;
     Occasion smiles upon a second leave.
   Pol. Yet here, Laertes? Aboard, aboard, for shame!
--**--**--
   Laer. Most humbly do I take my leave, my lord.
   Pol. The time invites you. Go, your servants tend.
   Laer. Farewell, Ophelia, and remember well
     What I have said to you.
   Oph. 'Tis in my memory lock'd,
     And you yourself shall keep the key of it.
   Laer. Farewell.                                          Exit.
   Pol. What is't, Ophelia, he hath said to you?
   Oph. So please you, something touching the Lord Hamlet.
   Pol. Marry, well bethought!
     'Tis told me he hath very oft of late
     Given private time to you, and you yourself
     Have of your audience been most free and bounteous.
     If it be so- as so 'tis put on me,
     And that in way of caution- I must tell you
     You do not understand yourself so clearly
     As it behooves my daughter and your honour.
     What is between you? Give me up the truth.
   Oph. He hath, my lord, of late made many tenders
     Of his affection to me.
   Pol. Affection? Pooh! You speak like a green girl,
     Unsifted in such perilous circumstance.
     Do you believe his tenders, as you call them?
   Oph. I do not know, my lord, what I should think,
   Pol. Marry, I will teach you! Think yourself a baby
     That you have ta'en these tenders for true pay,
     Which are not sterling. Tender yourself more dearly,
     Or (not to crack the wind of the poor phrase,
     Running it thus) you'll tender me a fool.
   Oph. My lord, he hath importun'd me with love
     In honourable fashion.
   Pol. Ay, fashion you may call it. Go to, go to!
   Oph. And hath given countenance to his speech, my lord,
     With almost all the holy vows of heaven.
   Pol. Ay, springes to catch woodcocks! I do know,
     When the blood burns, how prodigal the soul
     Lends the tongue vows. These blazes, daughter,
--**--**--
     And for the day confin'd to fast in fires,
     Till the foul crimes done in my days of nature
     Are burnt and purg'd away. But that I am forbid
     To tell the secrets of my prison house,
     I could a tale unfold whose lightest word
     Would harrow up thy soul, freeze thy young blood,
     Make thy two eyes, like stars, start from their spheres,
     Thy knotted and combined locks to part,
     And each particular hair to stand an end
     Like quills upon the fretful porpentine.
     But this eternal blazon must not be
     To ears of flesh and blood. List, list, O, list!
     If thou didst ever thy dear father love-
   Ham. O God!
   Ghost. Revenge his foul and most unnatural murther.
   Ham. Murther?
   Ghost. Murther most foul, as in the best it is;
     But this most foul, strange, and unnatural.
   Ham. Haste me to know't, that I, with wings as swift
     As meditation or the thoughts of love,
     May sweep to my revenge.
   Ghost. I find thee apt;
     And duller shouldst thou be than the fat weed
     That rots itself in ease on Lethe wharf,
     Wouldst thou not stir in this. Now, Hamlet, hear.
     'Tis given out that, sleeping in my orchard,
     A serpent stung me. So the whole ear of Denmark
     Is by a forged process of my death
     Rankly abus'd. But know, thou noble youth,
     The serpent that did sting thy father's life
     Now wears his crown.
   Ham. O my prophetic soul!
     My uncle?
   Ghost. Ay, that incestuous, that adulterate beast,
     With witchcraft of his wit, with traitorous gifts-
     O wicked wit and gifts, that have the power
     So to seduce!- won to his shameful lust
     The will of my most seeming-virtuous queen.
     O Hamlet, what a falling-off was there,
     From me, whose love was of that dignity
--**--**--
     Let not the royal bed of Denmark be
     A couch for luxury and damned incest.
     But, howsoever thou pursuest this act,
     Taint not thy mind, nor let thy soul contrive
     Against thy mother aught. Leave her to heaven,
     And to those thorns that in her bosom lodge
     To prick and sting her. Fare thee well at once.
     The glowworm shows the matin to be near
     And gins to pale his uneffectual fire.
     Adieu, adieu, adieu! Remember me.                      Exit.
   Ham. O all you host of heaven! O earth! What else?
     And shall I couple hell? Hold, hold, my heart!
     And you, my sinews, grow not instant old,
     But bear me stiffly up. Remember thee?
     Ay, thou poor ghost, while memory holds a seat
     In this distracted globe. Remember thee?
     Yea, from the table of my memory
     I'll wipe away all trivial fond records,
     All saws of books, all forms, all pressures past
     That youth and observation copied there,
     And thy commandment all alone shall live
     Within the book and volume of my brain,
     Unmix'd with baser matter. Yes, by heaven!
     O most pernicious woman!
     O villain, villain, smiling, damned villain!
     My tables! Meet it is I set it down
     That one may smile, and smile, and be a villain;
     At least I am sure it may be so in Denmark.        [Writes.]
     So, uncle, there you are. Now to my word:
     It is 'Adieu, adieu! Remember me.'
     I have sworn't.
   Hor. (within) My lord, my lord!
 
                    Enter Horatio and Marcellus.
 
   Mar. Lord Hamlet!
   Hor. Heaven secure him!
   Ham. So be it!
   Mar. Illo, ho, ho, my lord!
   Ham. Hillo, ho, ho, boy! Come, bird, come.
   Mar. How is't, my noble lord?
   Hor. What news, my lord?
   Mar. O, wonderful!
   Hor. Good my lord, tell it.
   Ham. No, you will reveal it.
--**--**--
     And to the last bended their light on me.
   Pol. Come, go with me. I will go seek the King.
     This is the very ecstasy of love,
     Whose violent property fordoes itself
     And leads the will to desperate undertakings
     As oft as any passion under heaven
     That does afflict our natures. I am sorry.
     What, have you given him any hard words of late?
   Oph. No, my good lord; but, as you did command,
     I did repel his letters and denied
     His access to me.
   Pol. That hath made him mad.
     I am sorry that with better heed and judgment
     I had not quoted him. I fear'd he did but trifle
     And meant to wrack thee; but beshrew my jealousy!
     By heaven, it is as proper to our age
     To cast beyond ourselves in our opinions
     As it is common for the younger sort
     To lack discretion. Come, go we to the King.
     This must be known; which, being kept close, might move
     More grief to hide than hate to utter love.
     Come.
                                                          Exeunt.
 
 Scene II.
 Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
 
 Flourish. [Enter King and Queen, Rosencrantz and Guildenstern, cum aliis.
 
   King. Welcome, dear Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
     Moreover that we much did long to see you,
     The need we have to use you did provoke
     Our hasty sending. Something have you heard
     Of Hamlet's transformation. So I call it,
     Sith nor th' exterior nor the inward man
     Resembles that it was. What it should be,
     More than his father's death, that thus hath put him
     So much from th' understanding of himself,
     I cannot dream of. I entreat you both
     That, being of so young clays brought up with him,
     And since so neighbour'd to his youth and haviour,
     That you vouchsafe your rest here in our court
--**--**--
     Mad call I it; for, to define true madness,
     What is't but to be nothing else but mad?
     But let that go.
   Queen. More matter, with less art.
   Pol. Madam, I swear I use no art at all.
     That he is mad, 'tis true: 'tis true 'tis pity;
     And pity 'tis 'tis true. A foolish figure!
     But farewell it, for I will use no art.
     Mad let us grant him then. And now remains
     That we find out the cause of this effect-
     Or rather say, the cause of this defect,
     For this effect defective comes by cause.
     Thus it remains, and the remainder thus.
     Perpend.
     I have a daughter (have while she is mine),
     Who in her duty and obedience, mark,
     Hath given me this. Now gather, and surmise.
                                              [Reads] the letter.
     'To the celestial, and my soul's idol, the most beautified
       Ophelia,'-
 
     That's an ill phrase, a vile phrase; 'beautified' is a vile
       phrase.
     But you shall hear. Thus:
                                                         [Reads.]
     'In her excellent white bosom, these, &c.'
   Queen. Came this from Hamlet to her?
   Pol. Good madam, stay awhile. I will be faithful.     [Reads.]
 
           'Doubt thou the stars are fire;
             Doubt that the sun doth move;
           Doubt truth to be a liar;
             But never doubt I love.
       'O dear Ophelia, I am ill at these numbers; I have not art to
     reckon my groans; but that I love thee best, O most best, believe
     it. Adieu.
       'Thine evermore, most dear lady, whilst this machine is to him,
                                                           HAMLET.'
 
     This, in obedience, hath my daughter shown me;
     And more above, hath his solicitings,
     As they fell out by time, by means, and place,
     All given to mine ear.
   King. But how hath she
     Receiv'd his love?
   Pol. What do you think of me?
   King. As of a man faithful and honourable.
--**--**--
   Ham. How comes it? Do they grow rusty?
   Ros. Nay, their endeavour keeps in the wonted pace; but there is,
     sir, an eyrie of children, little eyases, that cry out on the top
     of question and are most tyrannically clapp'd fort. These are now
     the fashion, and so berattle the common stages (so they call
     them) that many wearing rapiers are afraid of goosequills and
     dare scarce come thither.
   Ham. What, are they children? Who maintains 'em? How are they
     escoted? Will they pursue the quality no longer than they can
     sing? Will they not say afterwards, if they should grow
     themselves to common players (as it is most like, if their means
     are no better), their writers do them wrong to make them exclaim
     against their own succession.
   Ros. Faith, there has been much to do on both sides; and the nation
     holds it no sin to tarre them to controversy. There was, for a
     while, no money bid for argument unless the poet and the player
     went to cuffs in the question.
   Ham. Is't possible?
   Guil. O, there has been much throwing about of brains.
   Ham. Do the boys carry it away?
   Ros. Ay, that they do, my lord- Hercules and his load too.
   Ham. It is not very strange; for my uncle is King of Denmark, and
     those that would make mows at him while my father lived give
     twenty, forty, fifty, a hundred ducats apiece for his picture in
     little. 'Sblood, there is something in this more than natural, if
     philosophy could find it out.
 
                      Flourish for the Players.
 
   Guil. There are the players.
   Ham. Gentlemen, you are welcome to Elsinore. Your hands, come! Th'
     appurtenance of welcome is fashion and ceremony. Let me comply
     with you in this garb, lest my extent to the players (which I
--**--**--
     We may of their encounter frankly judge
     And gather by him, as he is behav'd,
     If't be th' affliction of his love, or no,
     That thus he suffers for.
   Queen. I shall obey you;
     And for your part, Ophelia, I do wish
     That your good beauties be the happy cause
     Of Hamlet's wildness. So shall I hope your virtues
     Will bring him to his wonted way again,
     To both your honours.
   Oph. Madam, I wish it may.
                                                    [Exit Queen.]
   Pol. Ophelia, walk you here.- Gracious, so please you,
     We will bestow ourselves.- [To Ophelia] Read on this book,
     That show of such an exercise may colour
     Your loneliness.- We are oft to blame in this,
     'Tis too much prov'd, that with devotion's visage
     And pious action we do sugar o'er
     The Devil himself.
   King. [aside] O, 'tis too true!
     How smart a lash that speech doth give my conscience!
     The harlot's cheek, beautied with plast'ring art,
     Is not more ugly to the thing that helps it
     Than is my deed to my most painted word.
     O heavy burthen!
   Pol. I hear him coming. Let's withdraw, my lord.
                                       Exeunt King and Polonius].
 
                            Enter Hamlet.
 
   Ham. To be, or not to be- that is the question:
     Whether 'tis nobler in the mind to suffer
     The slings and arrows of outrageous fortune
     Or to take arms against a sea of troubles,
     And by opposing end them. To die- to sleep-
     No more; and by a sleep to say we end
     The heartache, and the thousand natural shocks
     That flesh is heir to. 'Tis a consummation
     Devoutly to be wish'd. To die- to sleep.
     To sleep- perchance to dream: ay, there's the rub!
     For in that sleep of death what dreams may come
     When we have shuffled off this mortal coil,
     Must give us pause. There's the respect
--**--**--
   Oph. What is, my lord?
   Ham. Nothing.
   Oph. You are merry, my lord.
   Ham. Who, I?
   Oph. Ay, my lord.
   Ham. O God, your only jig-maker! What should a man do but be merry?
     For look you how cheerfully my mother looks, and my father died
     within 's two hours.
   Oph. Nay 'tis twice two months, my lord.
   Ham. So long? Nay then, let the devil wear black, for I'll have a
     suit of sables. O heavens! die two months ago, and not forgotten
     yet? Then there's hope a great man's memory may outlive his life
     half a year. But, by'r Lady, he must build churches then; or else
     shall he suffer not thinking on, with the hobby-horse, whose
     epitaph is 'For O, for O, the hobby-horse is forgot!'
 
                Hautboys play. The dumb show enters.
 
     Enter a King and a Queen very lovingly; the Queen embracing
     him and he her. She kneels, and makes show of protestation
     unto him. He takes her up, and declines his head upon her
     neck. He lays him down upon a bank of flowers. She, seeing
     him asleep, leaves him. Anon comes in a fellow, takes off his
     crown, kisses it, pours poison in the sleeper's ears, and
     leaves him. The Queen returns, finds the King dead, and makes
     passionate action. The Poisoner with some three or four Mutes,
     comes in again, seem to condole with her. The dead body is
     carried away. The Poisoner wooes the Queen with gifts; she
     seems harsh and unwilling awhile, but in the end accepts
     his love.
                                                          Exeunt.
 
   Oph. What means this, my lord?
   Ham. Marry, this is miching malhecho; it means mischief.
   Oph. Belike this show imports the argument of the play.
 
                       Enter Prologue.
 
   Ham. We shall know by this fellow. The players cannot keep counsel;
     they'll tell all.
--**--**--
 
   Ham. If she should break it now!
 
     King. 'Tis deeply sworn. Sweet, leave me here awhile.
       My spirits grow dull, and fain I would beguile
       The tedious day with sleep.
     Queen. Sleep rock thy brain,
                                                     [He] sleeps.
       And never come mischance between us twain!
 Exit.
 
   Ham. Madam, how like you this play?
   Queen. The lady doth protest too much, methinks.
   Ham. O, but she'll keep her word.
   King. Have you heard the argument? Is there no offence in't?
   Ham. No, no! They do but jest, poison in jest; no offence i' th'
     world.
   King. What do you call the play?
   Ham. 'The Mousetrap.' Marry, how? Tropically. This play is the
     image of a murther done in Vienna. Gonzago is the duke's name;
     his wife, Baptista. You shall see anon. 'Tis a knavish piece of
     work; but what o' that? Your Majesty, and we that have free
     souls, it touches us not. Let the gall'd jade winch; our withers
     are unwrung.
 
                          Enter Lucianus.
 
     This is one Lucianus, nephew to the King.
   Oph. You are as good as a chorus, my lord.
   Ham. I could interpret between you and your love, if I could see
     the puppets dallying.
   Oph. You are keen, my lord, you are keen.
   Ham. It would cost you a groaning to take off my edge.
   Oph. Still better, and worse.
   Ham. So you must take your husbands.- Begin, murtherer. Pox, leave
     thy damnable faces, and begin! Come, the croaking raven doth
     bellow for revenge.
 
     Luc. Thoughts black, hands apt, drugs fit, and time agreeing;
       Confederate season, else no creature seeing;
       Thou mixture rank, of midnight weeds collected,
       With Hecate's ban thrice blasted, thrice infected,
       Thy natural magic and dire property
       On wholesome life usurp immediately.
                                    Pours the poison in his ears.
 
   Ham. He poisons him i' th' garden for's estate. His name's Gonzago.
--**--**--
     And let me wring your heart; for so I shall
     If it be made of penetrable stuff;
     If damned custom have not braz'd it so
     That it is proof and bulwark against sense.
   Queen. What have I done that thou dar'st wag thy tongue
     In noise so rude against me?
   Ham. Such an act
     That blurs the grace and blush of modesty;
     Calls virtue hypocrite; takes off the rose
     From the fair forehead of an innocent love,
     And sets a blister there; makes marriage vows
     As false as dicers' oaths. O, such a deed
     As from the body of contraction plucks
     The very soul, and sweet religion makes
     A rhapsody of words! Heaven's face doth glow;
     Yea, this solidity and compound mass,
     With tristful visage, as against the doom,
     Is thought-sick at the act.
   Queen. Ay me, what act,
     That roars so loud and thunders in the index?
   Ham. Look here upon th's picture, and on this,
     The counterfeit presentment of two brothers.
     See what a grace was seated on this brow;
     Hyperion's curls; the front of Jove himself;
     An eye like Mars, to threaten and command;
     A station like the herald Mercury
     New lighted on a heaven-kissing hill:
     A combination and a form indeed
     Where every god did seem to set his seal
     To give the world assurance of a man.
     This was your husband. Look you now what follows.
     Here is your husband, like a mildew'd ear
     Blasting his wholesome brother. Have you eyes?
     Could you on this fair mountain leave to feed,
     And batten on this moor? Ha! have you eyes
     You cannot call it love; for at your age
     The heyday in the blood is tame, it's humble,
     And waits upon the judgment; and what judgment
     Would step from this to this? Sense sure you have,
--**--**--
     My father, in his habit as he liv'd!
     Look where he goes even now out at the portal!
                                                      Exit Ghost.
   Queen. This is the very coinage of your brain.
     This bodiless creation ecstasy
     Is very cunning in.
   Ham. Ecstasy?
     My pulse as yours doth temperately keep time
     And makes as healthful music. It is not madness
     That I have utt'red. Bring me to the test,
     And I the matter will reword; which madness
     Would gambol from. Mother, for love of grace,
     Lay not that flattering unction to your soul
     That not your trespass but my madness speaks.
     It will but skin and film the ulcerous place,
     Whiles rank corruption, mining all within,
     Infects unseen. Confess yourself to heaven;
     Repent what's past; avoid what is to come;
     And do not spread the compost on the weeds
     To make them ranker. Forgive me this my virtue;
     For in the fatness of these pursy times
     Virtue itself of vice must pardon beg-
     Yea, curb and woo for leave to do him good.
   Queen. O Hamlet, thou hast cleft my heart in twain.
   Ham. O, throw away the worser part of it,
     And live the purer with the other half,
     Good night- but go not to my uncle's bed.
     Assume a virtue, if you have it not.
     That monster, custom, who all sense doth eat
     Of habits evil, is angel yet in this,
     That to the use of actions fair and good
     He likewise gives a frock or livery,
     That aptly is put on. Refrain to-night,
     And that shall lend a kind of easiness
     To the next abstinence; the next more easy;
     For use almost can change the stamp of nature,
     And either [master] the devil, or throw him out
     With wondrous potency. Once more, good night;
     And when you are desirous to be blest,
--**--**--
     As level as the cannon to his blank,
     Transports his poisoned shot- may miss our name
     And hit the woundless air.- O, come away!
     My soul is full of discord and dismay.
                                                          Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 Scene II.
 Elsinore. A passage in the Castle.
 
 Enter Hamlet.
 
   Ham. Safely stow'd.
   Gentlemen. (within) Hamlet! Lord Hamlet!
   Ham. But soft! What noise? Who calls on Hamlet? O, here they come.
 
                Enter Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
 
   Ros. What have you done, my lord, with the dead body?
   Ham. Compounded it with dust, whereto 'tis kin.
   Ros. Tell us where 'tis, that we may take it thence
     And bear it to the chapel.
   Ham. Do not believe it.
   Ros. Believe what?
   Ham. That I can keep your counsel, and not mine own. Besides, to be
     demanded of a sponge, what replication should be made by the son
     of a king?
   Ros. Take you me for a sponge, my lord?
   Ham. Ay, sir; that soaks up the King's countenance, his rewards,
     his authorities. But such officers do the King best service in
     the end. He keeps them, like an ape, in the corner of his jaw;
     first mouth'd, to be last Swallowed. When he needs what you have
     glean'd, it is but squeezing you and, sponge, you shall be dry
     again.
   Ros. I understand you not, my lord.
   Ham. I am glad of it. A knavish speech sleeps in a foolish ear.
   Ros. My lord, you must tell us where the body is and go with us to
     the King.
   Ham. The body is with the King, but the King is not with the body.
     The King is a thing-
   Guil. A thing, my lord?
   Ham. Of nothing. Bring me to him. Hide fox, and all after.
                                                          Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 Scene III.
 Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
 
 Enter King.
 
   King. I have sent to seek him and to find the body.
--**--**--
     Thick and and unwholesome in their thoughts and whispers
     For good Polonius' death, and we have done but greenly
     In hugger-mugger to inter him; Poor Ophelia
     Divided from herself and her fair-judgment,
     Without the which we are Pictures or mere beasts;
     Last, and as such containing as all these,
     Her brother is in secret come from France;
     And wants not buzzers to infect his ear
     Feeds on his wonder, keep, himself in clouds,
     With pestilent speeches of his father's death,
     Wherein necessity, of matter beggar'd,
     Will nothing stick Our person to arraign
     In ear and ear. O my dear Gertrude, this,
     Like to a murd'ring piece, in many places
     Give, me superfluous death.                  A noise within.
   Queen. Alack, what noise is this?
   King. Where are my Switzers? Let them guard the door.
 
                      Enter a Messenger.
 
     What is the matter?
   Mess. Save Yourself, my lord:
     The ocean, overpeering of his list,
     Eats not the flats with more impetuous haste
     Than Young Laertes, in a riotous head,
     O'erbears Your offices. The rabble call him lord;
     And, as the world were now but to begin,
     Antiquity forgot, custom not known,
     The ratifiers and props of every word,
     They cry 'Choose we! Laertes shall be king!'
     Caps, hands, and tongues applaud it to the clouds,
     'Laertes shall be king! Laertes king!'
                                                  A noise within.
   Queen. How cheerfully on the false trail they cry!
     O, this is counter, you false Danish dogs!
   King. The doors are broke.
 
                     Enter Laertes with others.
 
   Laer. Where is this king?- Sirs, staid you all without.
   All. No, let's come in!
   Laer. I pray you give me leave.
   All. We will, we will!
   Laer. I thank you. Keep the door.      [Exeunt his Followers.]
     O thou vile king,
     Give me my father!
   Queen. Calmly, good Laertes.
   Laer. That drop of blood that's calm proclaims me bastard;
--**--**--
     I could not but by her. The other motive
     Why to a public count I might not go
     Is the great love the general gender bear him,
     Who, dipping all his faults in their affection,
     Would, like the spring that turneth wood to stone,
     Convert his gives to graces; so that my arrows,
     Too slightly timber'd for so loud a wind,
     Would have reverted to my bow again,
     And not where I had aim'd them.
   Laer. And so have I a noble father lost;
     A sister driven into desp'rate terms,
     Whose worth, if praises may go back again,
     Stood challenger on mount of all the age
     For her perfections. But my revenge will come.
   King. Break not your sleeps for that. You must not think
     That we are made of stuff so flat and dull
     That we can let our beard be shook with danger,
     And think it pastime. You shortly shall hear more.
     I lov'd your father, and we love ourself,
     And that, I hope, will teach you to imagine-
 
                  Enter a Messenger with letters.
 
     How now? What news?
   Mess. Letters, my lord, from Hamlet:
     This to your Majesty; this to the Queen.
   King. From Hamlet? Who brought them?
   Mess. Sailors, my lord, they say; I saw them not.
     They were given me by Claudio; he receiv'd them
     Of him that brought them.
   King. Laertes, you shall hear them.
     Leave us.
                                                  Exit Messenger.
     [Reads]'High and Mighty,-You shall know I am set naked on your
     kingdom. To-morrow shall I beg leave to see your kingly eyes;
     when I shall (first asking your pardon thereunto) recount the
     occasion of my sudden and more strange return.
                                                      'HAMLET.'
     What should this mean? Are all the rest come back?
     Or is it some abuse, and no such thing?
   Laer. Know you the hand?
--**--**--
   Other. Why, 'tis found so.
   Clown. It must be se offendendo; it cannot be else. For here lies
     the point: if I drown myself wittingly, it argues an act; and an
     act hath three branches-it is to act, to do, and to perform;
     argal, she drown'd herself wittingly.
   Other. Nay, but hear you, Goodman Delver!
   Clown. Give me leave. Here lies the water; good. Here stands the
     man; good. If the man go to this water and drown himself, it is,
     will he nill he, he goes- mark you that. But if the water come to
     him and drown him, he drowns not himself. Argal, he that is not
     guilty of his own death shortens not his own life.
   Other. But is this law?
   Clown. Ay, marry, is't- crowner's quest law.
   Other. Will you ha' the truth an't? If this had not been a
     gentlewoman, she should have been buried out o' Christian burial.
   Clown. Why, there thou say'st! And the more pity that great folk
     should have count'nance in this world to drown or hang themselves
     more than their even-Christen. Come, my spade! There is no
     ancient gentlemen but gard'ners, ditchers, and grave-makers. They
     hold up Adam's profession.
   Other. Was he a gentleman?
   Clown. 'A was the first that ever bore arms.
   Other. Why, he had none.
   Clown. What, art a heathen? How dost thou understand the Scripture?
     The Scripture says Adam digg'd. Could he dig without arms? I'll
     put another question to thee. If thou answerest me not to the
     purpose, confess thyself-
   Other. Go to!
   Clown. What is he that builds stronger than either the mason, the
     shipwright, or the carpenter?
   Other. The gallows-maker; for that frame outlives a thousand
     tenants.
   Clown. I like thy wit well, in good faith. The gallows does well.
     But how does it well? It does well to those that do ill. Now,
--**--**--
     in my imagination it is! My gorge rises at it. Here hung those
     lips that I have kiss'd I know not how oft. Where be your gibes
     now? your gambols? your songs? your flashes of merriment that
     were wont to set the table on a roar? Not one now, to mock your
     own grinning? Quite chap- fall'n? Now get you to my lady's
     chamber, and tell her, let her paint an inch thick, to this
     favour she must come. Make her laugh at that. Prithee, Horatio,
     tell me one thing.
   Hor. What's that, my lord?
   Ham. Dost thou think Alexander look'd o' this fashion i' th' earth?
   Hor. E'en so.
   Ham. And smelt so? Pah!
                                           [Puts down the skull.]
   Hor. E'en so, my lord.
   Ham. To what base uses we may return, Horatio! Why may not
     imagination trace the noble dust of Alexander till he find it
     stopping a bunghole?
   Hor. 'Twere to consider too curiously, to consider so.
   Ham. No, faith, not a jot; but to follow him thither with modesty
     enough, and likelihood to lead it; as thus: Alexander died,
     Alexander was buried, Alexander returneth into dust; the dust is
     earth; of earth we make loam; and why of that loam (whereto he
     was converted) might they not stop a beer barrel?
     Imperious Caesar, dead and turn'd to clay,
     Might stop a hole to keep the wind away.
     O, that that earth which kept the world in awe
     Should patch a wall t' expel the winter's flaw!
     But soft! but soft! aside! Here comes the King-
 
     Enter [priests with] a coffin [in funeral procession], King,
              Queen, Laertes, with Lords attendant.]
 
     The Queen, the courtiers. Who is this they follow?
     And with such maimed rites? This doth betoken
     The corse they follow did with desp'rate hand
     Fordo it own life. 'Twas of some estate.
--**--**--
     or calendar of gentry; for you shall find in him the continent of
     what part a gentleman would see.
   Ham. Sir, his definement suffers no perdition in you; though, I
     know, to divide him inventorially would dozy th' arithmetic of
     memory, and yet but yaw neither in respect of his quick sail.
     But, in the verity of extolment, I take him to be a soul of great
     article, and his infusion of such dearth and rareness as, to make
     true diction of him, his semblable is his mirror, and who else
     would trace him, his umbrage, nothing more.
   Osr. Your lordship speaks most infallibly of him.
   Ham. The concernancy, sir? Why do we wrap the gentleman in our more
     rawer breath
   Osr. Sir?
   Hor [aside to Hamlet] Is't not possible to understand in another
     tongue? You will do't, sir, really.
   Ham. What imports the nomination of this gentleman
   Osr. Of Laertes?
   Hor. [aside] His purse is empty already. All's golden words are
     spent.
   Ham. Of him, sir.
   Osr. I know you are not ignorant-
   Ham. I would you did, sir; yet, in faith, if you did, it would not
     much approve me. Well, sir?
   Osr. You are not ignorant of what excellence Laertes is-
   Ham. I dare not confess that, lest I should compare with him in
     excellence; but to know a man well were to know himself.
   Osr. I mean, sir, for his weapon; but in the imputation laid on him
     by them, in his meed he's unfellowed.
   Ham. What's his weapon?
   Osr. Rapier and dagger.
   Ham. That's two of his weapons- but well.
   Osr. The King, sir, hath wager'd with him six Barbary horses;
     against the which he has impon'd, as I take it, six French
     rapiers and poniards, with their assigns, as girdle, hangers, and
     so. Three of the carriages, in faith, are very dear to fancy,
--**--**--
     To the unsatisfied.
   Hor. Never believe it.
     I am more an antique Roman than a Dane.
     Here's yet some liquor left.
   Ham. As th'art a man,
     Give me the cup. Let go! By heaven, I'll ha't.
     O good Horatio, what a wounded name
     (Things standing thus unknown) shall live behind me!
     If thou didst ever hold me in thy heart,
     Absent thee from felicity awhile,
     And in this harsh world draw thy breath in pain,
     To tell my story.         [March afar off, and shot within.]
     What warlike noise is this?
   Osr. Young Fortinbras, with conquest come from Poland,
     To the ambassadors of England gives
     This warlike volley.
   Ham. O, I die, Horatio!
     The potent poison quite o'ercrows my spirit.
     I cannot live to hear the news from England,
     But I do prophesy th' election lights
     On Fortinbras. He has my dying voice.
     So tell him, with th' occurrents, more and less,
     Which have solicited- the rest is silence.             Dies.
   Hor. Now cracks a noble heart. Good night, sweet prince,
     And flights of angels sing thee to thy rest!
                                                  [March within.]
     Why does the drum come hither?
 
     Enter Fortinbras and English Ambassadors, with Drum,
                   Colours, and Attendants.
 
   Fort. Where is this sight?
   Hor. What is it you will see?
     If aught of woe or wonder, cease your search.
   Fort. This quarry cries on havoc. O proud Death,
     What feast is toward in thine eternal cell
     That thou so many princes at a shot
     So bloodily hast struck.
   Ambassador. The sight is dismal;
     And our affairs from England come too late.
     The ears are senseless that should give us bearing
     To tell him his commandment is fulfill'd
     That Rosencrantz and Guildenstern are dead.
     Where should We have our thanks?
   Hor. Not from his mouth,
     Had it th' ability of life to thank you.
--**--**--
 THE FIRST PART OF KING HENRY THE FOURTH
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Dramatis Personae
 
   King Henry the Fourth.
   Henry, Prince of Wales, son to the King.
   Prince John of Lancaster, son to the King.
   Earl of Westmoreland.
   Sir Walter Blunt.
   Thomas Percy, Earl of Worcester.
   Henry Percy, Earl of Northumberland.
   Henry Percy, surnamed Hotspur, his son.
   Edmund Mortimer, Earl of March.
   Richard Scroop, Archbishop of York.
   Archibald, Earl of Douglas.
   Owen Glendower.
   Sir Richard Vernon.
   Sir John Falstaff.
   Sir Michael, a friend to the Archbishop of York.
   Poins.
   Gadshill
   Peto.
   Bardolph.
 
   Lady Percy, wife to Hotspur, and sister to Mortimer.
   Lady Mortimer, daughter to Glendower, and wife to Mortimer.
   Mistress Quickly, hostess of the Boar's Head in Eastcheap.
 
   Lords, Officers, Sheriff, Vintner, Chamberlain, Drawers, two
     Carriers, Travellers, and Attendants.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE.--England and Wales.
 
 
 ACT I. Scene I.
 London. The Palace.
 
 Enter the King, Lord John of Lancaster, Earl of Westmoreland,
 [Sir Walter Blunt,] with others.
 
   King. So shaken as we are, so wan with care,
     Find we a time for frighted peace to pant
     And breathe short-winded accents of new broils
     To be commenc'd in stronds afar remote.
     No more the thirsty entrance of this soil
     Shall daub her lips with her own children's blood.
     No more shall trenching war channel her fields,
     Nor Bruise her flow'rets with the armed hoofs
     Of hostile paces. Those opposed eyes
     Which, like the meteors of a troubled heaven,
     All of one nature, of one substance bred,
     Did lately meet in the intestine shock
     And furious close of civil butchery,
     Shall now in mutual well-beseeming ranks
     March all one way and be no more oppos'd
     Against acquaintance, kindred, and allies.
     The edge of war, like an ill-sheathed knife,
     No more shall cut his master. Therefore, friends,
     As far as to the sepulchre of Christ-
     Whose soldier now, under whose blessed cross
--**--**--
   Prince. Thou sayest well, and it holds well too; for the fortune of
     us that are the moon's men doth ebb and flow like the sea, being
     governed, as the sea is, by the moon. As, for proof now: a purse
     of gold most resolutely snatch'd on Monday night and most
     dissolutely spent on Tuesday morning; got with swearing 'Lay by,'
     and spent with crying 'Bring in'; now ill as low an ebb as the
     foot of the ladder, and by-and-by in as high a flow as the ridge
     of the gallows.
   Fal. By the Lord, thou say'st true, lad- and is not my hostess of
     the tavern a most sweet wench?
   Prince. As the honey of Hybla, my old lad of the castle- and is not
     a buff jerkin a most sweet robe of durance?
   Fal. How now, how now, mad wag? What, in thy quips and thy
     quiddities? What a plague have I to do with a buff jerkin?
   Prince. Why, what a pox have I to do with my hostess of the tavern?
   Fal. Well, thou hast call'd her to a reckoning many a time and oft.
   Prince. Did I ever call for thee to pay thy part?
   Fal. No; I'll give thee thy due, thou hast paid all there.
   Prince. Yea, and elsewhere, so far as my coin would stretch; and
     where it would not, I have used my credit.
   Fal. Yea, and so us'd it that, were it not here apparent that thou
     art heir apparent- But I prithee, sweet wag, shall there be
     gallows standing in England when thou art king? and resolution
     thus fubb'd as it is with the rusty curb of old father antic the
     law? Do not thou, when thou art king, hang a thief.
   Prince. No; thou shalt.
   Fal. Shall I? O rare! By the Lord, I'll be a brave judge.
--**--**--
     And when I urg'd the ransom once again
     Of my wive's brother, then his cheek look'd pale,
     And on my face he turn'd an eye of death,
     Trembling even at the name of Mortimer.
   Wor. I cannot blame him. Was not he proclaim'd
     By Richard that dead is, the next of blood?
   North. He was; I heard the proclamation.
     And then it was when the unhappy King
     (Whose wrongs in us God pardon!) did set forth
     Upon his Irish expedition;
     From whence he intercepted did return
     To be depos'd, and shortly murdered.
   Wor. And for whose death we in the world's wide mouth
     Live scandaliz'd and foully spoken of.
   Hot. But soft, I pray you. Did King Richard then
     Proclaim my brother Edmund Mortimer
     Heir to the crown?
   North. He did; myself did hear it.
   Hot. Nay, then I cannot blame his cousin king,
     That wish'd him on the barren mountains starve.
     But shall it be that you, that set the crown
     Upon the head of this forgetful man,
     And for his sake wear the detested blot
     Of murtherous subornation- shall it be
     That you a world of curses undergo,
     Being the agents or base second means,
     The cords, the ladder, or the hangman rather?
     O, pardon me that I descend so low
     To show the line and the predicament
     Wherein you range under this subtile king!
     Shall it for shame be spoken in these days,
     Or fill up chronicles in time to come,
     That men of your nobility and power
     Did gage them both in an unjust behalf
     (As both of you, God pardon it! have done)
     To put down Richard, that sweet lovely rose,
     And plant this thorn, this canker, Bolingbroke?
     And shall it in more shame be further spoken
     That you are fool'd, discarded, and shook off
--**--**--
     King's coming down the hill; 'tis going to the King's exchequer.
   Fal. You lie, ye rogue! 'Tis going to the King's tavern.
   Gads. There's enough to make us all.
   Fal. To be hang'd.
   Prince. Sirs, you four shall front them in the narrow lane; Ned
     Poins and I will walk lower. If they scape from your encounter,
     then they light on us.
   Peto. How many be there of them?
   Gads. Some eight or ten.
   Fal. Zounds, will they not rob us?
   Prince. What, a coward, Sir John Paunch?
   Fal. Indeed, I am not John of Gaunt, your grandfather; but yet no
     coward, Hal.
   Prince. Well, we leave that to the proof.
   Poins. Sirrah Jack, thy horse stands behind the hedge. When thou
     need'st him, there thou shalt find him. Farewell and stand fast.
   Fal. Now cannot I strike him, if I should be hang'd.
   Prince. [aside to Poins] Ned, where are our disguises?
   Poins. [aside to Prince] Here, hard by. Stand close.
                                       [Exeunt Prince and Poins.]
   Fal. Now, my masters, happy man be his dole, say I. Every man to
     his business.
 
                          Enter the Travellers.
 
   Traveller. Come, neighbour.
     The boy shall lead our horses down the hill;
     We'll walk afoot awhile and ease our legs.
   Thieves. Stand!
   Traveller. Jesus bless us!
   Fal. Strike! down with them! cut the villains' throats! Ah,
     whoreson caterpillars! bacon-fed knaves! they hate us youth. Down
     with them! fleece them!
   Traveller. O, we are undone, both we and ours for ever!
   Fal. Hang ye, gorbellied knaves, are ye undone? No, ye fat chuffs;
     I would your store were here! On, bacons on! What, ye knaves!
     young men must live. You are grandjurors, are ye? We'll jure ye,
     faith!
                             Here they rob and bind them. Exeunt.
 
             Enter the Prince and Poins [in buckram suits].
 
   Prince. The thieves have bound the true men. Now could thou and I
--**--**--
   Poins. [within] Francis!
   Fran. Anon, sir. Pray stay a little, my lord.
   Prince. Nay, but hark you, Francis. For the sugar thou gavest me-
     'twas a pennyworth, wast not?
   Fran. O Lord! I would it had been two!
   Prince. I will give thee for it a thousand pound. Ask me when thou
     wilt, and, thou shalt have it.
   Poins. [within] Francis!
   Fran. Anon, anon.
   Prince. Anon, Francis? No, Francis; but to-morrow, Francis; or,
     Francis, a Thursday; or indeed, Francis, when thou wilt. But
     Francis-
   Fran. My lord?
   Prince. Wilt thou rob this leathern-jerkin, crystal-button,
     not-pated, agate-ring, puke-stocking, caddis-garter,
     smooth-tongue, Spanish-pouch-
   Fran. O Lord, sir, who do you mean?
   Prince. Why then, your brown bastard is your only drink; for look
     you, Francis, your white canvas doublet will sully. In Barbary,
     sir, it cannot come to so much.
   Fran. What, sir?
   Poins. [within] Francis!
   Prince. Away, you rogue! Dost thou not hear them call?
               Here they both call him. The Drawer stands amazed,
                                     not knowing which way to go.
 
                          Enter Vintner.
 
   Vint. What, stand'st thou still, and hear'st such a calling? Look
     to the guests within. [Exit Francis.] My lord, old Sir John, with
     half-a-dozen more, are at the door. Shall I let them in?
   Prince. Let them alone awhile, and then open the door.
                                                   [Exit Vintner.]
     Poins!
   Poins. [within] Anon, anon, sir.
 
                           Enter Poins.
 
   Prince. Sirrah, Falstaff and the rest of the thieves are at the
     door. Shall we be merry?
   Poins. As merry as crickets, my lad. But hark ye; what cunning
     match have you made with this jest of the drawer? Come, what's
     the issue?
   Prince. I am now of all humours that have showed themselves humours
     since the old days of goodman Adam to the pupil age of this
     present this twelve o'clock at midnight.
 
                          [Enter Francis.]
--**--**--
   Host. Marry, my lord, there is a nobleman of the court at door
     would speak with you. He says he comes from your father.
   Prince. Give him as much as will make him a royal man, and send him
     back again to my mother.
   Fal. What manner of man is he?
   Host. An old man.
   Fal. What doth gravity out of his bed at midnight? Shall I give him
     his answer?
   Prince. Prithee do, Jack.
   Fal. Faith, and I'll send him packing.
 Exit.
   Prince. Now, sirs. By'r Lady, you fought fair; so did you, Peto; so
     did you, Bardolph. You are lions too, you ran away upon instinct,
     you will not touch the true prince; no- fie!
   Bard. Faith, I ran when I saw others run.
   Prince. Tell me now in earnest, how came Falstaff's sword so
     hack'd?
   Peto. Why, he hack'd it with his dagger, and said he would swear
     truth out of England but he would make you believe it was done in
     fight, and persuaded us to do the like.
   Bard. Yea, and to tickle our noses with speargrass to make them
     bleed, and then to beslubber our garments with it and swear it
     was the blood of true men. I did that I did not this seven year
     before- I blush'd to hear his monstrous devices.
   Prince. O villain! thou stolest a cup of sack eighteen years ago
     and wert taken with the manner, and ever since thou hast blush'd
     extempore. Thou hadst fire and sword on thy side, and yet thou
     ran'st away. What instinct hadst thou for it?
   Bard. My lord, do you see these meteors? Do you behold these
     exhalations?
   Prince. I do.
   Bard. What think you they portend?
   Prince. Hot livers and cold purses.
   Bard. Choler, my lord, if rightly taken.
--**--**--
     Within her womb, which, for enlargement striving,
     Shakes the old beldame earth and topples down
     Steeples and mossgrown towers. At your birth
     Our grandam earth, having this distemp'rature,
     In passion shook.
   Glend. Cousin, of many men
     I do not bear these crossings. Give me leave
     To tell you once again that at my birth
     The front of heaven was full of fiery shapes,
     The goats ran from the mountains, and the herds
     Were strangely clamorous to the frighted fields.
     These signs have mark'd me extraordinary,
     And all the courses of my life do show
     I am not in the roll of common men.
     Where is he living, clipp'd in with the sea
     That chides the banks of England, Scotland, Wales,
     Which calls me pupil or hath read to me?
     And bring him out that is but woman's son
     Can trace me in the tedious ways of art
     And hold me pace in deep experiments.
   Hot. I think there's no man speaks better Welsh. I'll to dinner.
   Mort. Peace, cousin Percy; you will make him mad.
   Glend. I can call spirits from the vasty deep.
   Hot. Why, so can I, or so can any man;
     But will they come when you do call for them?
   Glend. Why, I can teach you, cousin, to command the devil.
   Hot. And I can teach thee, coz, to shame the devil-
     By telling truth. Tell truth and shame the devil.
     If thou have power to raise him, bring him hither,
     And I'll be sworn I have power to shame him hence.
     O, while you live, tell truth and shame the devil!
   Mort. Come, come, no more of this unprofitable chat.
   Glend. Three times hath Henry Bolingbroke made head
     Against my power; thrice from the banks of Wye
     And sandy-bottom'd Severn have I sent him
--**--**--
     For we shall presently have need of you.
                                                    Exeunt Lords.
     I know not whether God will have it so,
     For some displeasing service I have done,
     That, in his secret doom, out of my blood
     He'll breed revengement and a scourge for me;
     But thou dost in thy passages of life
     Make me believe that thou art only mark'd
     For the hot vengeance and the rod of heaven
     To punish my mistreadings. Tell me else,
     Could such inordinate and low desires,
     Such poor, such bare, such lewd, such mean attempts,
     Such barren pleasures, rude society,
     As thou art match'd withal and grafted to,
     Accompany the greatness of thy blood
     And hold their level with thy princely heart?
   Prince. So please your Majesty, I would I could
     Quit all offences with as clear excuse
     As well as I am doubtless I can purge
     Myself of many I am charged withal.
     Yet such extenuation let me beg
     As, in reproof of many tales devis'd,
     Which oft the ear of greatness needs must bear
     By, smiling pickthanks and base newsmongers,
     I may, for some things true wherein my youth
     Hath faulty wand'red and irregular,
     And pardon on lily true submission.
   King. God pardon thee! Yet let me wonder, Harry,
     At thy affections, which do hold a wing,
     Quite from the flight of all thy ancestors.
     Thy place in Council thou hast rudely lost,
     Which by thy younger brother is supplied,
     And art almost an alien to the hearts
     Of all the court and princes of my blood.
     The hope and expectation of thy time
     Is ruin'd, and the soul of every man
     Prophetically do forethink thy fall.
     Had I so lavish of my presence been,
     So common-hackney'd in the eyes of men,
     So stale and cheap to vulgar company,
     Opinion, that did help me to the crown,
--**--**--
     -Still?- Nay, prithee be gone. [Exit Hostess.] Now, Hal, to the
     news at court. For the robbery, lad- how is that answered?
   Prince. O my sweet beef, I must still be good angel to thee.
     The money is paid back again.
   Fal. O, I do not like that paying back! 'Tis a double labour.
   Prince. I am good friends with my father, and may do anything.
   Fal. Rob me the exchequer the first thing thou doest, and do it
     with unwash'd hands too.
   Bard. Do, my lord.
   Prince. I have procured thee, Jack, a charge of foot.
   Fal. I would it had been of horse. Where shall I find one that can
     steal well? O for a fine thief of the age of two-and-twenty or
     thereabouts! I am heinously unprovided. Well, God be thanked for
     these rebels. They offend none but the virtuous. I laud them, I
     praise them.
   Prince. Bardolph!
   Bard. My lord?
   Prince. Go bear this letter to Lord John of Lancaster,
     To my brother John; this to my Lord of Westmoreland.
                                                 [Exit Bardolph.]
     Go, Poins, to horse, to horse; for thou and I
     Have thirty miles to ride yet ere dinner time.
                                                    [Exit Poins.]
     Jack, meet me to-morrow in the Temple Hall
     At two o'clock in the afternoon.
     There shalt thou know thy charge. and there receive
     Money and order for their furniture.
     The land is burning; Percy stands on high;
     And either they or we must lower lie.                [Exit.]
   Fal. Rare words! brave world! Hostess, my breakfast, come.
     O, I could wish this tavern were my drum!
 Exit.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV. Scene I.
 The rebel camp near Shrewsbury.
 
 Enter Harry Hotspur, Worcester, and Douglas.
 
   Hot. Well said, my noble Scot. If speaking truth
     In this fine age were not thought flattery,
     Such attribution should the Douglas have
--**--**--
     press'd the dead bodies. No eye hath seen such scarecrows. I'll
     not march through Coventry with them, that's flat. Nay, and the
     villains march wide betwixt the legs, as if they had gyves on;
     for indeed I had the most of them out of prison. There's but a
     shirt and a half in all my company; and the half-shirt is two
     napkins tack'd together and thrown over the shoulders like a
     herald's coat without sleeves; and the shirt, to say the truth,
     stol'n from my host at Saint Alban's, or the red-nose innkeeper
     of Daventry. But that's all one; they'll find linen enough on
     every hedge.
 
               Enter the Prince and the Lord of Westmoreland.
 
   Prince. How now, blown Jack? How now, quilt?
   Fal. What, Hal? How now, mad wag? What a devil dost thou in
     Warwickshire? My good Lord of Westmoreland, I cry you mercy. I
     thought your honour had already been at Shrewsbury.
   West. Faith, Sir John, 'tis more than time that I were there, and
     you too; but my powers are there already. The King, I can tell
     you, looks for us all. We must away all, to-night.
   Fal. Tut, never fear me. I am as vigilant as a cat to steal cream.
   Prince. I think, to steal cream indeed, for thy theft hath already
     made thee butter. But tell me, Jack, whose fellows are these that
     come after?
   Fal. Mine, Hal, mine.
   Prince. I did never see such pitiful rascals.
   Fal. Tut, tut! good enough to toss; food for powder, food for
     powder. They'll fill a pit as well as better. Tush, man, mortal
     men, mortal men.
   West. Ay, but, Sir John, methinks they are exceeding poor and bare-
     too beggarly.
   Fal. Faith, for their poverty, I know, not where they had that; and
     for their bareness, I am surd they never learn'd that of me.
--**--**--
   Hot. Not so, Sir Walter. We'll withdraw awhile.
     Go to the King; and let there be impawn'd
     Some surety for a safe return again,
     And In the morning early shall mine uncle
     Bring him our purposes; and so farewell.
   Blunt. I would you would accept of grace and love.
   Hot. And may be so we shall.
   Blunt. Pray God you do.
                                                          Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 Scene IV.
 York. The Archbishop's Palace.
 
 Enter the Archbishop of York and Sir Michael.
 
   Arch. Hie, good Sir Michael; bear this sealed brief
     With winged haste to the Lord Marshal;
     This to my cousin Scroop; and all the rest
     To whom they are directed. If you knew
     How much they do import, you would make haste.
   Sir M. My good lord,
     I guess their tenour.
   Arch. Like enough you do.
     To-morrow, good Sir Michael, is a day
     Wherein the fortune of ten thousand men
     Must bide the touch; for, sir, at Shrewsbury,
     As I am truly given to understand,
     The King with mighty and quick-raised power
     Meets with Lord Harry; and I fear, Sir Michael,
     What with the sickness of Northumberland,
     Whose power was in the first proportion,
     And what with Owen Glendower's absence thence,
     Who with them was a rated sinew too
     And comes not in, overrul'd by prophecies-
     I fear the power of Percy is too weak
     To wage an instant trial with the King.
   Sir M. Why, my good lord, you need not fear;
     There is Douglas and Lord Mortimer.
   Arch. No, Mortimer is not there.
   Sir M. But there is Mordake, Vernon, Lord Harry Percy,
     And there is my Lord of Worcester, and a head
     Of gallant warriors, noble gentlemen.
   Arch. And so there is; but yet the King hath drawn
     The special head of all the land together-
     The Prince of Wales, Lord John of Lancaster,
--**--**--
   Wor. The King will bid you battle presently.
   Doug. Defy him by the Lord Of Westmoreland.
   Hot. Lord Douglas, go you and tell him so.
   Doug. Marry, and shall, and very willingly.
 Exit.
   Wor. There is no seeming mercy in the King.
   Hot. Did you beg any, God forbid!
   Wor. I told him gently of our grievances,
     Of his oath-breaking; which he mended thus,
     By now forswearing that he is forsworn.
     He calls us rebels, traitors, aid will scourge
     With haughty arms this hateful name in us.
 
                        Enter Douglas.
 
   Doug. Arm, gentlemen! to arms! for I have thrown
     A brave defiance in King Henry's teeth,
     And Westmoreland, that was engag'd, did bear it;
     Which cannot choose but bring him quickly on.
   Wor. The Prince of Wales stepp'd forth before the King
     And, nephew, challeng'd you to single fight.
   Hot. O, would the quarrel lay upon our heads,
     And that no man might draw short breath to-day
     But I and Harry Monmouth! Tell me, tell me,
     How show'd his tasking? Seem'd it in contempt?
     No, by my soul. I never in my life
     Did hear a challenge urg'd more modestly,
     Unless a brother should a brother dare
     To gentle exercise and proof of arms.
     He gave you all the duties of a man;
     Trimm'd up your praises with a princely tongue;
     Spoke your deservings like a chronicle;
     Making you ever better than his praise
     By still dispraising praise valued with you;
     And, which became him like a prince indeed,
     He made a blushing cital of himself,
     And chid his truant youth with such a grace
     As if lie mast'red there a double spirit
     Of teaching and of learning instantly.
     There did he pause; but let me tell the world,
     If he outlive the envy of this day,
     England did never owe so sweet a hope,
--**--**--
   Fal. O Hal, I prithee give me leave to breathe awhile. Turk Gregory
     never did such deeds in arms as I have done this day. I have paid
     Percy; I have made him sure.
   Prince. He is indeed, and living to kill thee.
     I prithee lend me thy sword.
   Fal. Nay, before God, Hal, if Percy be alive, thou get'st not my
     sword; but take my pistol, if thou wilt.
   Prince. Give it me. What, is it in the case?
   Fal. Ay, Hal. 'Tis hot, 'tis hot. There's that will sack a city.
 
     The Prince draws it out and finds it to he a bottle of sack.
 
     What, is it a time to jest and dally now?
                               He throws the bottle at him. Exit.
   Fal. Well, if Percy be alive, I'll pierce him. If he do come in my
     way, so; if he do not, if I come in his willingly, let him make a
     carbonado of me. I like not such grinning honour as Sir Walter
     hath. Give me life; which if I can save, so; if not, honour comes
     unlook'd for, and there's an end.                      Exit.
 
 
 
 
 Scene IV.
 Another part of the field.
 
 Alarum. Excursions. Enter the King, the Prince, Lord John of Lancaster,
 Earl of Westmoreland
 
   King. I prithee,
     Harry, withdraw thyself; thou bleedest too much.
     Lord John of Lancaster, go you unto him.
   John. Not I, my lord, unless I did bleed too.
   Prince. I do beseech your Majesty make up,
     Lest Your retirement do amaze your friends.
   King. I will do so.
     My Lord of Westmoreland, lead him to his tent.
   West. Come, my lord, I'll lead you to your tent.
   Prince. Lead me, my lord, I do not need your help;
     And God forbid a shallow scratch should drive
     The Prince of Wales from such a field as this,
--**--**--
   King. Stay and breathe awhile.
     Thou hast redeem'd thy lost opinion,
     And show'd thou mak'st some tender of my life,
     In this fair rescue thou hast brought to me.
   Prince. O God! they did me too much injury
     That ever said I heark'ned for your death.
     If it were so, I might have let alone
     The insulting hand of Douglas over you,
     Which would have been as speedy in your end
     As all the poisonous potions in the world,
     And sav'd the treacherous labour of your son.
   King. Make up to Clifton; I'll to Sir Nicholas Gawsey.
 Exit.
 
                       Enter Hotspur.
 
   Hot. If I mistake not, thou art Harry Monmouth.
   Prince. Thou speak'st as if I would deny my name.
   Hot. My name is Harry Percy.
   Prince. Why, then I see
     A very valiant rebel of the name.
     I am the Prince of Wales; and think not, Percy,
     To share with me in glory any more.
     Two stars keep not their motion in one sphere,
     Nor can one England brook a double reign
     Of Harry Percy and the Prince of Wales.
   Hot. Nor shall it, Harry; for the hour is come
     To end the one of us and would to God
     Thy name in arms were now as great as mine!
   Prince. I'll make it greater ere I part from thee,
     And all the budding honours on thy crest
     I'll crop to make a garland for my head.
   Hot. I can no longer brook thy vanities.
                                                      They fight.
 
                       Enter Falstaff.
 
   Fal. Well said, Hal! to it, Hal! Nay, you shall find no boy's play
     here, I can tell you.
 
    Enter Douglas. He fighteth with Falstaff, who falls down as if
       he were dead. [Exit Douglas.] The Prince killeth Percy.
 
   Hot. O Harry, thou hast robb'd me of my youth!
     I better brook the loss of brittle life
--**--**--
     grant you I was down, and out of breath, and so was he; but we
     rose both at an instant and fought a long hour by Shrewsbury
     clock. If I may be believ'd, so; if not, let them that should
     reward valour bear the sin upon their own heads. I'll take it
     upon my death, I gave him this wound in the thigh. If the man
     were alive and would deny it, zounds! I would make him eat a
     piece of my sword.
   John. This is the strangest tale that ever I beard.
   Prince. This is the strangest fellow, brother John.
     Come, bring your luggage nobly on your back.
     For my part, if a lie may do thee grace,
     I'll gild it with the happiest terms I have.
                                            A retreat is sounded.
     The trumpet sounds retreat; the day is ours.
     Come, brother, let's to the highest of the field,
     To see what friends are living, who are dead.
                           Exeunt [Prince Henry and Prince John].
   Fal. I'll follow, as they say, for reward. He that rewards me, God
     reward him! If I do grow great, I'll grow less; for I'll purge,
     and leave sack, and live cleanly, as a nobleman should do.
                                     Exit [bearing off the body].
 
 
 
 
 Scene V.
 Another part of the field.
 
 The trumpets sound. [Enter the King, Prince of Wales, Lord John of Lancaster,
 Earl of Westmoreland, with Worcester and Vernon prisoners.
 
   King. Thus ever did rebellion find rebuke.
     Ill-spirited Worcester! did not we send grace,
     Pardon, and terms of love to all of you?
     And wouldst thou turn our offers contrary?
     Misuse the tenour of thy kinsman's trust?
     Three knights upon our party slain to-day,
     A noble earl, and many a creature else
     Had been alive this hour,
     If like a Christian thou hadst truly borne
--**--**--
     To speak so true at first? My office is
     To noise abroad that Harry Monmouth fell
     Under the wrath of noble Hotspur's sword,
     And that the King before the Douglas' rage
     Stoop'd his anointed head as low as death.
     This have I rumour'd through the peasant towns
     Between that royal field of Shrewsbury
     And this worm-eaten hold of ragged stone,
     Where Hotspur's father, old Northumberland,
     Lies crafty-sick. The posts come tiring on,
     And not a man of them brings other news
     Than they have learnt of me. From Rumour's tongues
     They bring smooth comforts false, worse than true wrongs.
  Exit
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 Warkworth. Before NORTHUMBERLAND'S Castle
 
 Enter LORD BARDOLPH
 
   LORD BARDOLPH. Who keeps the gate here, ho?
 
                    The PORTER opens the gate
 
     Where is the Earl?
   PORTER. What shall I say you are?
   LORD BARDOLPH. Tell thou the Earl
     That the Lord Bardolph doth attend him here.
   PORTER. His lordship is walk'd forth into the orchard.
     Please it your honour knock but at the gate,
     And he himself will answer.
 
                       Enter NORTHUMBERLAND
 
   LORD BARDOLPH. Here comes the Earl.                Exit PORTER
   NORTHUMBERLAND. What news, Lord Bardolph? Every minute now
     Should be the father of some stratagem.
     The times are wild; contention, like a horse
     Full of high feeding, madly hath broke loose
     And bears down all before him.
   LORD BARDOLPH. Noble Earl,
     I bring you certain news from Shrewsbury.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. Good, an God will!
   LORD BARDOLPH. As good as heart can wish.
     The King is almost wounded to the death;
     And, in the fortune of my lord your son,
     Prince Harry slain outright; and both the Blunts
     Kill'd by the hand of Douglas; young Prince John,
     And Westmoreland, and Stafford, fled the field;
     And Harry Monmouth's brawn, the hulk Sir John,
     Is prisoner to your son. O, such a day,
--**--**--
     From whence with life he never more sprung up.
     In few, his death- whose spirit lent a fire
     Even to the dullest peasant in his camp-
     Being bruited once, took fire and heat away
     From the best-temper'd courage in his troops;
     For from his metal was his party steeled;
     Which once in him abated, an the rest
     Turn'd on themselves, like dull and heavy lead.
     And as the thing that's heavy in itself
     Upon enforcement flies with greatest speed,
     So did our men, heavy in Hotspur's loss,
     Lend to this weight such lightness with their fear
     That arrows fled not swifter toward their aim
     Than did our soldiers, aiming at their safety,
     Fly from the field. Then was that noble Worcester
     Too soon ta'en prisoner; and that furious Scot,
     The bloody Douglas, whose well-labouring sword
     Had three times slain th' appearance of the King,
     Gan vail his stomach and did grace the shame
     Of those that turn'd their backs, and in his flight,
     Stumbling in fear, was took. The sum of all
     Is that the King hath won, and hath sent out
     A speedy power to encounter you, my lord,
     Under the conduct of young Lancaster
     And Westmoreland. This is the news at full.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. For this I shall have time enough to mourn.
     In poison there is physic; and these news,
     Having been well, that would have made me sick,
     Being sick, have in some measure made me well;
     And as the wretch whose fever-weak'ned joints,
     Like strengthless hinges, buckle under life,
     Impatient of his fit, breaks like a fire
     Out of his keeper's arms, even so my limbs,
     Weak'ned with grief, being now enrag'd with grief,
     Are thrice themselves. Hence, therefore, thou nice crutch!
     A scaly gauntlet now with joints of steel
     Must glove this hand; and hence, thou sickly coif!
--**--**--
     it worse than the name of rebellion can tell how to make it.
   SERVANT. You mistake me, sir.
   FALSTAFF. Why, sir, did I say you were an honest man? Setting my
     knighthood and my soldiership aside, I had lied in my throat if I
     had said so.
   SERVANT. I pray you, sir, then set your knighthood and your
     soldiership aside; and give me leave to tell you you in your
     throat, if you say I am any other than an honest man.
   FALSTAFF. I give thee leave to tell me so! I lay aside that which
     grows to me! If thou get'st any leave of me, hang me; if thou
     tak'st leave, thou wert better be hang'd. You hunt counter.
     Hence! Avaunt!
   SERVANT. Sir, my lord would speak with you.
   CHIEF JUSTICE. Sir John Falstaff, a word with you.
   FALSTAFF. My good lord! God give your lordship good time of day. I
     am glad to see your lordship abroad. I heard say your lordship
     was sick; I hope your lordship goes abroad by advice. Your
     lordship, though not clean past your youth, hath yet some smack
     of age in you, some relish of the saltness of time; and I most
     humbly beseech your lordship to have a reverend care of your
     health.
   CHIEF JUSTICE. Sir John, I sent for you before your expedition to
     Shrewsbury.
   FALSTAFF. An't please your lordship, I hear his Majesty is return'd
     with some discomfort from Wales.
   CHIEF JUSTICE. I talk not of his Majesty. You would not come when I
     sent for you.
   FALSTAFF. And I hear, moreover, his Highness is fall'n into this
     same whoreson apoplexy.
   CHIEF JUSTICE. Well God mend him! I pray you let me speak with you.
   FALSTAFF. This apoplexy, as I take it, is a kind of lethargy, an't
--**--**--
     hot day, and I brandish anything but a bottle, I would I might
     never spit white again. There is not a dangerous action can peep
     out his head but I am thrust upon it. Well, I cannot last ever;
     but it was alway yet the trick of our English nation, if they
     have a good thing, to make it too common. If ye will needs say I
     am an old man, you should give me rest. I would to God my name
     were not so terrible to the enemy as it is. I were better to be
     eaten to death with a rust than to be scoured to nothing with
     perpetual motion.
   CHIEF JUSTICE. Well, be honest, be honest; and God bless your
     expedition!
   FALSTAFF. Will your lordship lend me a thousand pound to furnish me
     forth?
   CHIEF JUSTICE. Not a penny, not a penny; you are too impatient to
     bear crosses. Fare you well. Commend me to my cousin
     Westmoreland.
                                 Exeunt CHIEF JUSTICE and SERVANT
   FALSTAFF. If I do, fillip me with a three-man beetle. A man can no
     more separate age and covetousness than 'a can part young limbs
     and lechery; but the gout galls the one, and the pox pinches the
     other; and so both the degrees prevent my curses. Boy!
   PAGE. Sir?
   FALSTAFF. What money is in my purse?
   PAGE. Seven groats and two pence.
   FALSTAFF. I can get no remedy against this consumption of the
     purse; borrowing only lingers and lingers it out, but the disease
     is incurable. Go bear this letter to my Lord of Lancaster; this
     to the Prince; this to the Earl of Westmoreland; and this to old
     Mistress Ursula, whom I have weekly sworn to marry since I
     perceiv'd the first white hair of my chin. About it; you know
--**--**--
   ARCHBISHOP. 'Tis very true, Lord Bardolph; for indeed
     It was young Hotspur's case at Shrewsbury.
   LORD BARDOLPH. It was, my lord; who lin'd himself with hope,
     Eating the air and promise of supply,
     Flatt'ring himself in project of a power
     Much smaller than the smallest of his thoughts;
     And so, with great imagination
     Proper to madmen, led his powers to death,
     And, winking, leapt into destruction.
   HASTINGS. But, by your leave, it never yet did hurt
     To lay down likelihoods and forms of hope.
   LORD BARDOLPH. Yes, if this present quality of war-
     Indeed the instant action, a cause on foot-
     Lives so in hope, as in an early spring
     We see th' appearing buds; which to prove fruit
     Hope gives not so much warrant, as despair
     That frosts will bite them. When we mean to build,
     We first survey the plot, then draw the model;
     And when we see the figure of the house,
     Then we must rate the cost of the erection;
     Which if we find outweighs ability,
     What do we then but draw anew the model
     In fewer offices, or at least desist
     To build at all? Much more, in this great work-
     Which is almost to pluck a kingdom down
     And set another up- should we survey
     The plot of situation and the model,
     Consent upon a sure foundation,
     Question surveyors, know our own estate
     How able such a work to undergo-
     To weigh against his opposite; or else
     We fortify in paper and in figures,
     Using the names of men instead of men;
     Like one that draws the model of a house
     Beyond his power to build it; who, half through,
     Gives o'er and leaves his part-created cost
     A naked subject to the weeping clouds
     And waste for churlish winter's tyranny.
   HASTINGS. Grant that our hopes- yet likely of fair birth-
--**--**--
     thought to think so?
   POINS. Why, because you have been so lewd and so much engraffed to
     Falstaff.
   PRINCE. And to thee.
   POINS. By this light, I am well spoke on; I can hear it with mine
     own ears. The worst that they can say of me is that I am a second
     brother and that I am a proper fellow of my hands; and those two
     things, I confess, I cannot help. By the mass, here comes
     Bardolph.
 
                          Enter BARDOLPH and PAGE
 
   PRINCE. And the boy that I gave Falstaff. 'A had him from me
     Christian; and look if the fat villain have not transform'd him
     ape.
   BARDOLPH. God save your Grace!
   PRINCE. And yours, most noble Bardolph!
   POINS. Come, you virtuous ass, you bashful fool, must you be
     blushing? Wherefore blush you now? What a maidenly man-at-arms
     are you become! Is't such a matter to get a pottle-pot's
     maidenhead?
   PAGE. 'A calls me e'en now, my lord, through a red lattice, and I
     could discern no part of his face from the window. At last I
     spied his eyes; and methought he had made two holes in the
     alewife's new petticoat, and so peep'd through.
   PRINCE. Has not the boy profited?
   BARDOLPH. Away, you whoreson upright rabbit, away!
   PAGE. Away, you rascally Althaea's dream, away!
   PRINCE. Instruct us, boy; what dream, boy?
   PAGE. Marry, my lord, Althaea dreamt she was delivered of a
     firebrand; and therefore I call him her dream.
   PRINCE. A crown's worth of good interpretation. There 'tis, boy.
                                                 [Giving a crown]
   POINS. O that this blossom could be kept from cankers!
     Well, there is sixpence to preserve thee.
   BARDOLPH. An you do not make him be hang'd among you, the gallows
     shall have wrong.
   PRINCE. And how doth thy master, Bardolph?
   BARDOLPH. Well, my lord. He heard of your Grace's coming to town.
--**--**--
 
 Enter NORTHUMBERLAND, LADY NORTHUMBERLAND, and LADY PERCY
 
   NORTHUMBERLAND. I pray thee, loving wife, and gentle daughter,
     Give even way unto my rough affairs;
     Put not you on the visage of the times
     And be, like them, to Percy troublesome.
   LADY NORTHUMBERLAND. I have given over, I will speak no more.
     Do what you will; your wisdom be your guide.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. Alas, sweet wife, my honour is at pawn;
     And but my going nothing can redeem it.
   LADY PERCY. O, yet, for God's sake, go not to these wars!
     The time was, father, that you broke your word,
     When you were more endear'd to it than now;
     When your own Percy, when my heart's dear Harry,
     Threw many a northward look to see his father
     Bring up his powers; but he did long in vain.
     Who then persuaded you to stay at home?
     There were two honours lost, yours and your son's.
     For yours, the God of heaven brighten it!
     For his, it stuck upon him as the sun
     In the grey vault of heaven; and by his light
     Did all the chivalry of England move
     To do brave acts. He was indeed the glass
     Wherein the noble youth did dress themselves.
     He had no legs that practis'd not his gait;
     And speaking thick, which nature made his blemish,
     Became the accents of the valiant;
     For those who could speak low and tardily
     Would turn their own perfection to abuse
     To seem like him: so that in speech, in gait,
     In diet, in affections of delight,
     In military rules, humours of blood,
     He was the mark and glass, copy and book,
     That fashion'd others. And him- O wondrous him!
     O miracle of men!- him did you leave-
     Second to none, unseconded by you-
     To look upon the hideous god of war
--**--**--
   PISTOL. These be good humours, indeed! Shall packhorses,
     And hollow pamper'd jades of Asia,
     Which cannot go but thirty mile a day,
     Compare with Caesars, and with Cannibals,
     And Troiant Greeks? Nay, rather damn them with
     King Cerberus; and let the welkin roar.
     Shall we fall foul for toys?
   HOSTESS. By my troth, Captain, these are very bitter words.
   BARDOLPH. Be gone, good ancient; this will grow to a brawl anon.
   PISTOL. Die men like dogs! Give crowns like pins! Have we not Hiren
     here?
   HOSTESS. O' my word, Captain, there's none such here. What the
     good-year! do you think I would deny her? For God's sake, be
     quiet.
   PISTOL. Then feed and be fat, my fair Calipolis.
     Come, give's some sack.
     'Si fortune me tormente sperato me contento.'
     Fear we broadsides? No, let the fiend give fire.
     Give me some sack; and, sweetheart, lie thou there.
                                          [Laying down his sword]
     Come we to full points here, and are etceteras nothings?
   FALSTAFF. Pistol, I would be quiet.
   PISTOL. Sweet knight, I kiss thy neaf. What! we have seen the seven
     stars.
   DOLL. For God's sake thrust him down stairs; I cannot endure such a
     fustian rascal.
   PISTOL. Thrust him down stairs! Know we not Galloway nags?
   FALSTAFF. Quoit him down, Bardolph, like a shove-groat shilling.
     Nay, an 'a do nothing but speak nothing, 'a shall be nothing
     here.
   BARDOLPH. Come, get you down stairs.
   PISTOL. What! shall we have incision? Shall we imbrue?
                                         [Snatching up his sword]
     Then death rock me asleep, abridge my doleful days!
     Why, then, let grievous, ghastly, gaping wounds
     Untwine the Sisters Three! Come, Atropos, I say!
   HOSTESS. Here's goodly stuff toward!
   FALSTAFF. Give me my rapier, boy.
   DOLL. I pray thee, Jack, I pray thee, do not draw.
   FALSTAFF. Get you down stairs.
                                 [Drawing and driving PISTOL out]
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT III. SCENE I.
 Westminster. The palace
 
 Enter the KING in his nightgown, with a page
 
   KING. Go call the Earls of Surrey and of Warwick;
     But, ere they come, bid them o'er-read these letters
     And well consider of them. Make good speed.        Exit page
     How many thousands of my poorest subjects
     Are at this hour asleep! O sleep, O gentle sleep,
     Nature's soft nurse, how have I frightened thee,
     That thou no more will weigh my eyelids down,
     And steep my senses in forgetfulness?
     Why rather, sleep, liest thou in smoky cribs,
     Upon uneasy pallets stretching thee,
     And hush'd with buzzing night-flies to thy slumber,
     Than in the perfum'd chambers of the great,
     Under the canopies of costly state,
     And lull'd with sound of sweetest melody?
     O thou dull god, why liest thou with the vile
     In loathsome beds, and leav'st the kingly couch
     A watch-case or a common 'larum-bell?
     Wilt thou upon the high and giddy mast
     Seal up the ship-boy's eyes, and rock his brains
     In cradle of the rude imperious surge,
     And in the visitation of the winds,
     Who take the ruffian billows by the top,
     Curling their monstrous heads, and hanging them
     With deafing clamour in the slippery clouds,
     That with the hurly death itself awakes?
     Canst thou, O partial sleep, give thy repose
     To the wet sea-boy in an hour so rude;
     And in the calmest and most stillest night,
     With all appliances and means to boot,
     Deny it to a king? Then, happy low, lie down!
     Uneasy lies the head that wears a crown.
 
                     Enter WARWICK and Surrey
 
   WARWICK. Many good morrows to your Majesty!
   KING. Is it good morrow, lords?
   WARWICK. 'Tis one o'clock, and past.
   KING. Why then, good morrow to you all, my lords.
     Have you read o'er the letters that I sent you?
--**--**--
     score, and carried you a forehand shaft a fourteen and fourteen
     and a half, that it would have done a man's heart good to see.
     How a score of ewes now?
   SILENCE. Thereafter as they be- a score of good ewes may be worth
     ten pounds.
   SHALLOW. And is old Double dead?
 
                     Enter BARDOLPH, and one with him
 
   SILENCE. Here come two of Sir John Falstaffs men, as I think.
   SHALLOW. Good morrow, honest gentlemen.
   BARDOLPH. I beseech you, which is Justice Shallow?
   SHALLOW. I am Robert Shallow, sir, a poor esquire of this county,
     and one of the King's justices of the peace. What is your good
     pleasure with me?
   BARDOLPH. My captain, sir, commends him to you; my captain, Sir
     John Falstaff- a tall gentleman, by heaven, and a most gallant
     leader.
   SHALLOW. He greets me well, sir; I knew him a good back-sword man.
     How doth the good knight? May I ask how my lady his wife doth?
   BARDOLPH. Sir, pardon; a soldier is better accommodated than with a
     wife.
   SHALLOW. It is well said, in faith, sir; and it is well said indeed
     too. 'Better accommodated!' It is good; yea, indeed, is it. Good
     phrases are surely, and ever were, very commendable.
     'Accommodated!' It comes of accommodo. Very good; a good phrase.
   BARDOLPH. Pardon, sir; I have heard the word. 'Phrase' call you it?
     By this day, I know not the phrase; but I will maintain the word
     with my sword to be a soldier-like word, and a word of exceeding
     good command, by heaven. Accommodated: that is, when a man is, as
     they say, accommodated; or, when a man is being-whereby 'a may be
     thought to be accommodated; which is an excellent thing.
 
                               Enter FALSTAFF
 
   SHALLOW. It is very just. Look, here comes good Sir John. Give me
--**--**--
     That your attempts may overlive the hazard
     And fearful meeting of their opposite.
   MOWBRAY. Thus do the hopes we have in him touch ground
     And dash themselves to pieces.
 
                           Enter A MESSENGER
 
   HASTINGS. Now, what news?
   MESSENGER. West of this forest, scarcely off a mile,
     In goodly form comes on the enemy;
     And, by the ground they hide, I judge their number
     Upon or near the rate of thirty thousand.
   MOWBRAY. The just proportion that we gave them out.
     Let us sway on and face them in the field.
 
                         Enter WESTMORELAND
 
   ARCHBISHOP. What well-appointed leader fronts us here?
   MOWBRAY. I think it is my Lord of Westmoreland.
   WESTMORELAND. Health and fair greeting from our general,
     The Prince, Lord John and Duke of Lancaster.
   ARCHBISHOP. Say on, my Lord of Westmoreland, in peace,
     What doth concern your coming.
   WESTMORELAND. Then, my lord,
     Unto your Grace do I in chief address
     The substance of my speech. If that rebellion
     Came like itself, in base and abject routs,
     Led on by bloody youth, guarded with rags,
     And countenanc'd by boys and beggary-
     I say, if damn'd commotion so appear'd
     In his true, native, and most proper shape,
     You, reverend father, and these noble lords,
     Had not been here to dress the ugly form
     Of base and bloody insurrection
     With your fair honours. You, Lord Archbishop,
     Whose see is by a civil peace maintain'd,
     Whose beard the silver hand of peace hath touch'd,
     Whose learning and good letters peace hath tutor'd,
     Whose white investments figure innocence,
     The dove, and very blessed spirit of peace-
     Wherefore you do so ill translate yourself
     Out of the speech of peace, that bears such grace,
     Into the harsh and boist'rous tongue of war;
     Turning your books to graves, your ink to blood,
     Your pens to lances, and your tongue divine
--**--**--
     Would he abuse the countenance of the king,
     Alack, what mischiefs might he set abroach
     In shadow of such greatness! With you, Lord Bishop,
     It is even so. Who hath not heard it spoken
     How deep you were within the books of God?
     To us the speaker in His parliament,
     To us th' imagin'd voice of God himself,
     The very opener and intelligencer
     Between the grace, the sanctities of heaven,
     And our dull workings. O, who shall believe
     But you misuse the reverence of your place,
     Employ the countenance and grace of heav'n
     As a false favourite doth his prince's name,
     In deeds dishonourable? You have ta'en up,
     Under the counterfeited zeal of God,
     The subjects of His substitute, my father,
     And both against the peace of heaven and him
     Have here up-swarm'd them.
   ARCHBISHOP. Good my Lord of Lancaster,
     I am not here against your father's peace;
     But, as I told my Lord of Westmoreland,
     The time misord'red doth, in common sense,
     Crowd us and crush us to this monstrous form
     To hold our safety up. I sent your Grace
     The parcels and particulars of our grief,
     The which hath been with scorn shov'd from the court,
     Whereon this hydra son of war is born;
     Whose dangerous eyes may well be charm'd asleep
     With grant of our most just and right desires;
     And true obedience, of this madness cur'd,
     Stoop tamely to the foot of majesty.
   MOWBRAY. If not, we ready are to try our fortunes
     To the last man.
   HASTINGS. And though we here fall down,
     We have supplies to second our attempt.
     If they miscarry, theirs shall second them;
     And so success of mischief shall be born,
     And heir from heir shall hold this quarrel up
     Whiles England shall have generation.
   PRINCE JOHN. YOU are too shallow, Hastings, much to shallow,
--**--**--
     He saw me, and yielded; that I may justly say with the hook-nos'd
     fellow of Rome-I came, saw, and overcame.
   PRINCE JOHN. It was more of his courtesy than your deserving.
   FALSTAFF. I know not. Here he is, and here I yield him; and I
     beseech your Grace, let it be book'd with the rest of this day's
     deeds; or, by the Lord, I will have it in a particular ballad
     else, with mine own picture on the top on't, Colville kissing my
     foot; to the which course if I be enforc'd, if you do not all
     show like gilt twopences to me, and I, in the clear sky of fame,
     o'ershine you as much as the full moon doth the cinders of the
     element, which show like pins' heads to her, believe not the word
     of the noble. Therefore let me have right, and let desert mount.
   PRINCE JOHN. Thine's too heavy to mount.
   FALSTAFF. Let it shine, then.
   PRINCE JOHN. Thine's too thick to shine.
   FALSTAFF. Let it do something, my good lord, that may do me good,
     and call it what you will.
   PRINCE JOHN. Is thy name Colville?
   COLVILLE. It is, my lord.
   PRINCE JOHN. A famous rebel art thou, Colville.
   FALSTAFF. And a famous true subject took him.
   COLVILLE. I am, my lord, but as my betters are
     That led me hither. Had they been rul'd by me,
     You should have won them dearer than you have.
   FALSTAFF. I know not how they sold themselves; but thou, like a
     kind fellow, gavest thyself away gratis; and I thank thee for
     thee.
 
                        Re-enter WESTMORELAND
 
   PRINCE JOHN. Now, have you left pursuit?
   WESTMORELAND. Retreat is made, and execution stay'd.
   PRINCE JOHN. Send Colville, with his confederates,
     To York, to present execution.
     Blunt, lead him hence; and see you guard him sure.
--**--**--
 SCENE V.
 Westminster. Another chamber
 
 The KING lying on a bed; CLARENCE, GLOUCESTER, WARWICK,
 and others in attendance
 
   KING. Let there be no noise made, my gentle friends;
     Unless some dull and favourable hand
     Will whisper music to my weary spirit.
   WARWICK. Call for the music in the other room.
   KING. Set me the crown upon my pillow here.
   CLARENCE. His eye is hollow, and he changes much.
   WARWICK. Less noise! less noise!
 
                         Enter PRINCE HENRY
 
   PRINCE. Who saw the Duke of Clarence?
   CLARENCE. I am here, brother, full of heaviness.
   PRINCE. How now! Rain within doors, and none abroad!
     How doth the King?
   PRINCE HUMPHREY. Exceeding ill.
   PRINCE. Heard he the good news yet? Tell it him.
   PRINCE HUMPHREY. He alt'red much upon the hearing it.
   PRINCE. If he be sick with joy, he'll recover without physic.
   WARWICK. Not so much noise, my lords. Sweet Prince, speak low;
     The King your father is dispos'd to sleep.
   CLARENCE. Let us withdraw into the other room.
   WARWICK. Will't please your Grace to go along with us?
   PRINCE. No; I will sit and watch here by the King.
                                        Exeunt all but the PRINCE
     Why doth the crown lie there upon his pillow,
     Being so troublesome a bedfellow?
     O polish'd perturbation! golden care!
     That keep'st the ports of slumber open wide
     To many a watchful night! Sleep with it now!
     Yet not so sound and half so deeply sweet
     As he whose brow with homely biggen bound
     Snores out the watch of night. O majesty!
     When thou dost pinch thy bearer, thou dost sit
     Like a rich armour worn in heat of day
     That scald'st with safety. By his gates of breath
     There lies a downy feather which stirs not.
     Did he suspire, that light and weightless down
     Perforce must move. My gracious lord! my father!
--**--**--
     For all my reign hath been but as a scene
     Acting that argument. And now my death
     Changes the mood; for what in me was purchas'd
     Falls upon thee in a more fairer sort;
     So thou the garland wear'st successively.
     Yet, though thou stand'st more sure than I could do,
     Thou art not firm enough, since griefs are green;
     And all my friends, which thou must make thy friends,
     Have but their stings and teeth newly ta'en out;
     By whose fell working I was first advanc'd,
     And by whose power I well might lodge a fear
     To be again displac'd; which to avoid,
     I cut them off; and had a purpose now
     To lead out many to the Holy Land,
     Lest rest and lying still might make them look
     Too near unto my state. Therefore, my Harry,
     Be it thy course to busy giddy minds
     With foreign quarrels, that action, hence borne out,
     May waste the memory of the former days.
     More would I, but my lungs are wasted so
     That strength of speech is utterly denied me.
     How I came by the crown, O God, forgive;
     And grant it may with thee in true peace live!
   PRINCE. My gracious liege,
     You won it, wore it, kept it, gave it me;
     Then plain and right must my possession be;
     Which I with more than with a common pain
     'Gainst all the world will rightfully maintain.
 
        Enter PRINCE JOHN OF LANCASTER, WARWICK, LORDS, and others
 
   KING. Look, look, here comes my John of Lancaster.
   PRINCE JOHN. Health, peace, and happiness, to my royal father!
   KING. Thou bring'st me happiness and peace, son John;
     But health, alack, with youthful wings is flown
     From this bare wither'd trunk. Upon thy sight
     My worldly business makes a period.
     Where is my Lord of Warwick?
--**--**--
   DAVY. Now, sir, a new link to the bucket must needs be had; and,
     sir, do you mean to stop any of William's wages about the sack he
     lost the other day at Hinckley fair?
   SHALLOW. 'A shall answer it. Some pigeons, Davy, a couple of
     short-legg'd hens, a joint of mutton, and any pretty little tiny
     kickshaws, tell William cook.
   DAVY. Doth the man of war stay all night, sir?
   SHALLOW. Yea, Davy; I will use him well. A friend i' th' court is
     better than a penny in purse. Use his men well, Davy; for they
     are arrant knaves and will backbite.
   DAVY. No worse than they are backbitten, sir; for they have
     marvellous foul linen.
   SHALLOW. Well conceited, Davy- about thy business, Davy.
   DAVY. I beseech you, sir, to countenance William Visor of Woncot
     against Clement Perkes o' th' hill.
   SHALLOW. There, is many complaints, Davy, against that Visor. That
     Visor is an arrant knave, on my knowledge.
   DAVY. I grant your worship that he is a knave, sir; but yet God
     forbid, sir, but a knave should have some countenance at his
     friend's request. An honest man, sir, is able to speak for
     himself, when a knave is not. I have serv'd your worship truly,
     sir, this eight years; an I cannot once or twice in a quarter
     bear out a knave against an honest man, I have but a very little
     credit with your worship. The knave is mine honest friend, sir;
     therefore, I beseech you, let him be countenanc'd.
   SHALLOW. Go to; I say he shall have no wrong. Look about,
   DAVY.  [Exit DAVY]  Where are you, Sir John? Come, come, come, off
     with your boots. Give me your hand, Master Bardolph.
   BARDOLPH. I am glad to see your worship.
   SHALLOW. I thank thee with all my heart, kind Master Bardolph.
--**--**--
     Be you contented, wearing now the garland,
     To have a son set your decrees at nought,
     To pluck down justice from your awful bench,
     To trip the course of law, and blunt the sword
     That guards the peace and safety of your person;
     Nay, more, to spurn at your most royal image,
     And mock your workings in a second body.
     Question your royal thoughts, make the case yours;
     Be now the father, and propose a son;
     Hear your own dignity so much profan'd,
     See your most dreadful laws so loosely slighted,
     Behold yourself so by a son disdain'd;
     And then imagine me taking your part
     And, in your power, soft silencing your son.
     After this cold considerance, sentence me;
     And, as you are a king, speak in your state
     What I have done that misbecame my place,
     My person, or my liege's sovereignty.
   KING. You are right, Justice, and you weigh this well;
     Therefore still bear the balance and the sword;
     And I do wish your honours may increase
     Till you do live to see a son of mine
     Offend you, and obey you, as I did.
     So shall I live to speak my father's words:
     'Happy am I that have a man so bold
     That dares do justice on my proper son;
     And not less happy, having such a son
     That would deliver up his greatness so
     Into the hands of justice.' You did commit me;
     For which I do commit into your hand
     Th' unstained sword that you have us'd to bear;
     With this remembrance- that you use the same
     With the like bold, just, and impartial spirit
     As you have done 'gainst me. There is my hand.
     You shall be as a father to my youth;
     My voice shall sound as you do prompt mine ear;
--**--**--
   SHALLOW. It doth, it doth, it doth.
   FALSTAFF. As it were, to ride day and night; and not to deliberate,
     not to remember, not to have patience to shift me-
   SHALLOW. It is best, certain.
   FALSTAFF. But to stand stained with travel, and sweating with
     desire to see him; thinking of nothing else, putting all affairs
     else in oblivion, as if there were nothing else to be done but to
     see him.
   PISTOL. 'Tis 'semper idem' for 'obsque hoc nihil est.' 'Tis all in
     every part.
   SHALLOW. 'Tis so, indeed.
   PISTOL. My knight, I will inflame thy noble liver
     And make thee rage.
     Thy Doll, and Helen of thy noble thoughts,
     Is in base durance and contagious prison;
     Hal'd thither
     By most mechanical and dirty hand.
     Rouse up revenge from ebon den with fell Alecto's snake,
     For Doll is in. Pistol speaks nought but truth.
   FALSTAFF. I will deliver her.
                          [Shouts,within, and the trumpets sound]
   PISTOL. There roar'd the sea, and trumpet-clangor sounds.
 
         Enter the KING and his train, the LORD CHIEF JUSTICE
                                among them
 
   FALSTAFF. God save thy Grace, King Hal; my royal Hal!
   PISTOL. The heavens thee guard and keep, most royal imp of fame!
   FALSTAFF. God save thee, my sweet boy!
   KING. My Lord Chief Justice, speak to that vain man.
   CHIEF JUSTICE. Have you your wits? Know you what 'tis you speak?
   FALSTAFF. My king! my Jove! I speak to thee, my heart!
   KING. I know thee not, old man. Fall to thy prayers.
     How ill white hairs become a fool and jester!
     I have long dreamt of such a kind of man,
     So surfeit-swell'd, so old, and so profane;
     But being awak'd, I do despise my dream.
     Make less thy body hence, and more thy grace;
     Leave gormandizing; know the grave doth gape
     For thee thrice wider than for other men-
--**--**--
      When I am known aright, you shall not grieve
      Lending me this acquaintance. I pray you go
      Along with me.                                      Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 Scene IV.
 The French camp.
 
 Enter, with Drum and Colours, Cordelia, Doctor, and Soldiers.
 
   Cor. Alack, 'tis he! Why, he was met even now
      As mad as the vex'd sea, singing aloud,
      Crown'd with rank fumiter and furrow weeds,
      With hardocks, hemlock, nettles, cuckoo flow'rs,
      Darnel, and all the idle weeds that grow
      In our sustaining corn. A century send forth.
      Search every acre in the high-grown field
      And bring him to our eye. [Exit an Officer.] What can man's
         wisdom
      In the restoring his bereaved sense?
      He that helps him take all my outward worth.
   Doct. There is means, madam.
      Our foster nurse of nature is repose,
      The which he lacks. That to provoke in him
      Are many simples operative, whose power
      Will close the eye of anguish.
   Cor. All blest secrets,
      All you unpublish'd virtues of the earth,
      Spring with my tears! be aidant and remediate
      In the good man's distress! Seek, seek for him!
      Lest his ungovern'd rage dissolve the life
      That wants the means to lead it.
 
                            Enter Messenger.
 
   Mess. News, madam.
      The British pow'rs are marching hitherward.
   Cor. 'Tis known before. Our preparation stands
      In expectation of them. O dear father,
      It is thy business that I go about.
      Therefore great France
      My mourning and important tears hath pitied.
      No blown ambition doth our arms incite,
      But love, dear love, and our ag'd father's right.
      Soon may I hear and see him!
                                                          Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 Scene V.
 Gloucester's Castle.
 
 Enter Regan and [Oswald the] Steward.
 
   Reg. But are my brother's pow'rs set forth?
   Osw. Ay, madam.
   Reg. Himself in person there?
   Osw. Madam, with much ado.
      Your sister is the better soldier.
   Reg. Lord Edmund spake not with your lord at home?
--**--**--
      This world I do renounce, and, in your sights,
      Shake patiently my great affliction off.
      If I could bear it longer and not fall
      To quarrel with your great opposeless wills,
      My snuff and loathed part of nature should
      Burn itself out. If Edgar live, O, bless him!
      Now, fellow, fare thee well.
                                   He falls [forward and swoons].
   Edg. Gone, sir, farewell.-
      And yet I know not how conceit may rob
      The treasury of life when life itself
      Yields to the theft. Had he been where he thought,
      By this had thought been past.- Alive or dead?
      Ho you, sir! friend! Hear you, sir? Speak!-
      Thus might he pass indeed. Yet he revives.
      What are you, sir?
   Glou. Away, and let me die.
   Edg. Hadst thou been aught but gossamer, feathers, air,
      So many fadom down precipitating,
      Thou'dst shiver'd like an egg; but thou dost breathe;
      Hast heavy substance; bleed'st not; speak'st; art sound.
      Ten masts at each make not the altitude
      Which thou hast perpendicularly fell.
      Thy life is a miracle. Speak yet again.
   Glou. But have I fall'n, or no?
   Edg. From the dread summit of this chalky bourn.
      Look up a-height. The shrill-gorg'd lark so far
      Cannot be seen or heard. Do but look up.
   Glou. Alack, I have no eyes!
      Is wretchedness depriv'd that benefit
      To end itself by death? 'Twas yet some comfort
      When misery could beguile the tyrant's rage
      And frustrate his proud will.
   Edg. Give me your arm.
      Up- so. How is't? Feel you your legs? You stand.
   Glou. Too well, too well.
   Edg. This is above all strangeness.
      Upon the crown o' th' cliff what thing was that
      Which parted from you?
   Glou. A poor unfortunate beggar.
   Edg. As I stood here below, methought his eyes
      Were two full moons; he had a thousand noses,
--**--**--
      by running. Sa, sa, sa, sa!
                               Exit running. [Attendants follow.]
   Gent. A sight most pitiful in the meanest wretch,
      Past speaking of in a king! Thou hast one daughter
      Who redeems nature from the general curse
      Which twain have brought her to.
   Edg. Hail, gentle sir.
   Gent. Sir, speed you. What's your will?
   Edg. Do you hear aught, sir, of a battle toward?
   Gent. Most sure and vulgar. Every one hears that
      Which can distinguish sound.
   Edg. But, by your favour,
      How near's the other army?
   Gent. Near and on speedy foot. The main descry
      Stands on the hourly thought.
   Edg. I thank you sir. That's all.
   Gent. Though that the Queen on special cause is here,
      Her army is mov'd on.
   Edg. I thank you, sir
                                                Exit [Gentleman].
   Glou. You ever-gentle gods, take my breath from me;
      Let not my worser spirit tempt me again
      To die before you please!
   Edg. Well pray you, father.
   Glou. Now, good sir, what are you?
   Edg. A most poor man, made tame to fortune's blows,
      Who, by the art of known and feeling sorrows,
      Am pregnant to good pity. Give me your hand;
      I'll lead you to some biding.
   Glou. Hearty thanks.
      The bounty and the benison of heaven
      To boot, and boot!
 
                      Enter [Oswald the] Steward.
 
   Osw. A proclaim'd prize! Most happy!
      That eyeless head of thine was first fram'd flesh
      To raise my fortunes. Thou old unhappy traitor,
      Briefly thyself remember. The sword is out
      That must destroy thee.
   Glou. Now let thy friendly hand
      Put strength enough to't.
                                              [Edgar interposes.]
   Osw. Wherefore, bold peasant,
      Dar'st thou support a publish'd traitor? Hence!
      Lest that th' infection of his fortune take
      Like hold on thee. Let go his arm.
   Edg. Chill not let go, zir, without vurther 'cagion.
   Osw. Let go, slave, or thou diest!
--**--**--
   Edm. Tis to be doubted, madam.
   Reg. Now, sweet lord,
      You know the goodness I intend upon you.
      Tell me- but truly- but then speak the truth-
      Do you not love my sister?
   Edm. In honour'd love.
   Reg. But have you never found my brother's way
      To the forfended place?
   Edm. That thought abuses you.
   Reg. I am doubtful that you have been conjunct
      And bosom'd with her, as far as we call hers.
   Edm. No, by mine honour, madam.
   Reg. I never shall endure her. Dear my lord,
      Be not familiar with her.
   Edm. Fear me not.
      She and the Duke her husband!
 
        Enter, with Drum and Colours, Albany, Goneril, Soldiers.
 
   Gon. [aside] I had rather lose the battle than that sister
      Should loosen him and me.
   Alb. Our very loving sister, well bemet.
      Sir, this I hear: the King is come to his daughter,
      With others whom the rigour of our state
      Forc'd to cry out. Where I could not be honest,
      I never yet was valiant. For this business,
      It toucheth us as France invades our land,
      Not bolds the King, with others whom, I fear,
      Most just and heavy causes make oppose.
   Edm. Sir, you speak nobly.
   Reg. Why is this reason'd?
   Gon. Combine together 'gainst the enemy;
      For these domestic and particular broils
      Are not the question here.
   Alb. Let's then determine
      With th' ancient of war on our proceeding.
   Edm. I shall attend you presently at your tent.
   Reg. Sister, you'll go with us?
   Gon. No.
   Reg. 'Tis most convenient. Pray you go with us.
   Gon. [aside] O, ho, I know the riddle.- I will go.
 
           [As they are going out,] enter Edgar [disguised].
 
   Edg. If e'er your Grace had speech with man so poor,
      Hear me one word.
   Alb. I'll overtake you.- Speak.
--**--**--
   Edm. Sir, I thought it fit
      To send the old and miserable King
      To some retention and appointed guard;
      Whose age has charms in it, whose title more,
      To pluck the common bosom on his side
      And turn our impress'd lances in our eyes
      Which do command them. With him I sent the Queen,
      My reason all the same; and they are ready
      To-morrow, or at further space, t' appear
      Where you shall hold your session. At this time
      We sweat and bleed: the friend hath lost his friend;
      And the best quarrels, in the heat, are curs'd
      By those that feel their sharpness.
      The question of Cordelia and her father
      Requires a fitter place.
   Alb. Sir, by your patience,
      I hold you but a subject of this war,
      Not as a brother.
   Reg. That's as we list to grace him.
      Methinks our pleasure might have been demanded
      Ere you had spoke so far. He led our powers,
      Bore the commission of my place and person,
      The which immediacy may well stand up
      And call itself your brother.
   Gon. Not so hot!
      In his own grace he doth exalt himself
      More than in your addition.
   Reg. In my rights
      By me invested, he compeers the best.
   Gon. That were the most if he should husband you.
   Reg. Jesters do oft prove prophets.
   Gon. Holla, holla!
      That eye that told you so look'd but asquint.
   Reg. Lady, I am not well; else I should answer
      From a full-flowing stomach. General,
      Take thou my soldiers, prisoners, patrimony;
      Dispose of them, of me; the walls are thine.
      Witness the world that I create thee here
      My lord and master.
   Gon. Mean you to enjoy him?
   Alb. The let-alone lies not in your good will.
   Edm. Nor in thine, lord.
   Alb. Half-blooded fellow, yes.
--**--**--
                                  Alarums. Fight. [Edmund falls.]
   Alb. Save him, save him!
   Gon. This is mere practice, Gloucester.
      By th' law of arms thou wast not bound to answer
      An unknown opposite. Thou art not vanquish'd,
      But cozen'd and beguil'd.
   Alb. Shut your mouth, dame,
      Or with this paper shall I stop it. [Shows her her letter to
      Edmund.]- [To Edmund]. Hold, sir.
      [To Goneril] Thou worse than any name, read thine own evil.
      No tearing, lady! I perceive you know it.
   Gon. Say if I do- the laws are mine, not thine.
      Who can arraign me for't?
   Alb. Most monstrous!
      Know'st thou this paper?
   Gon. Ask me not what I know.                             Exit.
   Alb. Go after her. She's desperate; govern her.
                                               [Exit an Officer.]
   Edm. What, you have charg'd me with, that have I done,
      And more, much more. The time will bring it out.
      'Tis past, and so am I.- But what art thou
      That hast this fortune on me? If thou'rt noble,
      I do forgive thee.
   Edg. Let's exchange charity.
      I am no less in blood than thou art, Edmund;
      If more, the more th' hast wrong'd me.
      My name is Edgar and thy father's son.
      The gods are just, and of our pleasant vices
      Make instruments to scourge us.
      The dark and vicious place where thee he got
      Cost him his eyes.
   Edm. Th' hast spoken right; 'tis true.
      The wheel is come full circle; I am here.
   Alb. Methought thy very gait did prophesy
      A royal nobleness. I must embrace thee.
      Let sorrow split my heart if ever I
      Did hate thee, or thy father!
   Edg. Worthy prince, I know't.
   Alb. Where have you hid yourself?
      How have you known the miseries of your father?
   Edg. By nursing them, my lord. List a brief tale;
      And when 'tis told, O that my heart would burst!
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1595
 
 LOVE'S LABOUR'S LOST
 
 
 
 
 
 Dramatis Personae.
 
   FERDINAND, King of Navarre
   BEROWNE,    lord attending on the King
   LONGAVILLE,  "      "      "   "   "
   DUMAIN,      "      "      "   "   "
   BOYET,   lord attending on the Princess of France
   MARCADE,   "     "       "  "     "      "    "
   DON ADRIANO DE ARMADO, fantastical Spaniard
   SIR NATHANIEL, a curate
   HOLOFERNES, a schoolmaster
   DULL, a constable
   COSTARD, a clown
   MOTH, page to Armado
   A FORESTER
 
   THE PRINCESS OF FRANCE
   ROSALINE, lady attending on the Princess
   MARIA,      "     "       "  "     "
   KATHARINE, lady attending on the Princess
   JAQUENETTA, a country wench
 
   Lords, Attendants, etc.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE:
 Navarre
 
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 Navarre. The King's park
 
 Enter the King, BEROWNE, LONGAVILLE, and DUMAIN
 
   KING. Let fame, that all hunt after in their lives,
     Live regist'red upon our brazen tombs,
     And then grace us in the disgrace of death;
     When, spite of cormorant devouring Time,
     Th' endeavour of this present breath may buy
     That honour which shall bate his scythe's keen edge,
     And make us heirs of all eternity.
     Therefore, brave conquerors- for so you are
     That war against your own affections
     And the huge army of the world's desires-
     Our late edict shall strongly stand in force:
     Navarre shall be the wonder of the world;
     Our court shall be a little Academe,
     Still and contemplative in living art.
     You three, Berowne, Dumain, and Longaville,
     Have sworn for three years' term to live with me
     My fellow-scholars, and to keep those statutes
     That are recorded in this schedule here.
     Your oaths are pass'd; and now subscribe your names,
     That his own hand may strike his honour down
     That violates the smallest branch herein.
     If you are arm'd to do as sworn to do,
     Subscribe to your deep oaths, and keep it too.
   LONGAVILLE. I am resolv'd; 'tis but a three years' fast.
--**--**--
     in the merriness.
   COSTARD. The matter is to me, sir, as concerning Jaquenetta.
     The manner of it is, I was taken with the manner.
   BEROWNE. In what manner?
   COSTARD. In manner and form following, sir; all those three: I was
     seen with her in the manor-house, sitting with her upon the form,
     and taken following her into the park; which, put together, is in
     manner and form following. Now, sir, for the manner- it is the
     manner of a man to speak to a woman. For the form- in some form.
   BEROWNE. For the following, sir?
   COSTARD. As it shall follow in my correction; and God defend the
     right!
   KING. Will you hear this letter with attention?
   BEROWNE. As we would hear an oracle.
   COSTARD. Such is the simplicity of man to hearken after the flesh.
   KING. [Reads] 'Great deputy, the welkin's vicegerent and sole
     dominator of Navarre, my soul's earth's god and body's fost'ring
     patron'-
   COSTARD. Not a word of Costard yet.
   KING. [Reads] 'So it is'-
   COSTARD. It may be so; but if he say it is so, he is, in telling
     true, but so.
   KING. Peace!
   COSTARD. Be to me, and every man that dares not fight!
   KING. No words!
   COSTARD. Of other men's secrets, I beseech you.
   KING. [Reads] 'So it is, besieged with sable-coloured melancholy, I
     did commend the black oppressing humour to the most wholesome
     physic of thy health-giving air; and, as I am a gentleman, betook
     myself to walk. The time When? About the sixth hour; when beasts
     most graze, birds best peck, and men sit down to that nourishment
     which is called supper. So much for the time When. Now for the
     ground Which? which, I mean, I upon; it is ycleped thy park. Then
     for the place Where? where, I mean, I did encounter that obscene
--**--**--
     If virtue's gloss will stain with any soil,
     Is a sharp wit match'd with too blunt a will,
     Whose edge hath power to cut, whose will still wills
     It should none spare that come within his power.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Some merry mocking lord, belike; is't so?
   MARIA. They say so most that most his humours know.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Such short-liv'd wits do wither as they grow.
     Who are the rest?
   KATHARINE. The young Dumain, a well-accomplish'd youth,
     Of all that virtue love for virtue loved;
     Most power to do most harm, least knowing ill,
     For he hath wit to make an ill shape good,
     And shape to win grace though he had no wit.
     I saw him at the Duke Alencon's once;
     And much too little of that good I saw
     Is my report to his great worthiness.
   ROSALINE. Another of these students at that time
     Was there with him, if I have heard a truth.
     Berowne they call him; but a merrier man,
     Within the limit of becoming mirth,
     I never spent an hour's talk withal.
     His eye begets occasion for his wit,
     For every object that the one doth catch
     The other turns to a mirth-moving jest,
     Which his fair tongue, conceit's expositor,
     Delivers in such apt and gracious words
     That aged ears play truant at his tales,
     And younger hearings are quite ravished;
     So sweet and voluble is his discourse.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. God bless my ladies! Are they all in love,
     That every one her own hath garnished
     With such bedecking ornaments of praise?
   FIRST LORD. Here comes Boyet.
 
                        Re-enter BOYET
 
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Now, what admittance, lord?
   BOYET. Navarre had notice of your fair approach,
     And he and his competitors in oath
     Were all address'd to meet you, gentle lady,
     Before I came. Marry, thus much I have learnt:
--**--**--
 
 Enter ARMADO and MOTH
 
   ARMADO. Warble, child; make passionate my sense of hearing.
                                          [MOTH sings Concolinel]
   ARMADO. Sweet air! Go, tenderness of years, take this key, give
     enlargement to the swain, bring him festinately hither; I must
     employ him in a letter to my love.
   MOTH. Master, will you win your love with a French brawl?
   ARMADO. How meanest thou? Brawling in French?
   MOTH. No, my complete master; but to jig off a tune at the tongue's
     end, canary to it with your feet, humour it with turning up your
     eyelids, sigh a note and sing a note, sometime through the
     throat, as if you swallowed love with singing love, sometime
     through the nose, as if you snuff'd up love by smelling love,
     with your hat penthouse-like o'er the shop of your eyes, with
     your arms cross'd on your thin-belly doublet, like a rabbit on a
     spit, or your hands in your pocket, like a man after the old
     painting; and keep not too long in one tune, but a snip and away.
     These are complements, these are humours; these betray nice
     wenches, that would be betrayed without these; and make them men
     of note- do you note me?- that most are affected to these.
   ARMADO. How hast thou purchased this experience?
   MOTH. By my penny of observation.
   ARMADO. But O- but O-
   MOTH. The hobby-horse is forgot.
   ARMADO. Call'st thou my love 'hobby-horse'?
   MOTH. No, master; the hobby-horse is but a colt, and your love
     perhaps a hackney. But have you forgot your love?
   ARMADO. Almost I had.
   MOTH. Negligent student! learn her by heart.
   ARMADO. By heart and in heart, boy.
   MOTH. And out of heart, master; all those three I will prove.
   ARMADO. What wilt thou prove?
   MOTH. A man, if I live; and this, by, in, and without, upon the
--**--**--
   MOTH. By saying that a costard was broken in a shin.
     Then call'd you for the l'envoy.
   COSTARD. True, and I for a plantain. Thus came your argument in;
     Then the boy's fat l'envoy, the goose that you bought;
     And he ended the market.
   ARMADO. But tell me: how was there a costard broken in a shin?
   MOTH. I will tell you sensibly.
   COSTARD. Thou hast no feeling of it, Moth; I will speak that
       l'envoy.
     I, Costard, running out, that was safely within,
     Fell over the threshold and broke my shin.
   ARMADO. We will talk no more of this matter.
   COSTARD. Till there be more matter in the shin.
   ARMADO. Sirrah Costard. I will enfranchise thee.
   COSTARD. O, Marry me to one Frances! I smell some l'envoy, some
     goose, in this.
   ARMADO. By my sweet soul, I mean setting thee at liberty,
     enfreedoming thy person; thou wert immured, restrained,
     captivated, bound.
   COSTARD. True, true; and now you will be my purgation, and let me
     loose.
   ARMADO. I give thee thy liberty, set thee from durance; and, in
     lieu thereof, impose on thee nothing but this: bear this
     significant [giving a letter] to the country maid Jaquenetta;
     there is remuneration, for the best ward of mine honour is
     rewarding my dependents. Moth, follow.                  Exit
   MOTH. Like the sequel, I. Signior Costard, adieu.
   COSTARD. My sweet ounce of man's flesh, my incony Jew!
                                                        Exit MOTH
     Now will I look to his remuneration. Remuneration! O, that's the
     Latin word for three farthings. Three farthings- remuneration.
     'What's the price of this inkle?'- 'One penny.'- 'No, I'll give
     you a remuneration.' Why, it carries it. Remuneration! Why, it is
     a fairer name than French crown. I will never buy and sell out of
     this word.
 
                           Enter BEROWNE
 
   BEROWNE. My good knave Costard, exceedingly well met!
--**--**--
 and a FORESTER
 
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Was that the King that spurr'd his horse so
       hard
     Against the steep uprising of the hill?
   BOYET. I know not; but I think it was not he.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Whoe'er 'a was, 'a show'd a mounting mind.
     Well, lords, to-day we shall have our dispatch;
     On Saturday we will return to France.
     Then, forester, my friend, where is the bush
     That we must stand and play the murderer in?
   FORESTER. Hereby, upon the edge of yonder coppice;
     A stand where you may make the fairest shoot.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. I thank my beauty I am fair that shoot,
     And thereupon thou speak'st the fairest shoot.
   FORESTER. Pardon me, madam, for I meant not so.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. What, what? First praise me, and again say no?
     O short-liv'd pride! Not fair? Alack for woe!
   FORESTER. Yes, madam, fair.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Nay, never paint me now;
     Where fair is not, praise cannot mend the brow.
     Here, good my glass, take this for telling true:
                                              [ Giving him money]
     Fair payment for foul words is more than due.
   FORESTER. Nothing but fair is that which you inherit.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. See, see, my beauty will be sav'd by merit.
     O heresy in fair, fit for these days!
     A giving hand, though foul, shall have fair praise.
     But come, the bow. Now mercy goes to kill,
     And shooting well is then accounted ill;
     Thus will I save my credit in the shoot:
     Not wounding, pity would not let me do't;
     If wounding, then it was to show my skill,
     That more for praise than purpose meant to kill.
     And, out of question, so it is sometimes:
     Glory grows guilty of detested crimes,
     When, for fame's sake, for praise, an outward part,
     We bend to that the working of the heart;
--**--**--
     facility.
 
     The preyful Princess pierc'd and prick'd a pretty pleasing
       pricket.
     Some say a sore; but not a sore till now made sore with shooting.
     The dogs did yell; put el to sore, then sorel jumps from thicket-
     Or pricket sore, or else sorel; the people fall a-hooting.
     If sore be sore, then L to sore makes fifty sores o' sorel.
     Of one sore I an hundred make by adding but one more L.
 
   NATHANIEL. A rare talent!
   DULL. [Aside] If a talent be a claw, look how he claws him with a
     talent.
   HOLOFERNES. This is a gift that I have, simple, simple; a foolish
     extravagant spirit, full of forms, figures, shapes, objects,
     ideas, apprehensions, motions, revolutions. These are begot in
     the ventricle of memory, nourish'd in the womb of pia mater, and
     delivered upon the mellowing of occasion. But the gift is good in
     those in whom it is acute, and I am thankful for it.
   NATHANIEL. Sir, I praise the Lord for you, and so may my
     parishioners; for their sons are well tutor'd by you, and their
     daughters profit very greatly under you. You are a good member of
     the commonwealth.
   HOLOFERNES. Mehercle, if their sons be ingenious, they shall want
     no instruction; if their daughters be capable, I will put it to
     them; but, vir sapit qui pauca loquitur. A soul feminine saluteth
     us.
 
                     Enter JAQUENETTA and COSTARD
 
   JAQUENETTA. God give you good morrow, Master Person.
   HOLOFERNES. Master Person, quasi pers-one. And if one should be
     pierc'd which is the one?
   COSTARD. Marry, Master Schoolmaster, he that is likest to a
     hogshead.
   HOLOFERNES. Piercing a hogshead! A good lustre of conceit in a turf
     of earth; fire enough for a flint, pearl enough for a swine; 'tis
     pretty; it is well.
   JAQUENETTA. Good Master Parson, be so good as read me this letter;
--**--**--
     The shape of Love's Tyburn that hangs up simplicity.
   LONGAVILLE. I fear these stubborn lines lack power to move.
     O sweet Maria, empress of my love!
     These numbers will I tear, and write in prose.
   BEROWNE. O, rhymes are guards on wanton Cupid's hose:
     Disfigure not his slop.
   LONGAVILLE. This same shall go.          [He reads the sonnet]
       'Did not the heavenly rhetoric of thine eye,
       'Gainst whom the world cannot hold argument,
       Persuade my heart to this false perjury?
       Vows for thee broke deserve not punishment.
       A woman I forswore; but I will prove,
       Thou being a goddess, I forswore not thee:
       My vow was earthly, thou a heavenly love;
       Thy grace being gain'd cures all disgrace in me.
       Vows are but breath, and breath a vapour is;
       Then thou, fair sun, which on my earth dost shine,
       Exhal'st this vapour-vow; in thee it is.
       If broken, then it is no fault of mine;
       If by me broke, what fool is not so wise
       To lose an oath to win a paradise?'
   BEROWNE. This is the liver-vein, which makes flesh a deity,
     A green goose a goddess- pure, pure idolatry.
     God amend us, God amend! We are much out o' th' way.
 
                       Enter DUMAIN, with a paper
 
   LONGAVILLE. By whom shall I send this?- Company! Stay.
                                                    [Steps aside]
   BEROWNE. 'All hid, all hid'- an old infant play.
     Like a demigod here sit I in the sky,
     And wretched fools' secrets heedfully o'er-eye.
     More sacks to the mill! O heavens, I have my wish!
     Dumain transformed! Four woodcocks in a dish!
   DUMAIN. O most divine Kate!
   BEROWNE. O most profane coxcomb!
   DUMAIN. By heaven, the wonder in a mortal eye!
   BEROWNE. By earth, she is not, corporal: there you lie.
   DUMAIN. Her amber hairs for foul hath amber quoted.
   BEROWNE. An amber-colour'd raven was well noted.
--**--**--
     Until his ink were temp'red with Love's sighs;
     O, then his lines would ravish savage ears,
     And plant in tyrants mild humility.
     From women's eyes this doctrine I derive.
     They sparkle still the right Promethean fire;
     They are the books, the arts, the academes,
     That show, contain, and nourish, all the world,
     Else none at all in aught proves excellent.
     Then fools you were these women to forswear;
     Or, keeping what is sworn, you will prove fools.
     For wisdom's sake, a word that all men love;
     Or for Love's sake, a word that loves all men;
     Or for men's sake, the authors of these women;
     Or women's sake, by whom we men are men-
     Let us once lose our oaths to find ourselves,
     Or else we lose ourselves to keep our oaths.
     It is religion to be thus forsworn;
     For charity itself fulfils the law,
     And who can sever love from charity?
   KING. Saint Cupid, then! and, soldiers, to the field!
   BEROWNE. Advance your standards, and upon them, lords;
     Pell-mell, down with them! be first advis'd,
     In conflict, that you get the sun of them.
   LONGAVILLE. Now to plain-dealing; lay these glozes by.
     Shall we resolve to woo these girls of France?
   KING. And win them too; therefore let us devise
     Some entertainment for them in their tents.
   BEROWNE. First, from the park let us conduct them thither;
     Then homeward every man attach the hand
     Of his fair mistress. In the afternoon
     We will with some strange pastime solace them,
     Such as the shortness of the time can shape;
     For revels, dances, masks, and merry hours,
     Forerun fair Love, strewing her way with flowers.
   KING. Away, away! No time shall be omitted
     That will betime, and may by us be fitted.
   BEROWNE. Allons! allons! Sow'd cockle reap'd no corn,
--**--**--
     my bastard, what a joyful father wouldst thou make me! Go to;
     thou hast it ad dunghill, at the fingers' ends, as they say.
   HOLOFERNES. O, I smell false Latin; 'dunghill' for unguem.
   ARMADO. Arts-man, preambulate; we will be singuled from the
     barbarous. Do you not educate youth at the charge-house on the
     top of the mountain?
   HOLOFERNES. Or mons, the hill.
   ARMADO. At your sweet pleasure, for the mountain.
   HOLOFERNES. I do, sans question.
   ARMADO. Sir, it is the King's most sweet pleasure and affection to
     congratulate the Princess at her pavilion, in the posteriors of
     this day; which the rude multitude call the afternoon.
   HOLOFERNES. The posterior of the day, most generous sir, is liable,
     congruent, and measurable, for the afternoon. The word is well
     cull'd, chose, sweet, and apt, I do assure you, sir, I do assure.
   ARMADO. Sir, the King is a noble gentleman, and my familiar, I do
     assure ye, very good friend. For what is inward between us, let
     it pass. I do beseech thee, remember thy courtesy. I beseech
     thee, apparel thy head. And among other importunate and most
     serious designs, and of great import indeed, too- but let that
     pass; for I must tell thee it will please his Grace, by the
     world, sometime to lean upon my poor shoulder, and with his royal
     finger thus dally with my excrement, with my mustachio; but,
     sweet heart, let that pass. By the world, I recount no fable:
     some certain special honours it pleaseth his greatness to impart
     to Armado, a soldier, a man of travel, that hath seen the world;
     but let that pass. The very all of all is- but, sweet heart, I do
     implore secrecy- that the King would have me present the
     Princess, sweet chuck, with some delightful ostentation, or show,
--**--**--
     And then the King will court thee for his dear;
     Hold, take thou this, my sweet, and give me thine,
     So shall Berowne take me for Rosaline.
     And change you favours too; so shall your loves
     Woo contrary, deceiv'd by these removes.
   ROSALINE. Come on, then, wear the favours most in sight.
   KATHARINE. But, in this changing, what is your intent?
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. The effect of my intent is to cross theirs.
     They do it but in mocking merriment,
     And mock for mock is only my intent.
     Their several counsels they unbosom shall
     To loves mistook, and so be mock'd withal
     Upon the next occasion that we meet
     With visages display'd to talk and greet.
   ROSALINE. But shall we dance, if they desire us to't?
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. No, to the death, we will not move a foot,
     Nor to their penn'd speech render we no grace;
     But while 'tis spoke each turn away her face.
   BOYET. Why, that contempt will kill the speaker's heart,
     And quite divorce his memory from his part.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Therefore I do it; and I make no doubt
     The rest will ne'er come in, if he be out.
     There's no such sport as sport by sport o'erthrown,
     To make theirs ours, and ours none but our own;
     So shall we stay, mocking intended game,
     And they well mock'd depart away with shame.
                                          [Trumpet sounds within]
   BOYET. The trumpet sounds; be mask'd; the maskers come.
                                                [The LADIES mask]
 
           Enter BLACKAMOORS music, MOTH as Prologue, the
      KING and his LORDS as maskers, in the guise of Russians
 
   MOTH. All hail, the richest heauties on the earth!
   BOYET. Beauties no richer than rich taffeta.
   MOTH. A holy parcel of the fairest dames
                             [The LADIES turn their backs to him]
     That ever turn'd their- backs- to mortal views!
--**--**--
     Metheglin, wort, and malmsey; well run dice!
     There's half a dozen sweets.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Seventh sweet, adieu!
     Since you can cog, I'll play no more with you.
   BEROWNE. One word in secret.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Let it not be sweet.
   BEROWNE. Thou grievest my gall.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Gall! bitter.
   BEROWNE. Therefore meet.                 [They converse apart]
   DUMAIN. Will you vouchsafe with me to change a word?
   MARIA. Name it.
   DUMAIN. Fair lady-
   MARIA. Say you so? Fair lord-
     Take that for your fair lady.
   DUMAIN. Please it you,
     As much in private, and I'll bid adieu.
                                            [They converse apart]
   KATHARINE. What, was your vizard made without a tongue?
   LONGAVILLE. I know the reason, lady, why you ask.
   KATHARINE. O for your reason! Quickly, sir; I long.
   LONGAVILLE. You have a double tongue within your mask,
     And would afford my speechless vizard half.
   KATHARINE. 'Veal' quoth the Dutchman. Is not 'veal' a calf?
   LONGAVILLE. A calf, fair lady!
   KATHARINE. No, a fair lord calf.
   LONGAVILLE. Let's part the word.
   KATHARINE. No, I'll not be your half.
     Take all and wean it; it may prove an ox.
   LONGAVILLE. Look how you butt yourself in these sharp mocks!
     Will you give horns, chaste lady? Do not so.
   KATHARINE. Then die a calf, before your horns do grow.
   LONGAVILLE. One word in private with you ere I die.
   KATHARINE. Bleat softly, then; the butcher hears you cry.
                                            [They converse apart]
   BOYET. The tongues of mocking wenches are as keen
     As is the razor's edge invisible,
     Cutting a smaller hair than may be seen,
     Above the sense of sense; so sensible
     Seemeth their conference; their conceits have wings,
     Fleeter than arrows, bullets, wind, thought, swifter things.
   ROSALINE. Not one word more, my maids; break off, break off.
   BEROWNE. By heaven, all dry-beaten with pure scoff!
--**--**--
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. The fairest is confession.
     Were not you here but even now, disguis'd?
   KING. Madam, I was.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. And were you well advis'd?
   KING. I was, fair madam.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. When you then were here,
     What did you whisper in your lady's ear?
   KING. That more than all the world I did respect her.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. When she shall challenge this, you will reject
     her.
   KING. Upon mine honour, no.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Peace, peace, forbear;
     Your oath once broke, you force not to forswear.
   KING. Despise me when I break this oath of mine.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. I will; and therefore keep it. Rosaline,
     What did the Russian whisper in your ear?
   ROSALINE. Madam, he swore that he did hold me dear
     As precious eyesight, and did value me
     Above this world; adding thereto, moreover,
     That he would wed me, or else die my lover.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. God give thee joy of him! The noble lord
      Most honourably doth uphold his word.
   KING. What mean you, madam? By my life, my troth,
     I never swore this lady such an oath.
   ROSALINE. By heaven, you did; and, to confirm it plain,
     You gave me this; but take it, sir, again.
   KING. My faith and this the Princess I did give;
     I knew her by this jewel on her sleeve.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Pardon me, sir, this jewel did she wear;
     And Lord Berowne, I thank him, is my dear.
     What, will you have me, or your pearl again?
  BEROWNE. Neither of either; I remit both twain.
     I see the trick on't: here was a consent,
     Knowing aforehand of our merriment,
     To dash it like a Christmas comedy.
     Some carry-tale, some please-man, some slight zany,
     Some mumble-news, some trencher-knight, some Dick,
     That smiles his cheek in years and knows the trick
--**--**--
   BEROWNE. This cannot be Hector.
   DUMAIN. He's a god or a painter, for he makes faces.
   ARMADO. The armipotent Mars, of lances the almighty,
     Gave Hector a gift-
   DUMAIN. A gilt nutmeg.
   BEROWNE. A lemon.
   LONGAVILLE. Stuck with cloves.
   DUMAIN. No, cloven.
   ARMADO. Peace!
     The armipotent Mars, of lances the almighty,
     Gave Hector a gift, the heir of Ilion;
     A man so breathed that certain he would fight ye,
     From morn till night out of his pavilion.
     I am that flower-
   DUMAIN. That mint.
   LONGAVILLE. That columbine.
   ARMADO. Sweet Lord Longaville, rein thy tongue.
   LONGAVILLE. I must rather give it the rein, for it runs against
     Hector.
   DUMAIN. Ay, and Hector's a greyhound.
   ARMADO. The sweet war-man is dead and rotten; sweet chucks, beat
     not the bones of the buried; when he breathed, he was a man. But
     I will forward with my device. [To the PRINCESS] Sweet royalty,
     bestow on me the sense of hearing.
 
           [BEROWNE steps forth, and speaks to COSTARD]
 
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Speak, brave Hector; we are much delighted.
   ARMADO. I do adore thy sweet Grace's slipper.
   BOYET. [Aside to DUMAIN] Loves her by the foot.
   DUMAIN. [Aside to BOYET] He may not by the yard.
   ARMADO. This Hector far surmounted Hannibal-
   COSTARD. The party is gone, fellow Hector, she is gone; she is two
     months on her way.
   ARMADO. What meanest thou?
   COSTARD. Faith, unless you play the honest Troyan, the poor wench
     is cast away. She's quick; the child brags in her belly already;
     'tis yours.
   ARMADO. Dost thou infamonize me among potentates? Thou shalt die.
   COSTARD. Then shall Hector be whipt for Jaquenetta that is quick by
     him, and hang'd for Pompey that is dead by him.
   DUMAIN. Most rare Pompey!
   BOYET. Renowned Pompey!
   BEROWNE. Greater than Great! Great, great, great Pompey! Pompey the
--**--**--
     But if they will not, throw away that spirit,
     And I shall find you empty of that fault,
     Right joyful of your reformation.
   BEROWNE. A twelvemonth? Well, befall what will befall,
     I'll jest a twelvemonth in an hospital.
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. [ To the King] Ay, sweet my lord, and so I take
     my leave.
   KING. No, madam; we will bring you on your way.
   BEROWNE. Our wooing doth not end like an old play:
     Jack hath not Jill. These ladies' courtesy
     Might well have made our sport a comedy.
   KING. Come, sir, it wants a twelvemonth an' a day,
     And then 'twill end.
   BEROWNE. That's too long for a play.
 
                           Re-enter ARMADO
 
   ARMADO. Sweet Majesty, vouchsafe me-
   PRINCESS OF FRANCE. Was not that not Hector?
   DUMAIN. The worthy knight of Troy.
   ARMADO. I will kiss thy royal finger, and take leave. I am a
     votary: I have vow'd to Jaquenetta to hold the plough for her
     sweet love three year. But, most esteemed greatness, will you
     hear the dialogue that the two learned men have compiled in
     praise of the Owl and the Cuckoo? It should have followed in the
     end of our show.
   KING. Call them forth quickly; we will do so.
   ARMADO. Holla! approach.
 
                             Enter All
 
     This side is Hiems, Winter; this Ver, the Spring- the one
     maintained by the Owl, th' other by the Cuckoo. Ver, begin.
 
                       SPRING
          When daisies pied and violets blue
          And lady-smocks all silver-white
          And cuckoo-buds of yellow hue
          Do paint the meadows with delight,
          The cuckoo then on every tree
          Mocks married men, for thus sings he:
               'Cuckoo;
          Cuckoo, cuckoo'- O word of fear,
          Unpleasing to a married ear!
 
          When shepherds pipe on oaten straws,
          And merry larks are ploughmen's clocks;
          When turtles tread, and rooks and daws,
          And maidens bleach their summer smocks;
--**--**--
   ALL. Paddock calls. Anon!
     Fair is foul, and foul is fair.
     Hover through the fog and filthy air.                Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 A camp near Forres. Alarum within.
 
 Enter Duncan, Malcolm, Donalbain, Lennox, with Attendants,
 meeting a bleeding Sergeant.
 
   DUNCAN. What bloody man is that? He can report,
     As seemeth by his plight, of the revolt
     The newest state.
   MALCOLM. This is the sergeant
     Who like a good and hardy soldier fought
     'Gainst my captivity. Hail, brave friend!
     Say to the King the knowledge of the broil
     As thou didst leave it.
   SERGEANT. Doubtful it stood,
     As two spent swimmers that do cling together
     And choke their art. The merciless Macdonwald-
     Worthy to be a rebel, for to that
     The multiplying villainies of nature
     Do swarm upon him -from the Western Isles
     Of kerns and gallowglasses is supplied;
     And Fortune, on his damned quarrel smiling,
     Show'd like a rebel's whore. But all's too weak;
     For brave Macbeth -well he deserves that name-
     Disdaining Fortune, with his brandish'd steel,
     Which smoked with bloody execution,
     Like Valor's minion carved out his passage
     Till he faced the slave,
     Which ne'er shook hands, nor bade farewell to him,
     Till he unseam'd him from the nave to the chaps,
     And fix'd his head upon our battlements.
   DUNCAN. O valiant cousin! Worthy gentleman!
   SERGEANT. As whence the sun 'gins his reflection
     Shipwrecking storms and direful thunders break,
     So from that spring whence comfort seem'd to come
     Discomfort swells. Mark, King of Scotland, mark.
     No sooner justice had, with valor arm'd,
     Compell'd these skipping kerns to trust their heels,
     But the Norweyan lord, surveying vantage,
     With furbish'd arms and new supplies of men,
     Began a fresh assault.
   DUNCAN. Dismay'd not this
     Our captains, Macbeth and Banquo.?
   SERGEANT. Yes,
     As sparrows eagles, or the hare the lion.
     If I say sooth, I must report they were
--**--**--
     Which he deserves to lose. Whether he was combined
     With those of Norway, or did line the rebel
     With hidden help and vantage, or that with both
     He labor'd in his country's wreck, I know not;
     But treasons capital, confess'd and proved,
     Have overthrown him.
   MACBETH. [Aside.] Glamis, and Thane of Cawdor!
     The greatest is behind. [To Ross and Angus] Thanks for your
       pains.
     [Aside to Banquo] Do you not hope your children shall be kings,
     When those that gave the Thane of Cawdor to me
     Promised no less to them?
   BANQUO. [Aside to Macbeth.] That, trusted home,
     Might yet enkindle you unto the crown,
     Besides the Thane of Cawdor. But 'tis strange;
     And oftentimes, to win us to our harm,
     The instruments of darkness tell us truths,
     Win us with honest trifles, to betray's
     In deepest consequence-
     Cousins, a word, I pray you.
   MACBETH. [Aside.] Two truths are told,
     As happy prologues to the swelling act
     Of the imperial theme-I thank you, gentlemen.
     [Aside.] This supernatural soliciting
     Cannot be ill, cannot be good. If ill,
     Why hath it given me earnest of success,
     Commencing in a truth? I am Thane of Cawdor.
     If good, why do I yield to that suggestion
     Whose horrid image doth unfix my hair
     And make my seated heart knock at my ribs,
     Against the use of nature? Present fears
     Are less than horrible imaginings:
     My thought, whose murther yet is but fantastical,
     Shakes so my single state of man that function
     Is smother'd in surmise, and nothing is
     But what is not.
   BANQUO. Look, how our partner's rapt.
   MACBETH. [Aside.] If chance will have me King, why, chance may
       crown me
     Without my stir.
   BANQUO. New honors come upon him,
     Like our strange garments, cleave not to their mould
     But with the aid of use.
--**--**--
     For in my way it lies. Stars, hide your fires;
     Let not light see my black and deep desires.
     The eye wink at the hand; yet let that be
     Which the eye fears, when it is done, to see.          Exit.
   DUNCAN. True, worthy Banquo! He is full so valiant,
     And in his commendations I am fed;
     It is a banquet to me. Let's after him,
     Whose care is gone before to bid us welcome.
     It is a peerless kinsman.                  Flourish. Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 SCENE V.
 Inverness. Macbeth's castle.
 
 Enter Lady Macbeth, reading a letter.
 
   LADY MACBETH. "They met me in the day of success, and I have
     learned by the perfectest report they have more in them than
     mortal knowledge. When I burned in desire to question them
     further, they made themselves air, into which they vanished.
     Whiles I stood rapt in the wonder of it, came missives from the
     King, who all-hailed me 'Thane of Cawdor'; by which title,
     before, these weird sisters saluted me and referred me to the
     coming on of time with 'Hail, King that shalt be!' This have I
     thought good to deliver thee, my dearest partner of greatness,
     that thou mightst not lose the dues of rejoicing, by being
     ignorant of what greatness is promised thee. Lay it to thy heart,
     and farewell."
 
     Glamis thou art, and Cawdor, and shalt be
     What thou art promised. Yet do I fear thy nature.
     It is too full o' the milk of human kindness
     To catch the nearest way. Thou wouldst be great;
     Art not without ambition, but without
     The illness should attend it. What thou wouldst highly,
     That wouldst thou holily; wouldst not play false,
     And yet wouldst wrongly win. Thou'ldst have, great Glamis,
     That which cries, "Thus thou must do, if thou have it;
     And that which rather thou dost fear to do
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT II. SCENE I.
 Inverness. Court of Macbeth's castle.
 
 Enter Banquo and Fleance, bearing a torch before him.
 
   BANQUO. How goes the night, boy?
   FLEANCE. The moon is down; I have not heard the clock.
   BANQUO. And she goes down at twelve.
   FLEANCE. I take't 'tis later, sir.
   BANQUO. Hold, take my sword. There's husbandry in heaven,
     Their candles are all out. Take thee that too.
     A heavy summons lies like lead upon me,
     And yet I would not sleep. Merciful powers,
     Restrain in me the cursed thoughts that nature
     Gives way to in repose!
 
            Enter Macbeth and a Servant with a torch.
 
     Give me my sword.
     Who's there?
   MACBETH. A friend.
   BANQUO. What, sir, not yet at rest? The King's abed.
     He hath been in unusual pleasure and
     Sent forth great largess to your offices.
     This diamond he greets your wife withal,
     By the name of most kind hostess, and shut up
     In measureless content.
   MACBETH. Being unprepared,
     Our will became the servant to defect,
     Which else should free have wrought.
   BANQUO. All's well.
     I dreamt last night of the three weird sisters:
     To you they have show'd some truth.
   MACBETH. I think not of them;
     Yet, when we can entreat an hour to serve,
     We would spend it in some words upon that business,
     If you would grant the time.
   BANQUO. At your kind'st leisure.
   MACBETH. If you shall cleave to my consent, when 'tis,
     It shall make honor for you.
   BANQUO. So I lose none
     In seeking to augment it, but still keep
     My bosom franchised and allegiance clear,
     I shall be counsel'd.
   MACBETH. Good repose the while.
   BANQUO. Thanks, sir, the like to you.
                                      Exeunt Banquo. and Fleance.
   MACBETH. Go bid thy mistress, when my drink is ready,
     She strike upon the bell. Get thee to bed.     Exit Servant.
--**--**--
     The spring, the head, the fountain of your blood
     Is stopped, the very source of it is stopp'd.
   MACDUFF. Your royal father's murther'd.
    MALCOLM. O, by whom?
   LENNOX. Those of his chamber, as it seem'd, had done't.
     Their hands and faces were all badged with blood;
     So were their daggers, which unwiped we found
     Upon their pillows.
     They stared, and were distracted; no man's life
     Was to be trusted with them.
   MACBETH. O, yet I do repent me of my fury,
     That I did kill them.
   MACDUFF. Wherefore did you so?
   MACBETH. Who can be wise, amazed, temperate and furious,
     Loyal and neutral, in a moment? No man.
     The expedition of my violent love
     Outrun the pauser reason. Here lay Duncan,
     His silver skin laced with his golden blood,
     And his gash'd stabs look'd like a breach in nature
     For ruin's wasteful entrance; there, the murtherers,
     Steep'd in the colors of their trade, their daggers
     Unmannerly breech'd with gore. Who could refrain,
     That had a heart to love, and in that heart
     Courage to make 's love known?
   LADY MACBETH. Help me hence, ho!
   MACDUFF. Look to the lady.
   MALCOLM. [Aside to Donalbain.] Why do we hold our tongues,
     That most may claim this argument for ours?
   DONALBAIN. [Aside to Malcolm.] What should be spoken here, where
       our fate,
     Hid in an auger hole, may rush and seize us?
     Let's away,
     Our tears are not yet brew'd.
   MALCOLM. [Aside to Donalbain.] Nor our strong sorrow
     Upon the foot of motion.
   BANQUO. Look to the lady.
                                     Lady Macbeth is carried out.
     And when we have our naked frailties hid,
     That suffer in exposure, let us meet
     And question this most bloody piece of work
     To know it further. Fears and scruples shake us.
     In the great hand of God I stand, and thence
--**--**--
     Know Banquo was your enemy.
   BOTH MURTHERERS. True, my lord.
   MACBETH. So is he mine, and in such bloody distance
     That every minute of his being thrusts
     Against my near'st of life; and though I could
     With barefaced power sweep him from my sight
     And bid my will avouch it, yet I must not,
     For certain friends that are both his and mine,
     Whose loves I may not drop, but wail his fall
     Who I myself struck down. And thence it is
     That I to your assistance do make love,
     Masking the business from the common eye
     For sundry weighty reasons.
   SECOND MURTHERER. We shall, my lord,
     Perform what you command us.
   FIRST MURTHERER. Though our lives-
   MACBETH. Your spirits shine through you. Within this hour at most
     I will advise you where to plant yourselves,
     Acquaint you with the perfect spy o' the time,
     The moment on't; fort must be done tonight
     And something from the palace (always thought
     That I require a clearness); and with him-
     To leave no rubs nor botches in the work-
     Fleance his son, that keeps him company,
     Whose absence is no less material to me
     Than is his father's, must embrace the fate
     Of that dark hour. Resolve yourselves apart;
     I'll come to you anon.
   BOTH MURTHERERS. We are resolved, my lord.
   MACBETH. I'll call upon you straight. Abide within.
                                               Exeunt Murtherers.
     It is concluded: Banquo, thy soul's flight,
     If it find heaven, must find it out tonight.           Exit.
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 The palace.
 
 Enter Lady Macbeth and a Servant.
 
   LADY MACBETH. Is Banquo gone from court?
   SERVANT. Ay, madam, but returns again tonight.
   LADY MACBETH. Say to the King I would attend his leisure
     For a few words.
   SERVANT. Madam, I will.                                  Exit.
   LADY MACBETH. Nought's had, all's spent,
     Where our desire is got without content.
--**--**--
   LADY MACBETH. Fie, for shame!
   MACBETH. Blood hath been shed ere now, i' the olden time,
     Ere humane statute purged the gentle weal;
     Ay, and since too, murthers have been perform'd
     Too terrible for the ear. The time has been,
     That, when the brains were out, the man would die,
     And there an end; but now they rise again,
     With twenty mortal murthers on their crowns,
     And push us from our stools. This is more strange
     Than such a murther is.
   LADY MACBETH. My worthy lord,
     Your noble friends do lack you.
   MACBETH. I do forget.
     Do not muse at me, my most worthy friends.
     I have a strange infirmity, which is nothing
     To those that know me. Come, love and health to all;
     Then I'll sit down. Give me some wine, fill full.
     I drink to the general joy o' the whole table,
     And to our dear friend Banquo, whom we miss.
     Would he were here! To all and him we thirst,
     And all to all.
   LORDS. Our duties and the pledge.
 
                      Re-enter Ghost.
 
   MACBETH. Avaunt, and quit my sight! Let the earth hide thee!
     Thy bones are marrowless, thy blood is cold;
     Thou hast no speculation in those eyes
     Which thou dost glare with.
   LADY MACBETH. Think of this, good peers,
     But as a thing of custom. 'Tis no other,
     Only it spoils the pleasure of the time.
   MACBETH. What man dare, I dare.
     Approach thou like the rugged Russian bear,
     The arm'd rhinoceros, or the Hyrcan tiger;
     Take any shape but that, and my firm nerves
     Shall never tremble. Or be alive again,
     And dare me to the desert with thy sword.
     If trembling I inhabit then, protest me
     The baby of a girl. Hence, horrible shadow!
     Unreal mockery, hence!                           Exit Ghost.
     Why, so, being gone,
--**--**--
   FIRST WITCH. Show!
   SECOND WITCH. Show!
   THIRD. WITCH. Show!
   ALL. Show his eyes, and grieve his heart;
     Come like shadows, so depart!
 
     A show of eight Kings, the last with a glass in his hand;
                    Banquo's Ghost following.
 
   MACBETH. Thou are too like the spirit of Banquo Down!
     Thy crown does sear mine eyeballs. And thy hair,
     Thou other gold-bound brow, is like the first.
     A third is like the former. Filthy hags!
     Why do you show me this? A fourth! Start, eyes!
     What, will the line stretch out to the crack of doom?
     Another yet! A seventh! I'll see no more!
     And yet the eighth appears, who bears a glass
     Which shows me many more; and some I see
     That twofold balls and treble sceptres carry.
     Horrible sight! Now I see 'tis true;
     For the blood-bolter'd Banquo smiles upon me,
     And points at them for his. What, is this so?
   FIRST WITCH. Ay, sir, all this is so. But why
     Stands Macbeth thus amazedly?
     Come,sisters, cheer we up his sprites,
     And show the best of our delights.
     I'll charm the air to give a sound,
     While you perform your antic round,
     That this great King may kindly say
     Our duties did his welcome pay.
                                     Music. The Witches dance and
                                         then vanish with Hecate.
   MACBETH. are they? Gone? Let this pernicious hour
     Stand ay accursed in the calendar!
     Come in, without there!
 
                     Enter Lennox.
 
   LENNOX. What's your Grace's will?
   MACBETH. Saw you the weird sisters?
   LENNOX. No, my lord.
   MACBETH. Came they not by you?
   LENNOX. No indeed, my lord.
   MACBETH. Infected be the 'air whereon they ride,
     And damn'd all those that trust them! I did hear
     The galloping of horse. Who wast came by?
   LENNOX. 'Tis two or three, my lord, that bring you word
     Macduff is fled to England.
--**--**--
   MALCOLM. Well, more anon. Comes the King forth, I pray you?
   DOCTOR. Ay, sir, there are a crew of wretched souls
     That stay his cure. Their malady convinces
     The great assay of art, but at his touch,
     Such sanctity hath heaven given his hand,
     They presently amend.
   MALCOLM. I thank you, Doctor.                     Exit Doctor.
   MACDUFF. What's the disease he means?
   MALCOLM. 'Tis call'd the evil:
     A most miraculous work in this good King,
     Which often, since my here-remain in England,
     I have seen him do. How he solicits heaven,
     Himself best knows; but strangely-visited people,
     All swol'n and ulcerous, pitiful to the eye,
     The mere despair of surgery, he cures,
     Hanging a golden stamp about their necks
     Put on with holy prayers; and 'tis spoken,
     To the succeeding royalty he leaves
     The healing benediction. With this strange virtue
     He hath a heavenly gift of prophecy,
     And sundry blessings hang about his throne
     That speak him full of grace.
 
                     Enter Ross.
 
   MACDUFF. See, who comes here?
   MALCOLM. My countryman, but yet I know him not.
   MACDUFF. My ever gentle cousin, welcome hither.
   MALCOLM. I know him now. Good God, betimes remove
     The means that makes us strangers!
   ROSS. Sir, amen.
   MACDUFF. Stands Scotland where it did?
   ROSS. Alas, poor country,
     Almost afraid to know itself! It cannot
     Be call'd our mother, but our grave. Where nothing,
     But who knows nothing, is once seen to smile;
     Where sighs and groans and shrieks that rend the air,
     Are made, not mark'd; where violent sorrow seems
     A modern ecstasy. The dead man's knell
     Is there scarce ask'd for who, and good men's lives
     Expire before the flowers in their caps,
     Dying or ere they sicken.
   MACDUFF. O, relation
     Too nice, and yet too true!
   MALCOLM. What's the newest grief?
   ROSS. That of an hour's age doth hiss the speaker;
--**--**--
     Pertains to you alone.
   MACDUFF. If it be mine,
     Keep it not from me, quickly let me have it.
   ROSS. Let not your ears despise my tongue forever,
     Which shall possess them with the heaviest sound
     That ever yet they heard.
   MACDUFF. Humh! I guess at it.
   ROSS. Your castle is surprised; your wife and babes
     Savagely slaughter'd. To relate the manner
     Were, on the quarry of these murther'd deer,
     To add the death of you.
   MALCOLM. Merciful heaven!
     What, man! Neer pull your hat upon your brows;
     Give sorrow words. The grief that does not speak
     Whispers the o'erfraught heart, and bids it break.
   MACDUFF. My children too?
   ROSS. Wife, children, servants, all
     That could be found.
   MACDUFF. And I must be from thence!
     My wife kill'd too?
   ROSS. I have said.
   MALCOLM. Be comforted.
     Let's make us medicines of our great revenge,
     To cure this deadly grief.
   MACDUFF. He has no children. All my pretty ones?
     Did you say all? O hell-kite! All?
     What, all my pretty chickens and their dam
     At one fell swoop?
   MALCOLM. Dispute it like a man.
   MACDUFF. I shall do so,
     But I must also feel it as a man.
     I cannot but remember such things were
     That were most precious to me. Did heaven look on,
     And would not take their part? Sinful Macduff,
     They were all struck for thee! Naught that I am,
     Not for their own demerits, but for mine,
     Fell slaughter on their souls. Heaven rest them now!
   MALCOLM. Be this the whetstone of your sword. Let grief
     Convert to anger; blunt not the heart, enrage it.
   MACDUFF. O, I could play the woman with mine eyes
     And braggart with my tongue! But, gentle heavens,
     Cut short all intermission; front to front
     Bring thou this fiend of Scotland and myself;
--**--**--
                        Enter Seyton.
 
   SEYTON. What's your gracious pleasure?
   MACBETH. What news more?
   SEYTON. All is confirm'd, my lord, which was reported.
   MACBETH. I'll fight, 'til from my bones my flesh be hack'd.
     Give me my armor.
   SEYTON. 'Tis not needed yet.
   MACBETH. I'll put it on.
     Send out more horses, skirr the country round,
     Hang those that talk of fear. Give me mine armor.
     How does your patient, doctor?
   DOCTOR. Not so sick, my lord,
     As she is troubled with thick-coming fancies,
     That keep her from her rest.
   MACBETH. Cure her of that.
     Canst thou not minister to a mind diseased,
     Pluck from the memory a rooted sorrow,
     Raze out the written troubles of the brain,
     And with some sweet oblivious antidote
     Cleanse the stuff'd bosom of that perilous stuff
     Which weighs upon the heart?
   DOCTOR. Therein the patient
     Must minister to himself.
   MACBETH. Throw physic to the dogs, I'll none of it.
     Come, put mine armor on; give me my staff.
     Seyton, send out. Doctor, the Thanes fly from me.
     Come, sir, dispatch. If thou couldst, doctor, cast
     The water of my land, find her disease
     And purge it to a sound and pristine health,
     I would applaud thee to the very echo,
     That should applaud again. Pull't off, I say.
     What rhubarb, cyme, or what purgative drug
     Would scour these English hence? Hearst thou of them?
   DOCTOR. Ay, my good lord, your royal preparation
     Makes us hear something.
   MACBETH. Bring it after me.
     I will not be afraid of death and bane
     Till Birnam Forest come to Dunsinane.
   DOCTOR. [Aside.] Were I from Dunsinane away and clear,
     Profit again should hardly draw me here.             Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.
 Country near Birnam Wood. Drum and colors.
 
 Enter Malcolm, old Seward and his Son, Macduff, Menteith, Caithness,
 Angus, Lennox, Ross, and Soldiers, marching.
--**--**--
                           They fight, and young Seward is slain.
   MACBETH. Thou wast born of woman.
     But swords I smile at, weapons laugh to scorn,
     Brandish'd by man that's of a woman born.              Exit.
 
                 Alarums. Enter Macduff.
 
   MACDUFF. That way the noise is. Tyrant, show thy face!
     If thou best slain and with no stroke of mine,
     My wife and children's ghosts will haunt me still.
     I cannot strike at wretched kerns, whose arms
     Are hired to bear their staves. Either thou, Macbeth,
     Or else my sword, with an unbatter'd edge,
     I sheathe again undeeded. There thou shouldst be;
     By this great clatter, one of greatest note
     Seems bruited. Let me find him, Fortune!
     And more I beg not.                           Exit. Alarums.
 
                 Enter Malcolm and old Siward.
 
   SIWARD. This way, my lord; the castle's gently render'd.
     The tyrant's people on both sides do fight,
     The noble Thanes do bravely in the war,
     The day almost itself professes yours,
     And little is to do.
   MALCOLM. We have met with foes
     That strike beside us.
   SIWARD. Enter, sir, the castle.
                                                  Exeunt. Alarum.
 
 
 
 
 SCENE VIII.
 Another part of the field.
 
 Enter Macbeth.
 
   MACBETH. Why should I play the Roman fool and die
     On mine own sword? Whiles I see lives, the gashes
     Do better upon them.
 
                       Enter Macduff.
 
   MACDUFF. Turn, hell hound, turn!
   MACBETH. Of all men else I have avoided thee.
     But get thee back, my soul is too much charged
     With blood of thine already.
   MACDUFF. I have no words.
     My voice is in my sword, thou bloodier villain
     Than terms can give thee out!                    They fight.
   MACBETH. Thou losest labor.
     As easy mayst thou the intrenchant air
     With thy keen sword impress as make me bleed.
     Let fall thy blade on vulnerable crests;
     I bear a charmed life, which must not yield
     To one of woman born.
--**--**--
     Producing forth the cruel ministers
     Of this dead butcher and his fiend-like queen,
     Who, as 'tis thought, by self and violent hands
     Took off her life; this, and what needful else
     That calls upon us, by the grace of Grace
     We will perform in measure, time, and place.
     So thanks to all at once and to each one,
     Whom we invite to see us crown'd at Scone.
                                                Flourish. Exeunt.
                  -THE END-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1605
 
 
 MEASURE FOR MEASURE
 
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
   VINCENTIO, the Duke
   ANGELO, the Deputy
   ESCALUS, an ancient Lord
   CLAUDIO, a young gentleman
   LUCIO, a fantastic
   Two other like Gentlemen
   VARRIUS, a gentleman, servant to the Duke
   PROVOST
   THOMAS, friar
   PETER, friar
   A JUSTICE
   ELBOW, a simple constable
   FROTH, a foolish gentleman
   POMPEY, a clown and servant to Mistress Overdone
   ABHORSON, an executioner
   BARNARDINE, a dissolute prisoner
 
   ISABELLA, sister to Claudio
   MARIANA, betrothed to Angelo
   JULIET, beloved of Claudio
   FRANCISCA, a nun
   MISTRESS OVERDONE, a bawd
 
   Lords, Officers, Citizens, Boy, and Attendants
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE:
 Vienna
 
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 The DUKE'S palace
 
 Enter DUKE, ESCALUS, LORDS, and ATTENDANTS
 
   DUKE. Escalus!
   ESCALUS. My lord.
   DUKE. Of government the properties to unfold
     Would seem in me t' affect speech and discourse,
     Since I am put to know that your own science
     Exceeds, in that, the lists of all advice
     My strength can give you; then no more remains
     But that to your sufficiency- as your worth is able-
     And let them work. The nature of our people,
     Our city's institutions, and the terms
     For common justice, y'are as pregnant in
     As art and practice hath enriched any
     That we remember. There is our commission,
     From which we would not have you warp. Call hither,
     I say, bid come before us, Angelo.         Exit an ATTENDANT
     What figure of us think you he will bear?
     For you must know we have with special soul
--**--**--
     My absolute power and place here in Vienna,
     And he supposes me travell'd to Poland;
     For so I have strew'd it in the common ear,
     And so it is received. Now, pious sir,
     You will demand of me why I do this.
   FRIAR. Gladly, my lord.
   DUKE. We have strict statutes and most biting laws,
     The needful bits and curbs to headstrong steeds,
     Which for this fourteen years we have let slip;
     Even like an o'ergrown lion in a cave,
     That goes not out to prey. Now, as fond fathers,
     Having bound up the threat'ning twigs of birch,
     Only to stick it in their children's sight
     For terror, not to use, in time the rod
     Becomes more mock'd than fear'd; so our decrees,
     Dead to infliction, to themselves are dead;
     And liberty plucks justice by the nose;
     The baby beats the nurse, and quite athwart
     Goes all decorum.
   FRIAR. It rested in your Grace
     To unloose this tied-up justice when you pleas'd;
     And it in you more dreadful would have seem'd
     Than in Lord Angelo.
   DUKE. I do fear, too dreadful.
     Sith 'twas my fault to give the people scope,
     'Twould be my tyranny to strike and gall them
     For what I bid them do; for we bid this be done,
     When evil deeds have their permissive pass
     And not the punishment. Therefore, indeed, my father,
     I have on Angelo impos'd the office;
     Who may, in th' ambush of my name, strike home,
     And yet my nature never in the fight
     To do in slander. And to behold his sway,
     I will, as 'twere a brother of your order,
     Visit both prince and people. Therefore, I prithee,
     Supply me with the habit, and instruct me
     How I may formally in person bear me
     Like a true friar. Moe reasons for this action
--**--**--
     'Twixt you and your poor brother.
   ISABELLA. Doth he so seek his life?
   LUCIO. Has censur'd him
     Already, and, as I hear, the Provost hath
     A warrant for his execution.
   ISABELLA. Alas! what poor ability's in me
     To do him good?
   LUCIO. Assay the pow'r you have.
   ISABELLA. My power, alas, I doubt!
   LUCIO. Our doubts are traitors,
     And make us lose the good we oft might win
     By fearing to attempt. Go to Lord Angelo,
     And let him learn to know, when maidens sue,
     Men give like gods; but when they weep and kneel,
     All their petitions are as freely theirs
     As they themselves would owe them.
   ISABELLA. I'll see what I can do.
   LUCIO. But speedily.
   ISABELLA. I will about it straight;
     No longer staying but to give the Mother
     Notice of my affair. I humbly thank you.
     Commend me to my brother; soon at night
     I'll send him certain word of my success.
   LUCIO. I take my leave of you.
   ISABELLA. Good sir, adieu.                              Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT II. Scene I.
 A hall in ANGELO'S house
 
 Enter ANGELO, ESCALUS, a JUSTICE, PROVOST, OFFICERS, and other ATTENDANTS
 
   ANGELO. We must not make a scarecrow of the law,
     Setting it up to fear the birds of prey,
     And let it keep one shape till custom make it
     Their perch, and not their terror.
   ESCALUS. Ay, but yet
     Let us be keen, and rather cut a little
     Than fall and bruise to death. Alas! this gentleman,
     Whom I would save, had a most noble father.
     Let but your honour know,
     Whom I believe to be most strait in virtue,
     That, in the working of your own affections,
     Had time coher'd with place, or place with wishing,
     Or that the resolute acting of our blood
     Could have attain'd th' effect of your own purpose
--**--**--
   ESCALUS. How would you live, Pompey- by being a bawd? What do you
     think of the trade, Pompey? Is it a lawful trade?
   POMPEY. If the law would allow it, sir.
   ESCALUS. But the law will not allow it, Pompey; nor it shall not be
     allowed in Vienna.
   POMPEY. Does your worship mean to geld and splay all the youth of
     the city?
   ESCALUS. No, Pompey.
   POMPEY. Truly, sir, in my poor opinion, they will to't then. If
     your worship will take order for the drabs and the knaves, you
     need not to fear the bawds.
   ESCALUS. There is pretty orders beginning, I can tell you: but it
     is but heading and hanging.
   POMPEY. If you head and hang all that offend that way but for ten
     year together, you'll be glad to give out a commission for more
     heads; if this law hold in Vienna ten year, I'll rent the fairest
     house in it, after threepence a bay. If you live to see this come
     to pass, say Pompey told you so.
   ESCALUS. Thank you, good Pompey; and, in requital of your prophecy,
     hark you: I advise you, let me not find you before me again upon
     any complaint whatsoever- no, not for dwelling where you do; if I
     do, Pompey, I shall beat you to your tent, and prove a shrewd
     Caesar to you; in plain dealing, Pompey, I shall have you whipt.
     So for this time, Pompey, fare you well.
   POMPEY. I thank your worship for your good counsel; [Aside] but I
     shall follow it as the flesh and fortune shall better determine.
     Whip me? No, no; let carman whip his jade;
     The valiant heart's not whipt out of his trade.         Exit
   ESCALUS. Come hither to me, Master Elbow; come hither, Master
     Constable. How long have you been in this place of constable?
--**--**--
     Your brother dies to-morrow; be content.
   ISABELLA. So you must be the first that gives this sentence,
     And he that suffers. O, it is excellent
     To have a giant's strength! But it is tyrannous
     To use it like a giant.
   LUCIO. [To ISABELLA] That's well said.
   ISABELLA. Could great men thunder
     As Jove himself does, Jove would never be quiet,
     For every pelting petty officer
     Would use his heaven for thunder,
     Nothing but thunder. Merciful Heaven,
     Thou rather, with thy sharp and sulphurous bolt,
     Splits the unwedgeable and gnarled oak
     Than the soft myrtle. But man, proud man,
     Dress'd in a little brief authority,
     Most ignorant of what he's most assur'd,
     His glassy essence, like an angry ape,
     Plays such fantastic tricks before high heaven
     As makes the angels weep; who, with our speens,
     Would all themselves laugh mortal.
   LUCIO. [To ISABELLA] O, to him, to him, wench! He will relent;
     He's coming; I perceive 't.
   PROVOST. [Aside] Pray heaven she win him.
   ISABELLA. We cannot weigh our brother with ourself.
     Great men may jest with saints: 'tis wit in them;
     But in the less foul profanation.
   LUCIO. [To ISABELLA] Thou'rt i' th' right, girl; more o' that.
   ISABELLA. That in the captain's but a choleric word
     Which in the soldier is flat blasphemy.
   LUCIO. [To ISABELLA] Art avis'd o' that? More on't.
   ANGELO. Why do you put these sayings upon me?
   ISABELLA. Because authority, though it err like others,
     Hath yet a kind of medicine in itself
     That skins the vice o' th' top. Go to your bosom,
     Knock there, and ask your heart what it doth know
     That's like my brother's fault. If it confess
     A natural guiltiness such as is his,
     Let it not sound a thought upon your tongue
     Against my brother's life.
   ANGELO. [Aside] She speaks, and 'tis
--**--**--
     Whose credit with the judge, or own great place,
     Could fetch your brother from the manacles
     Of the all-binding law; and that there were
     No earthly mean to save him but that either
     You must lay down the treasures of your body
     To this supposed, or else to let him suffer-
     What would you do?
   ISABELLA. As much for my poor brother as myself;
     That is, were I under the terms of death,
     Th' impression of keen whips I'd wear as rubies,
     And strip myself to death as to a bed
     That longing have been sick for, ere I'd yield
     My body up to shame.
   ANGELO. Then must your brother die.
   ISABELLA. And 'twere the cheaper way:
     Better it were a brother died at once
     Than that a sister, by redeeming him,
     Should die for ever.
   ANGELO. Were not you, then, as cruel as the sentence
     That you have slander'd so?
   ISABELLA. Ignominy in ransom and free pardon
     Are of two houses: lawful mercy
     Is nothing kin to foul redemption.
   ANGELO. You seem'd of late to make the law a tyrant;
     And rather prov'd the sliding of your brother
     A merriment than a vice.
   ISABELLA. O, pardon me, my lord! It oft falls out,
     To have what we would have, we speak not what we mean:
     I something do excuse the thing I hate
     For his advantage that I dearly love.
   ANGELO. We are all frail.
   ISABELLA. Else let my brother die,
     If not a fedary but only he
     Owe and succeed thy weakness.
   ANGELO. Nay, women are frail too.
   ISABELLA. Ay, as the glasses where they view themselves,
     Which are as easy broke as they make forms.
     Women, help heaven! Men their creation mar
     In profiting by them. Nay, call us ten times frail;
     For we are soft as our complexions are,
--**--**--
     sister. Angelo had never the purpose to corrupt her; only he hath
     made an assay of her virtue to practise his judgment with the
     disposition of natures. She, having the truth of honour in her,
     hath made him that gracious denial which he is most glad to
     receive. I am confessor to Angelo, and I know this to be true;
     therefore prepare yourself to death. Do not satisfy your
     resolution with hopes that are fallible; to-morrow you must die;
     go to your knees and make ready.
   CLAUDIO. Let me ask my sister pardon. I am so out of love with life
     that I will sue to be rid of it.
   DUKE. Hold you there. Farewell. [Exit CLAUDIO] Provost, a word with
     you.
 
                           Re-enter PROVOST
 
   PROVOST. What's your will, father?
   DUKE. That, now you are come, you will be gone. Leave me a while
     with the maid; my mind promises with my habit no loss shall touch
     her by my company.
   PROVOST. In good time.                            Exit PROVOST
   DUKE. The hand that hath made you fair hath made you good; the
     goodness that is cheap in beauty makes beauty brief in goodness;
     but grace, being the soul of your complexion, shall keep the body
     of it ever fair. The assault that Angelo hath made to you,
     fortune hath convey'd to my understanding; and, but that frailty
     hath examples for his falling, I should wonder at Angelo. How
     will you do to content this substitute, and to save your brother?
   ISABELLA. I am now going to resolve him; I had rather my brother
     die by the law than my son should be unlawfully born. But, O, how
     much is the good Duke deceiv'd in Angelo! If ever he return, and
     I can speak to him, I will open my lips in vain, or discover his
--**--**--
     not be alter'd: Claudio must die to-morrow. Let him be furnish'd
     with divines, and have all charitable preparation. If my brother
     wrought by my pity, it should not be so with him.
   PROVOST. So please you, this friar hath been with him, and advis'd
     him for th' entertainment of death.
   ESCALUS. Good even, good father.
   DUKE. Bliss and goodness on you!
   ESCALUS. Of whence are you?
   DUKE. Not of this country, though my chance is now
     To use it for my time. I am a brother
     Of gracious order, late come from the See
     In special business from his Holiness.
   ESCALUS. What news abroad i' th' world?
   DUKE. None, but that there is so great a fever on goodness that the
     dissolution of it must cure it. Novelty is only in request; and,
     as it is, as dangerous to be aged in any kind of course as it is
     virtuous to be constant in any undertakeing. There is scarce
     truth enough alive to make societies secure; but security enough
     to make fellowships accurst. Much upon this riddle runs the
     wisdom of the world. This news is old enough, yet it is every
     day's news. I pray you, sir, of what disposition was the Duke?
   ESCALUS. One that, above all other strifes, contended especially to
     know himself.
   DUKE. What pleasure was he given to?
   ESCALUS. Rather rejoicing to see another merry than merry at
     anything which profess'd to make him rejoice; a gentleman of all
     temperance. But leave we him to his events, with a prayer they
     may prove prosperous; and let me desire to know how you find
     Claudio prepar'd. I am made to understand that you have lent him
     visitation.
   DUKE. He professes to have received no sinister measure from his
     judge, but most willingly humbles himself to the determination of
--**--**--
     Thou must be made immortal. Where's Barnardine?
   CLAUDIO. As fast lock'd up in sleep as guiltless labour
     When it lies starkly in the traveller's bones.
     He will not wake.
   PROVOST. Who can do good on him?
     Well, go, prepare yourself. [Knocking within] But hark, what
       noise?
     Heaven give your spirits comfort!               Exit CLAUDIO
     [Knocking continues] By and by.
     I hope it is some pardon or reprieve
     For the most gentle Claudio.
 
                  Enter DUKE, disguised as before
 
     Welcome, father.
   DUKE. The best and wholesom'st spirits of the night
     Envelop you, good Provost! Who call'd here of late?
   PROVOST. None, since the curfew rung.
   DUKE. Not Isabel?
   PROVOST. No.
   DUKE. They will then, ere't be long.
   PROVOST. What comfort is for Claudio?
   DUKE. There's some in hope.
   PROVOST. It is a bitter deputy.
   DUKE. Not so, not so; his life is parallel'd
     Even with the stroke and line of his great justice;
     He doth with holy abstinence subdue
     That in himself which he spurs on his pow'r
     To qualify in others. Were he meal'd with that
     Which he corrects, then were he tyrannous;
     But this being so, he's just. [Knocking within] Now are they
       come.                                         Exit PROVOST
     This is a gentle provost; seldom when
     The steeled gaoler is the friend of men. [Knocking within]
     How now, what noise! That spirit's possess'd with haste
     That wounds th' unsisting postern with these strokes.
 
                         Re-enter PROVOST
 
   PROVOST. There he must stay until the officer
     Arise to let him in; he is call'd up.
   DUKE. Have you no countermand for Claudio yet
     But he must die to-morrow?
   PROVOST. None, sir, none.
   DUKE. As near the dawning, Provost, as it is,
     You shall hear more ere morning.
   PROVOST. Happily
     You something know; yet I believe there comes
     No countermand; no such example have we.
     Besides, upon the very siege of justice,
--**--**--
     be touch'd?
   PROVOST. A man that apprehends death no more dreadfully but as a
     drunken sleep; careless, reckless, and fearless, of what's past,
     present, or to come; insensible of mortality and desperately
     mortal.
   DUKE. He wants advice.
   PROVOST. He will hear none. He hath evermore had the liberty of the
     prison; give him leave to escape hence, he would not; drunk many
     times a day, if not many days entirely drunk. We have very oft
     awak'd him, as if to carry him to execution, and show'd him a
     seeming warrant for it; it hath not moved him at all.
   DUKE. More of him anon. There is written in your brow, Provost,
     honesty and constancy. If I read it not truly, my ancient skill
     beguiles me; but in the boldness of my cunning I will lay myself
     in hazard. Claudio, whom here you have warrant to execute, is no
     greater forfeit to the law than Angelo who hath sentenc'd him. To
     make you understand this in a manifested effect, I crave but four
     days' respite; for the which you are to do me both a present and
     a dangerous courtesy.
   PROVOST. Pray, sir, in what?
   DUKE. In the delaying death.
   PROVOST. Alack! How may I do it, having the hour limited, and an
     express command, under penalty, to deliver his head in the view
     of Angelo? I may make my case as Claudio's, to cross this in the
     smallest.
   DUKE. By the vow of mine order, I warrant you, if my instructions
     may be your guide. Let this Barnardine be this morning executed,
     and his head borne to Angelo.
   PROVOST. Angelo hath seen them both, and will discover the favour.
   DUKE. O, death's a great disguiser; and you may add to it. Shave
     the head and tie the beard; and say it was the desire of the
--**--**--
     Though sometimes you do blench from this to that
     As cause doth minister. Go, call at Flavius' house,
     And tell him where I stay; give the like notice
     To Valentinus, Rowland, and to Crassus,
     And bid them bring the trumpets to the gate;
     But send me Flavius first.
     PETER. It shall be speeded well.                  Exit FRIAR
 
                              Enter VARRIUS
 
   DUKE. I thank thee, Varrius; thou hast made good haste.
     Come, we will walk. There's other of our friends
     Will greet us here anon. My gentle Varrius!           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE VI.
 A street near the city gate
 
 Enter ISABELLA and MARIANA
 
   ISABELLA. To speak so indirectly I am loath;
     I would say the truth; but to accuse him so,
     That is your part. Yet I am advis'd to do it;
     He says, to veil full purpose.
   MARIANA. Be rul'd by him.
   ISABELLA. Besides, he tells me that, if peradventure
     He speak against me on the adverse side,
     I should not think it strange; for 'tis a physic
     That's bitter to sweet end.
   MARIANA. I would Friar Peter-
 
                          Enter FRIAR PETER
 
   ISABELLA. O, peace! the friar is come.
   PETER. Come, I have found you out a stand most fit,
     Where you may have such vantage on the Duke
     He shall not pass you. Twice have the trumpets sounded;
     The generous and gravest citizens
     Have hent the gates, and very near upon
     The Duke is ent'ring; therefore, hence, away.         Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE I.
 The city gate
 
 Enter at several doors DUKE, VARRIUS, LORDS; ANGELO, ESCALUS, Lucio,
 PROVOST, OFFICERS, and CITIZENS
 
   DUKE. My very worthy cousin, fairly met!
     Our old and faithful friend, we are glad to see you.
   ANGELO, ESCALUS. Happy return be to your royal Grace!
   DUKE. Many and hearty thankings to you both.
     We have made inquiry of you, and we hear
--**--**--
   MARIANA. My husband bids me; now I will unmask.
                                                      [Unveiling]
     This is that face, thou cruel Angelo,
     Which once thou swor'st was worth the looking on;
     This is the hand which, with a vow'd contract,
     Was fast belock'd in thine; this is the body
     That took away the match from Isabel,
     And did supply thee at thy garden-house
     In her imagin'd person.
   DUKE. Know you this woman?
   LUCIO. Carnally, she says.
   DUKE. Sirrah, no more.
   LUCIO. Enough, my lord.
   ANGELO. My lord, I must confess I know this woman;
     And five years since there was some speech of marriage
     Betwixt myself and her; which was broke off,
     Partly for that her promised proportions
     Came short of composition; but in chief
     For that her reputation was disvalued
     In levity. Since which time of five years
     I never spake with her, saw her, nor heard from her,
     Upon my faith and honour.
   MARIANA. Noble Prince,
     As there comes light from heaven and words from breath,
     As there is sense in truth and truth in virtue,
     I am affianc'd this man's wife as strongly
     As words could make up vows. And, my good lord,
     But Tuesday night last gone, in's garden-house,
     He knew me as a wife. As this is true,
     Let me in safety raise me from my knees,
     Or else for ever be confixed here,
     A marble monument!
   ANGELO. I did but smile till now.
     Now, good my lord, give me the scope of justice;
     My patience here is touch'd. I do perceive
     These poor informal women are no more
     But instruments of some more mightier member
     That sets them on. Let me have way, my lord,
     To find this practice out.
   DUKE. Ay, with my heart;
     And punish them to your height of pleasure.
     Thou foolish friar, and thou pernicious woman,
--**--**--
     That brain'd my purpose. But peace be with him!
     That life is better life, past fearing death,
     Than that which lives to fear. Make it your comfort,
     So happy is your brother.
   ISABELLA. I do, my lord.
 
        Re-enter ANGELO, MARIANA, FRIAR PETER, and PROVOST
 
   DUKE. For this new-married man approaching here,
     Whose salt imagination yet hath wrong'd
     Your well-defended honour, you must pardon
     For Mariana's sake; but as he adjudg'd your brother-
     Being criminal in double violation
     Of sacred chastity and of promise-breach,
     Thereon dependent, for your brother's life-
     The very mercy of the law cries out
     Most audible, even from his proper tongue,
     'An Angelo for Claudio, death for death!'
     Haste still pays haste, and leisure answers leisure;
     Like doth quit like, and Measure still for Measure.
     Then, Angelo, thy fault's thus manifested,
     Which, though thou wouldst deny, denies thee vantage.
     We do condemn thee to the very block
     Where Claudio stoop'd to death, and with like haste.
     Away with him!
   MARIANA. O my most gracious lord,
     I hope you will not mock me with a husband.
   DUKE. It is your husband mock'd you with a husband.
     Consenting to the safeguard of your honour,
     I thought your marriage fit; else imputation,
     For that he knew you, might reproach your life,
     And choke your good to come. For his possessions,
     Although by confiscation they are ours,
     We do instate and widow you withal
     To buy you a better husband.
   MARIANA. O my dear lord,
     I crave no other, nor no better man.
   DUKE. Never crave him; we are definitive.
   MARIANA. Gentle my liege-                           [Kneeling]
   DUKE. You do but lose your labour.
     Away with him to death! [To LUCIO] Now, sir, to you.
   MARIANA. O my good lord! Sweet Isabel, take my part;
     Lend me your knees, and all my life to come
--**--**--
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1597
 
 THE MERCHANT OF VENICE
 
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
   THE DUKE OF VENICE
   THE PRINCE OF MOROCCO, suitor to Portia
   THE PRINCE OF ARRAGON,    "    "    "
   ANTONIO, a merchant of Venice
   BASSANIO, his friend, suitor to Portia
   SOLANIO,   friend to Antonio and Bassanio
   SALERIO,      "    "    "     "     "
   GRATIANO,     "    "    "     "     "
   LORENZO, in love with Jessica
   SHYLOCK, a rich Jew
   TUBAL, a Jew, his friend
   LAUNCELOT GOBBO, a clown, servant to Shylock
   OLD GOBBO, father to Launcelot
   LEONARDO, servant to Bassanio
   BALTHASAR, servant to Portia
   STEPHANO,     "     "    "
 
   PORTIA, a rich heiress
   NERISSA, her waiting-maid
   JESSICA, daughter to Shylock
 
   Magnificoes of Venice, Officers of the Court of Justice,
     Gaoler, Servants, and other Attendants
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE:
 Venice, and PORTIA'S house at Belmont
 
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 Venice. A street
 
 Enter ANTONIO, SALERIO, and SOLANIO
 
   ANTONIO. In sooth, I know not why I am so sad.
     It wearies me; you say it wearies you;
     But how I caught it, found it, or came by it,
     What stuff 'tis made of, whereof it is born,
     I am to learn;
     And such a want-wit sadness makes of me
     That I have much ado to know myself.
   SALERIO. Your mind is tossing on the ocean;
     There where your argosies, with portly sail-
     Like signiors and rich burghers on the flood,
     Or as it were the pageants of the sea-
     Do overpeer the petty traffickers,
     That curtsy to them, do them reverence,
     As they fly by them with their woven wings.
   SOLANIO. Believe me, sir, had I such venture forth,
     The better part of my affections would
     Be with my hopes abroad. I should be still
     Plucking the grass to know where sits the wind,
     Peering in maps for ports, and piers, and roads;
     And every object that might make me fear
--**--**--
     I pray you, have in mind where we must meet.
   BASSANIO. I will not fail you.
   GRATIANO. You look not well, Signior Antonio;
     You have too much respect upon the world;
     They lose it that do buy it with much care.
     Believe me, you are marvellously chang'd.
   ANTONIO. I hold the world but as the world, Gratiano-
     A stage, where every man must play a part,
     And mine a sad one.
   GRATIANO. Let me play the fool.
     With mirth and laughter let old wrinkles come;
     And let my liver rather heat with wine
     Than my heart cool with mortifying groans.
     Why should a man whose blood is warm within
     Sit like his grandsire cut in alabaster,
     Sleep when he wakes, and creep into the jaundice
     By being peevish? I tell thee what, Antonio-
     I love thee, and 'tis my love that speaks-
     There are a sort of men whose visages
     Do cream and mantle like a standing pond,
     And do a wilful stillness entertain,
     With purpose to be dress'd in an opinion
     Of wisdom, gravity, profound conceit;
     As who should say 'I am Sir Oracle,
     And when I ope my lips let no dog bark.'
     O my Antonio, I do know of these
     That therefore only are reputed wise
     For saying nothing; when, I am very sure,
     If they should speak, would almost damn those ears
     Which, hearing them, would call their brothers fools.
     I'll tell thee more of this another time.
     But fish not with this melancholy bait
     For this fool gudgeon, this opinion.
     Come, good Lorenzo. Fare ye well awhile;
     I'll end my exhortation after dinner.
   LORENZO. Well, we will leave you then till dinner-time.
     I must be one of these same dumb wise men,
     For Gratiano never lets me speak.
   GRATIANO. Well, keep me company but two years moe,
--**--**--
 
 
 SCENE II.
 Belmont. PORTIA'S house
 
 Enter PORTIA with her waiting-woman, NERISSA
 
   PORTIA. By my troth, Nerissa, my little body is aweary of this
     great world.
   NERISSA. You would be, sweet madam, if your miseries were in the
     same abundance as your good fortunes are; and yet, for aught I
     see, they are as sick that surfeit with too much as they that
     starve with nothing. It is no mean happiness, therefore, to be
     seated in the mean: superfluity come sooner by white hairs, but
     competency lives longer.
   PORTIA. Good sentences, and well pronounc'd.
   NERISSA. They would be better, if well followed.
   PORTIA. If to do were as easy as to know what were good to do,
     chapels had been churches, and poor men's cottages princes'
     palaces. It is a good divine that follows his own instructions; I
     can easier teach twenty what were good to be done than to be one
     of the twenty to follow mine own teaching. The brain may devise
     laws for the blood, but a hot temper leaps o'er a cold decree;
     such a hare is madness the youth, to skip o'er the meshes of good
     counsel the cripple. But this reasoning is not in the fashion to
     choose me a husband. O me, the word 'choose'! I may neither
     choose who I would nor refuse who I dislike; so is the will of a
     living daughter curb'd by the will of a dead father. Is it not
     hard, Nerissa, that I cannot choose one, nor refuse none?
   NERISSA. Your father was ever virtuous, and holy men at their death
     have good inspirations; therefore the lott'ry that he hath
     devised in these three chests, of gold, silver, and lead- whereof
     who chooses his meaning chooses you- will no doubt never be
     chosen by any rightly but one who you shall rightly love. But
--**--**--
     You call me misbeliever, cut-throat dog,
     And spit upon my Jewish gaberdine,
     And all for use of that which is mine own.
     Well then, it now appears you need my help;
     Go to, then; you come to me, and you say
     'Shylock, we would have moneys.' You say so-
     You that did void your rheum upon my beard
     And foot me as you spurn a stranger cur
     Over your threshold; moneys is your suit.
     What should I say to you? Should I not say
     'Hath a dog money? Is it possible
     A cur can lend three thousand ducats?' Or
     Shall I bend low and, in a bondman's key,
     With bated breath and whisp'ring humbleness,
     Say this:
     'Fair sir, you spit on me on Wednesday last,
     You spurn'd me such a day; another time
     You call'd me dog; and for these courtesies
     I'll lend you thus much moneys'?
   ANTONIO. I am as like to call thee so again,
     To spit on thee again, to spurn thee too.
     If thou wilt lend this money, lend it not
     As to thy friends- for when did friendship take
     A breed for barren metal of his friend?-
     But lend it rather to thine enemy,
     Who if he break thou mayst with better face
     Exact the penalty.
   SHYLOCK. Why, look you, how you storm!
     I would be friends with you, and have your love,
     Forget the shames that you have stain'd me with,
     Supply your present wants, and take no doit
     Of usance for my moneys, and you'll not hear me.
     This is kind I offer.
   BASSANIO. This were kindness.
   SHYLOCK. This kindness will I show.
     Go with me to a notary, seal me there
     Your single bond, and, in a merry sport,
     If you repay me not on such a day,
     In such a place, such sum or sums as are
--**--**--
     my ribs. Father, I am glad you are come; give me your present to
     one Master Bassanio, who indeed gives rare new liveries; if I
     serve not him, I will run as far as God has any ground. O rare
     fortune! Here comes the man. To him, father, for I am a Jew, if I
     serve the Jew any longer.
 
          Enter BASSANIO, with LEONARDO, with a FOLLOWER or two
 
   BASSANIO. You may do so; but let it be so hasted that supper be
     ready at the farthest by five of the clock. See these letters
     delivered, put the liveries to making, and desire Gratiano to
     come anon to my lodging.                      Exit a SERVANT
   LAUNCELOT. To him, father.
   GOBBO. God bless your worship!
   BASSANIO. Gramercy; wouldst thou aught with me?
   GOBBO. Here's my son, sir, a poor boy-
   LAUNCELOT. Not a poor boy, sir, but the rich Jew's man, that would,
     sir, as my father shall specify-
   GOBBO. He hath a great infection, sir, as one would say, to serve-
   LAUNCELOT. Indeed the short and the long is, I serve the Jew, and
     have a desire, as my father shall specify-
   GOBBO. His master and he, saving your worship's reverence, are
     scarce cater-cousins-
   LAUNCELOT. To be brief, the very truth is that the Jew, having done
     me wrong, doth cause me, as my father, being I hope an old man,
     shall frutify unto you-
   GOBBO. I have here a dish of doves that I would bestow upon your
     worship; and my suit is-
   LAUNCELOT. In very brief, the suit is impertinent to myself, as
     your worship shall know by this honest old man; and, though I say
     it, though old man, yet poor man, my father.
   BASSANIO. One speak for both. What would you?
   LAUNCELOT. Serve you, sir.
   GOBBO. That is the very defect of the matter, sir.
--**--**--
     Why, 'tis an office of discovery, love,
     And I should be obscur'd.
   LORENZO. So are you, sweet,
     Even in the lovely garnish of a boy.
     But come at once,
     For the close night doth play the runaway,
     And we are stay'd for at Bassanio's feast.
   JESSICA. I will make fast the doors, and gild myself
     With some moe ducats, and be with you straight.
                                                       Exit above
 
   GRATIANO. Now, by my hood, a gentle, and no Jew.
   LORENZO. Beshrew me, but I love her heartily,
     For she is wise, if I can judge of her,
     And fair she is, if that mine eyes be true,
     And true she is, as she hath prov'd herself;
     And therefore, like herself, wise, fair, and true,
     Shall she be placed in my constant soul.
 
                      Enter JESSICA, below
 
     What, art thou come? On, gentlemen, away;
     Our masquing mates by this time for us stay.
                                    Exit with JESSICA and SALERIO
 
                         Enter ANTONIO
 
   ANTONIO. Who's there?
   GRATIANO. Signior Antonio?
   ANTONIO. Fie, fie, Gratiano, where are all the rest?
     'Tis nine o'clock; our friends all stay for you;
     No masque to-night; the wind is come about;
     Bassanio presently will go aboard;
     I have sent twenty out to seek for you.
   GRATIANO. I am glad on't; I desire no more delight
     Than to be under sail and gone to-night.              Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE VII.
 Belmont. PORTIA's house
 
 Flourish of cornets. Enter PORTIA, with the PRINCE OF MOROCCO,
 and their trains
 
   PORTIA. Go draw aside the curtains and discover
     The several caskets to this noble Prince.
     Now make your choice.
   PRINCE OF MOROCCO. The first, of gold, who this inscription bears:
     'Who chooseth me shall gain what many men desire.'
     The second, silver, which this promise carries:
     'Who chooseth me shall get as much as he deserves.'
     This third, dull lead, with warning all as blunt:
--**--**--
   SALERIO. That's certain; I, for my part, knew the tailor that made
     the wings she flew withal.
   SOLANIO. And Shylock, for his own part, knew the bird was flidge;
     and then it is the complexion of them all to leave the dam.
   SHYLOCK. She is damn'd for it.
   SALERIO. That's certain, if the devil may be her judge.
   SHYLOCK. My own flesh and blood to rebel!
   SOLANIO. Out upon it, old carrion! Rebels it at these years?
   SHYLOCK. I say my daughter is my flesh and my blood.
   SALERIO. There is more difference between thy flesh and hers than
     between jet and ivory; more between your bloods than there is
     between red wine and Rhenish. But tell us, do you hear whether
     Antonio have had any loss at sea or no?
   SHYLOCK. There I have another bad match: a bankrupt, a prodigal,
     who dare scarce show his head on the Rialto; a beggar, that was
     us'd to come so smug upon the mart. Let him look to his bond. He
     was wont to call me usurer; let him look to his bond. He was wont
     to lend money for a Christian courtesy; let him look to his bond.
   SALERIO. Why, I am sure, if he forfeit, thou wilt not take his
     flesh. What's that good for?
   SHYLOCK. To bait fish withal. If it will feed nothing else, it will
     feed my revenge. He hath disgrac'd me and hind'red me half a
     million; laugh'd at my losses, mock'd at my gains, scorned my
     nation, thwarted my bargains, cooled my friends, heated mine
     enemies. And what's his reason? I am a Jew. Hath not a Jew eyes?
     Hath not a Jew hands, organs, dimensions, senses, affections,
     passions, fed with the same food, hurt with the same weapons,
     subject to the same diseases, healed by the same means, warmed
--**--**--
     Sweet Portia, welcome.
   PORTIA. So do I, my lord;
     They are entirely welcome.
   LORENZO. I thank your honour. For my part, my lord,
     My purpose was not to have seen you here;
     But meeting with Salerio by the way,
     He did entreat me, past all saying nay,
     To come with him along.
   SALERIO. I did, my lord,
     And I have reason for it. Signior Antonio
     Commends him to you.               [Gives BASSANIO a letter]
   BASSANIO. Ere I ope his letter,
     I pray you tell me how my good friend doth.
   SALERIO. Not sick, my lord, unless it be in mind;
     Nor well, unless in mind; his letter there
     Will show you his estate.        [BASSANIO opens the letter]
   GRATIANO. Nerissa, cheer yond stranger; bid her welcome.
     Your hand, Salerio. What's the news from Venice?
     How doth that royal merchant, good Antonio?
     I know he will be glad of our success:
     We are the Jasons, we have won the fleece.
   SALERIO. I would you had won the fleece that he hath lost.
   PORTIA. There are some shrewd contents in yond same paper
     That steals the colour from Bassanio's cheek:
     Some dear friend dead, else nothing in the world
     Could turn so much the constitution
     Of any constant man. What, worse and worse!
     With leave, Bassanio: I am half yourself,
     And I must freely have the half of anything
     That this same paper brings you.
   BASSANIO. O sweet Portia,
     Here are a few of the unpleasant'st words
     That ever blotted paper! Gentle lady,
     When I did first impart my love to you,
     I freely told you all the wealth I had
     Ran in my veins- I was a gentleman;
     And then I told you true. And yet, dear lady,
     Rating myself at nothing, you shall see
     How much I was a braggart. When I told you
--**--**--
     I'll have no speaking; I will have my bond.             Exit
   SOLANIO. It is the most impenetrable cur
     That ever kept with men.
   ANTONIO. Let him alone;
     I'll follow him no more with bootless prayers.
     He seeks my life; his reason well I know:
     I oft deliver'd from his forfeitures
     Many that have at times made moan to me;
     Therefore he hates me.
   SOLANIO. I am sure the Duke
     Will never grant this forfeiture to hold.
   ANTONIO. The Duke cannot deny the course of law;
     For the commodity that strangers have
     With us in Venice, if it be denied,
     Will much impeach the justice of the state,
     Since that the trade and profit of the city
     Consisteth of all nations. Therefore, go;
     These griefs and losses have so bated me
     That I shall hardly spare a pound of flesh
     To-morrow to my bloody creditor.
     Well, gaoler, on; pray God Bassanio come
     To see me pay his debt, and then I care not.          Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.
 Belmont. PORTIA'S house
 
 Enter PORTIA, NERISSA, LORENZO, JESSICA, and BALTHASAR
 
   LORENZO. Madam, although I speak it in your presence,
     You have a noble and a true conceit
     Of godlike amity, which appears most strongly
     In bearing thus the absence of your lord.
     But if you knew to whom you show this honour,
     How true a gentleman you send relief,
     How dear a lover of my lord your husband,
     I know you would be prouder of the work
     Than customary bounty can enforce you.
   PORTIA. I never did repent for doing good,
     Nor shall not now; for in companions
     That do converse and waste the time together,
     Whose souls do bear an equal yoke of love,
     There must be needs a like proportion
     Of lineaments, of manners, and of spirit,
     Which makes me think that this Antonio,
--**--**--
   SHYLOCK. If every ducat in six thousand ducats
     Were in six parts, and every part a ducat,
     I would not draw them; I would have my bond.
   DUKE OF VENICE. How shalt thou hope for mercy, rend'ring none?
   SHYLOCK. What judgment shall I dread, doing no wrong?
     You have among you many a purchas'd slave,
     Which, fike your asses and your dogs and mules,
     You use in abject and in slavish parts,
     Because you bought them; shall I say to you
     'Let them be free, marry them to your heirs-
     Why sweat they under burdens?- let their beds
     Be made as soft as yours, and let their palates
     Be season'd with such viands'? You will answer
     'The slaves are ours.' So do I answer you:
     The pound of flesh which I demand of him
     Is dearly bought, 'tis mine, and I will have it.
     If you deny me, fie upon your law!
     There is no force in the decrees of Venice.
     I stand for judgment; answer; shall I have it?
   DUKE OF VENICE. Upon my power I may dismiss this court,
     Unless Bellario, a learned doctor,
     Whom I have sent for to determine this,
     Come here to-day.
   SALERIO. My lord, here stays without
     A messenger with letters from the doctor,
     New come from Padua.
   DUKE OF VENICE. Bring us the letters; call the messenger.
   BASSANIO. Good cheer, Antonio! What, man, courage yet!
     The Jew shall have my flesh, blood, bones, and all,
     Ere thou shalt lose for me one drop of blood.
   ANTONIO. I am a tainted wether of the flock,
     Meetest for death; the weakest kind of fruit
     Drops earliest to the ground, and so let me.
     You cannot better be employ'd, Bassanio,
     Than to live still, and write mine epitaph.
 
            Enter NERISSA dressed like a lawyer's clerk
--**--**--
     Yet in such rule that the Venetian law
     Cannot impugn you as you do proceed.
     You stand within his danger, do you not?
   ANTONIO. Ay, so he says.
   PORTIA. Do you confess the bond?
   ANTONIO. I do.
   PORTIA. Then must the Jew be merciful.
   SHYLOCK. On what compulsion must I? Tell me that.
   PORTIA. The quality of mercy is not strain'd;
     It droppeth as the gentle rain from heaven
     Upon the place beneath. It is twice blest:
     It blesseth him that gives and him that takes.
     'Tis mightiest in the mightiest; it becomes
     The throned monarch better than his crown;
     His sceptre shows the force of temporal power,
     The attribute to awe and majesty,
     Wherein doth sit the dread and fear of kings;
     But mercy is above this sceptred sway,
     It is enthroned in the hearts of kings,
     It is an attribute to God himself;
     And earthly power doth then show likest God's
     When mercy seasons justice. Therefore, Jew,
     Though justice be thy plea, consider this-
     That in the course of justice none of us
     Should see salvation; we do pray for mercy,
     And that same prayer doth teach us all to render
     The deeds of mercy. I have spoke thus much
     To mitigate the justice of thy plea,
     Which if thou follow, this strict court of Venice
     Must needs give sentence 'gainst the merchant there.
   SHYLOCK. My deeds upon my head! I crave the law,
     The penalty and forfeit of my bond.
   BASSANIO. Yes; here I tender it for him in the court;
     Yea, twice the sum; if that will not suffice,
     I will be bound to pay it ten times o'er
     On forfeit of my hands, my head, my heart;
     If this will not suffice, it must appear
     That malice bears down truth. And, I beseech you,
--**--**--
   JESSICA. In such a night
     Did Thisby fearfully o'ertrip the dew,
     And saw the lion's shadow ere himself,
     And ran dismayed away.
   LORENZO. In such a night
     Stood Dido with a willow in her hand
     Upon the wild sea-banks, and waft her love
     To come again to Carthage.
   JESSICA. In such a night
     Medea gathered the enchanted herbs
     That did renew old AEson.
  LORENZO. In such a night
     Did Jessica steal from the wealthy Jew,
     And with an unthrift love did run from Venice
     As far as Belmont.
   JESSICA. In such a night
     Did young Lorenzo swear he lov'd her well,
     Stealing her soul with many vows of faith,
     And ne'er a true one.
   LORENZO. In such a night
     Did pretty Jessica, like a little shrew,
     Slander her love, and he forgave it her.
   JESSICA. I would out-night you, did no body come;
     But, hark, I hear the footing of a man.
 
                        Enter STEPHANO
 
   LORENZO. Who comes so fast in silence of the night?
   STEPHANO. A friend.
   LORENZO. A friend! What friend? Your name, I pray you, friend?
   STEPHANO. Stephano is my name, and I bring word
     My mistress will before the break of day
     Be here at Belmont; she doth stray about
     By holy crosses, where she kneels and prays
     For happy wedlock hours.
   LORENZO. Who comes with her?
   STEPHANO. None but a holy hermit and her maid.
     I pray you, is my master yet return'd?
   LORENZO. He is not, nor we have not heard from him.
     But go we in, I pray thee, Jessica,
     And ceremoniously let us prepare
     Some welcome for the mistress of the house.
 
                          Enter LAUNCELOT
 
   LAUNCELOT. Sola, sola! wo ha, ho! sola, sola!
   LORENZO. Who calls?
   LAUNCELOT. Sola! Did you see Master Lorenzo? Master Lorenzo! Sola,
     sola!
   LORENZO. Leave holloaing, man. Here!
   LAUNCELOT. Sola! Where, where?
--**--**--
     Are richly come to harbour suddenly.
     You shall not know by what strange accident
     I chanced on this letter.
   ANTONIO. I am dumb.
   BASSANIO. Were you the doctor, and I knew you not?
   GRATIANO. Were you the clerk that is to make me cuckold?
   NERISSA. Ay, but the clerk that never means to do it,
     Unless he live until he be a man.
   BASSANIO. Sweet doctor, you shall be my bedfellow;
     When I am absent, then lie with my wife.
   ANTONIO. Sweet lady, you have given me life and living;
     For here I read for certain that my ships
     Are safely come to road.
   PORTIA. How now, Lorenzo!
     My clerk hath some good comforts too for you.
   NERISSA. Ay, and I'll give them him without a fee.
     There do I give to you and Jessica,
     From the rich Jew, a special deed of gift,
     After his death, of all he dies possess'd of.
   LORENZO. Fair ladies, you drop manna in the way
     Of starved people.
   PORTIA. It is almost morning,
     And yet I am sure you are not satisfied
     Of these events at full. Let us go in,
     And charge us there upon inter'gatories,
     And we will answer all things faithfully.
   GRATIANO. Let it be so. The first inter'gatory
     That my Nerissa shall be sworn on is,
     Whether till the next night she had rather stay,
     Or go to bed now, being two hours to day.
     But were the day come, I should wish it dark,
     Till I were couching with the doctor's clerk.
     Well, while I live, I'll fear no other thing
     So sore as keeping safe Nerissa's ring.               Exeunt
 
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1601
 
 THE MERRY WIVES OF WINDSOR
 
 
 
 
 
 Dramatis Personae
 
   SIR JOHN FALSTAFF
   FENTON, a young gentleman
   SHALLOW, a country justice
   SLENDER, cousin to Shallow
 
     Gentlemen of Windsor
--**--**--
     discreetly as we can.
   FALSTAFF. Pistol!
   PISTOL. He hears with ears.
   EVANS. The tevil and his tam! What phrase is this, 'He hears
     with ear'? Why, it is affectations.
   FALSTAFF. Pistol, did you pick Master Slender's purse?
   SLENDER. Ay, by these gloves, did he-or I would I might
     never come in mine own great chamber again else!-of
     seven groats in mill-sixpences, and two Edward
     shovel-boards that cost me two shilling and two pence apiece
     of Yead Miller, by these gloves.
   FALSTAFF. Is this true, Pistol?
   EVANS. No, it is false, if it is a pick-purse.
   PISTOL. Ha, thou mountain-foreigner! Sir John and master
     mine,
     I combat challenge of this latten bilbo.
     Word of denial in thy labras here!
     Word of denial! Froth and scum, thou liest.
   SLENDER. By these gloves, then, 'twas he.
   NYM. Be avis'd, sir, and pass good humours; I will say
     'marry trap' with you, if you run the nuthook's humour on
     me; that is the very note of it.
   SLENDER. By this hat, then, he in the red face had it; for
     though I cannot remember what I did when you made me
     drunk, yet I am not altogether an ass.
   FALSTAFF. What say you, Scarlet and John?
   BARDOLPH. Why, sir, for my part, I say the gentleman had
     drunk himself out of his five sentences.
   EVANS. It is his five senses; fie, what the ignorance is!
   BARDOLPH. And being fap, sir, was, as they say, cashier'd;
     and so conclusions pass'd the careers.
   SLENDER. Ay, you spake in Latin then too; but 'tis no matter;
     I'll ne'er be drunk whilst I live again, but in honest,
     civil, godly company, for this trick. If I be drunk, I'll be
     drunk with those that have the fear of God, and not with
     drunken knaves.
   EVANS. So Got udge me, that is a virtuous mind.
--**--**--
     oman that altogether's acquaintance with Mistress Anne
     Page; and the letter is to desire and require her to solicit
     your master's desires to Mistress Anne Page. I pray you
     be gone. I will make an end of my dinner; there's pippins
     and cheese to come.                                   Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 3.
 
 The Garter Inn
 
 Enter FALSTAFF, HOST, BARDOLPH, NYM, PISTOL, and ROBIN
 
   FALSTAFF. Mine host of the Garter!
   HOST. What says my bully rook? Speak scholarly and
     wisely.
   FALSTAFF. Truly, mine host, I must turn away some of my
     followers.
   HOST. Discard, bully Hercules; cashier; let them wag; trot,
     trot.
   FALSTAFF. I sit at ten pounds a week.
   HOST. Thou'rt an emperor-Caesar, Keiser, and Pheazar. I
     will entertain Bardolph; he shall draw, he shall tap; said I
     well, bully Hector?
   FALSTAFF. Do so, good mine host.
   HOST. I have spoke; let him follow.  [To BARDOLPH]  Let me
     see thee froth and lime. I am at a word; follow.   Exit HOST
   FALSTAFF. Bardolph, follow him. A tapster is a good trade;
     an old cloak makes a new jerkin; a wither'd serving-man a
     fresh tapster. Go; adieu.
   BARDOLPH. It is a life that I have desir'd; I will thrive.
   PISTOL. O base Hungarian wight! Wilt thou the spigot
     wield?                                         Exit BARDOLPH
   NYM. He was gotten in drink. Is not the humour conceited?
   FALSTAFF. I am glad I am so acquit of this tinder-box: his
     thefts were too open; his filching was like an unskilful
     singer-he kept not time.
   NYM. The good humour is to steal at a minute's rest.
   PISTOL. 'Convey' the wise it call. 'Steal' foh! A fico for the
     phrase!
   FALSTAFF. Well, sirs, I am almost out at heels.
   PISTOL. Why, then, let kibes ensue.
   FALSTAFF. There is no remedy; I must cony-catch; I must
     shift.
   PISTOL. Young ravens must have food.
--**--**--
   MRS. PAGE. What? Thou liest. Sir Alice Ford! These knights
     will hack; and so thou shouldst not alter the article of thy
     gentry.
   MRS. FORD. We burn daylight. Here, read, read; perceive
     how I might be knighted. I shall think the worse of fat
     men as long as I have an eye to make difference of men's
     liking. And yet he would not swear; prais'd women's
     modesty, and gave such orderly and well-behaved reproof
     to all uncomeliness that I would have sworn his disposition
     would have gone to the truth of his words; but they do no
     more adhere and keep place together than the Hundredth
     Psalm to the tune of 'Greensleeves.' What tempest, I trow,
     threw this whale, with so many tuns of oil in his belly,
     ashore at Windsor? How shall I be revenged on him? I
     think the best way were to entertain him with hope, till
     the wicked fire of lust have melted him in his own grease.
     Did you ever hear the like?
   MRS. PAGE. Letter for letter, but that the name of Page and
     Ford differs. To thy great comfort in this mystery of ill
     opinions, here's the twin-brother of thy letter; but let thine
     inherit first, for, I protest, mine never shall. I warrant he
     hath a thousand of these letters, writ with blank space for
     different names-sure, more!-and these are of the second
     edition. He will print them, out of doubt; for he cares not
     what he puts into the press when he would put us two. I
     had rather be a giantess and lie under Mount Pelion. Well,
     I will find you twenty lascivious turtles ere one chaste
     man.
   MRS. FORD. Why, this is the very same; the very hand, the
     very words. What doth he think of us?
   MRS. PAGE. Nay, I know not; it makes me almost ready to
--**--**--
   MRS. PAGE. You are come to see my daughter Anne?
   QUICKLY. Ay, forsooth; and, I pray, how does good Mistress Anne?
   MRS. PAGE. Go in with us and see; we have an hour's talk
     with you.           Exeunt MISTRESS PAGE, MISTRESS FORD, and
                                                 MISTRESS QUICKLY
   PAGE. How now, Master Ford!
   FORD. You heard what this knave told me, did you not?
   PAGE. Yes; and you heard what the other told me?
   FORD. Do you think there is truth in them?
   PAGE. Hang 'em, slaves! I do not think the knight would offer it;
     but these that accuse him in his intent towards our
     wives are a yoke of his discarded men; very rogues, now
     they be out of service.
   FORD. Were they his men?
   PAGE. Marry, were they.
   FORD. I like it never the better for that. Does he lie at the
     Garter?
   PAGE. Ay, marry, does he. If he should intend this voyage
     toward my wife, I would turn her loose to him; and what
     he gets more of her than sharp words, let it lie on my head.
   FORD. I do not misdoubt my wife; but I would be loath to
     turn them together. A man may be too confident. I would
     have nothing lie on my head. I cannot be thus satisfied.
 
                            Enter HOST
 
   PAGE. Look where my ranting host of the Garter comes.
     There is either liquor in his pate or money in his purse
     when he looks so merrily. How now, mine host!
   HOST. How now, bully rook! Thou'rt a gentleman.  [To
     SHALLOW following]  Cavaleiro Justice, I say.
 
                          Enter SHALLOW
 
   SHALLOW. I follow, mine host, I follow. Good even and
     twenty, good Master Page! Master Page, will you go with
     us? We have sport in hand.
   HOST. Tell him, Cavaleiro Justice; tell him, bully rook.
--**--**--
   FORD. Troth, and I have a bag of money here troubles me; if
     you will help to bear it, Sir John, take all, or half, for easing
     me of the carriage.
   FALSTAFF. Sir, I know not how I may deserve to be your
     porter.
   FORD. I will tell you, sir, if you will give me the hearing.
   FALSTAFF. Speak, good Master Brook; I shall be glad to be
     your servant.
   FORD. Sir, I hear you are a scholar-I will be brief with you
     -and you have been a man long known to me, though I
     had never so good means as desire to make myself acquainted
     with you. I shall discover a thing to you, wherein
     I must very much lay open mine own imperfection; but,
     good Sir John, as you have one eye upon my follies, as you
     hear them unfolded, turn another into the register of your
     own, that I may pass with a reproof the easier, sith you
     yourself know how easy is it to be such an offender.
   FALSTAFF. Very well, sir; proceed.
   FORD. There is a gentlewoman in this town, her husband's
     name is Ford.
   FALSTAFF. Well, sir.
   FORD. I have long lov'd her, and, I protest to you, bestowed
     much on her; followed her with a doting observance;
     engross'd opportunities to meet her; fee'd every slight occasion
     that could but niggardly give me sight of her; not
     only bought many presents to give her, but have given
     largely to many to know what she would have given;
     briefly, I have pursu'd her as love hath pursued me; which
     hath been on the wing of all occasions. But whatsoever I
     have merited, either in my mind or in my means, meed, I
     am sure, I have received none, unless experience be a jewel;
     that I have purchased at an infinite rate, and that hath
--**--**--
     appoint?
   EVANS. As I am a Christians soul, now, look you, this is the
     place appointed. I'll be judgment by mine host of the
     Garter.
   HOST. Peace, I say, Gallia and Gaul, French and Welsh,
     soul-curer and body-curer.
   CAIUS. Ay, dat is very good! excellent!
   HOST. Peace, I say. Hear mine host of the Garter. Am I
     politic? am I subtle? am I a Machiavel? Shall I lose my
     doctor? No; he gives me the potions and the motions. Shall I
     lose my parson, my priest, my Sir Hugh? No; he gives me
     the proverbs and the noverbs. Give me thy hand, terrestrial;
     so. Give me thy hand, celestial; so. Boys of art, I have
     deceiv'd you both; I have directed you to wrong places;
     your hearts are mighty, your skins are whole, and let burnt
     sack be the issue. Come, lay their swords to pawn. Follow
     me, lads of peace; follow, follow, follow.
   SHALLOW. Trust me, a mad host. Follow, gentlemen, follow.
   SLENDER.  [Aside]  O sweet Anne Page!
                                   Exeunt all but CAIUS and EVANS
   CAIUS. Ha, do I perceive dat? Have you make-a de sot of us,
     ha, ha?
   EVANS. This is well; he has made us his vlouting-stog. I
     desire you that we may be friends; and let us knog our prains
     together to be revenge on this same scall, scurvy, cogging
     companion, the host of the Garter.
   CAIUS. By gar, with all my heart. He promise to bring me
     where is Anne Page; by gar, he deceive me too.
   EVANS. Well, I will smite his noddles. Pray you follow.
                                                           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 2.
 
 The street in Windsor
 
 Enter MISTRESS PAGE and ROBIN
 
   MRS. PAGE. Nay, keep your way, little gallant; you were
     wont to be a follower, but now you are a leader. Whether
     had you rather lead mine eyes, or eye your master's heels?
--**--**--
     the arras.
   MRS. FORD. Pray you, do so; she's a very tattling woman.
                                       [FALSTAFF hides himself]
 
                Re-enter MISTRESS PAGE and ROBIN
 
     What's the matter? How now!
   MRS. PAGE. O Mistress Ford, what have you done? You're
     sham'd, y'are overthrown, y'are undone for ever.
   MRS. FORD. What's the matter, good Mistress Page?
   MRS. PAGE. O well-a-day, Mistress Ford, having an honest
     man to your husband, to give him such cause of suspicion!
   MRS. FORD. What cause of suspicion?
   MRS. PAGE. What cause of suspicion? Out upon you, how
     am I mistook in you!
   MRS. FORD. Why, alas, what's the matter?
   MRS. PAGE. Your husband's coming hither, woman, with all
     the officers in Windsor, to search for a gentleman that he
     says is here now in the house, by your consent, to take an
     ill advantage of his absence. You are undone.
   MRS. FORD. 'Tis not so, I hope.
   MRS. PAGE. Pray heaven it be not so that you have such a
     man here; but 'tis most certain your husband's coming,
     with half Windsor at his heels, to search for such a one. I
     come before to tell you. If you know yourself clear, why,
     I am glad of it; but if you have a friend here, convey,
     convey him out. Be not amaz'd; call all your senses to you;
     defend your reputation, or bid farewell to your good life
     for ever.
   MRS. FORD. What shall I do? There is a gentleman, my dear
     friend; and I fear not mine own shame as much as his peril.
     I had rather than a thousand pound he were out of the
     house.
   MRS. PAGE. For shame, never stand 'you had rather' and 'you
     had rather'! Your husband's here at hand; bethink you of
     some conveyance; in the house you cannot hide him. O,
--**--**--
     search.                        Exeunt EVANS, PAGE, and CAIUS
   MRS. PAGE. Is there not a double excellency in this?
   MRS. FORD. I know not which pleases me better, that my
     husband is deceived, or Sir John.
   MRS. PAGE. What a taking was he in when your husband
     ask'd who was in the basket!
   MRS. FORD. I am half afraid he will have need of washing; so
     throwing him into the water will do him a benefit.
   MRS. PAGE. Hang him, dishonest rascal! I would all of the
     same strain were in the same distress.
   MRS. FORD. I think my husband hath some special suspicion
     of Falstaff's being here, for I never saw him so gross in his
     jealousy till now.
   MRS. PAGE. I Will lay a plot to try that, and we will yet have
     more tricks with Falstaff. His dissolute disease will scarce
     obey this medicine.
   MRS. FORD. Shall we send that foolish carrion, Mistress
     Quickly, to him, and excuse his throwing into the water,
     and give him another hope, to betray him to another
     punishment?
   MRS. PAGE. We will do it; let him be sent for to-morrow
     eight o'clock, to have amends.
 
        Re-enter FORD, PAGE, CAIUS, and SIR HUGH EVANS
 
   FORD. I cannot find him; may be the knave bragg'd of that
     he could not compass.
   MRS. PAGE.  [Aside to MRS. FORD]  Heard you that?
   MRS. FORD. You use me well, Master Ford, do you?
   FORD. Ay, I do so.
   MRS. FORD. Heaven make you better than your thoughts!
   FORD. Amen.
   MRS. PAGE. You do yourself mighty wrong, Master Ford.
   FORD. Ay, ay; I must bear it.
   EVANS. If there be any pody in the house, and in the
     chambers, and in the coffers, and in the presses, heaven forgive
     my sins at the day of judgment!
   CAIUS. Be gar, nor I too; there is no bodies.
--**--**--
   Claud. Marry, that can Hero!
     Hero itself can blot out Hero's virtue.
     What man was he talk'd with you yesternight,
     Out at your window betwixt twelve and one?
     Now, if you are a maid, answer to this.
   Hero. I talk'd with no man at that hour, my lord.
   Pedro. Why, then are you no maiden. Leonato,
     I am sorry you must hear. Upon my honour,
     Myself, my brother, and this grieved Count
     Did see her, hear her, at that hour last night
     Talk with a ruffian at her chamber window,
     Who hath indeed, most like a liberal villain,
     Confess'd the vile encounters they have had
     A thousand times in secret.
   John. Fie, fie! they are not to be nam'd, my lord--
     Not to be spoke of;
     There is not chastity, enough in language
     Without offence to utter them. Thus, pretty lady,
     I am sorry for thy much misgovernment.
   Claud. O Hero! what a Hero hadst thou been
     If half thy outward graces had been plac'd
     About thy thoughts and counsels of thy heart!
     But fare thee well, most foul, most fair! Farewell,
     Thou pure impiety and impious purity!
     For thee I'll lock up all the gates of love,
     And on my eyelids shall conjecture hang,
     To turn all beauty into thoughts of harm,
     And never shall it more be gracious.
   Leon. Hath no man's dagger here a point for me?
                                                   [Hero swoons.]
   Beat. Why, how now, cousin? Wherefore sink you down?
   John. Come let us go. These things, come thus to light,
     Smother her spirits up.
                       [Exeunt Don Pedro, Don Juan, and Claudio.]
   Bene. How doth the lady?
   Beat. Dead, I think. Help, uncle!
     Hero! why, Hero! Uncle! Signior Benedick! Friar!
   Leon. O Fate, take not away thy heavy hand!
     Death is the fairest cover for her shame
     That may be wish'd for.
--**--**--
   Bene. Signior Leonato, let the friar advise you;
     And though you know my inwardness and love
     Is very much unto the Prince and Claudio,
     Yet, by mine honour, I will deal in this
     As secretly and justly as your soul
     Should with your body.
   Leon. Being that I flow in grief,
     The smallest twine may lead me.
   Friar. 'Tis well consented. Presently away;
     For to strange sores strangely they strain the cure.
     Come, lady, die to live. This wedding day
     Perhaps is but prolong'd. Have patience and endure.
                          Exeunt [all but Benedick and Beatrice].
   Bene. Lady Beatrice, have you wept all this while?
   Beat. Yea, and I will weep a while longer.
   Bene. I will not desire that.
   Beat. You have no reason. I do it freely.
   Bene. Surely I do believe your fair cousin is wronged.
   Beat. Ah, how much might the man deserve of me that would right
      her!
   Bene. Is there any way to show such friendship?
   Beat. A very even way, but no such friend.
   Bene. May a man do it?
   Beat. It is a man's office, but not yours.
   Bene. I do love nothing in the world so well as you. Is not that
     strange?
   Beat. As strange as the thing I know not. It were as possible for
     me to say I loved nothing so well as you. But believe me not; and
     yet I lie not. I confess nothing, nor I deny nothing. I am sorry
     for my cousin.
   Bene. By my sword, Beatrice, thou lovest me.
   Beat. Do not swear, and eat it.
   Bene. I will swear by it that you love me, and I will make him eat
     it that says I love not you.
   Beat. Will you not eat your word?
   Bene. With no sauce that can be devised to it. I protest I love
--**--**--
   1. Watch. And that Count Claudio did mean, upon his words, to
     disgrace Hero before the whole assembly, and not marry her.
   Dog. O villain! thou wilt be condemn'd into everlasting redemption
     for this.
   Sex. What else?
   Watchmen. This is all.
   Sex. And this is more, masters, than you can deny. Prince John is
     this morning secretly stol'n away. Hero was in this manner
     accus'd, in this manner refus'd, and upon the grief of this
     suddenly died. Master Constable, let these men be bound and
     brought to Leonato's. I will go before and show him their
     examination.                                         [Exit.]
   Dog. Come, let them be opinion'd.
   Verg. Let them be in the hands--
   Con. Off, coxcomb!
   Dog. God's my life, where's the sexton? Let him write down the
     Prince's officer coxcomb. Come, bind them.--Thou naughty varlet!
   Con. Away! you are an ass, you are an ass.
   Dog. Dost thou not suspect my place? Dost thou not suspect my
     years? O that he were here to write me down an ass! But, masters,
     remember that I am an ass. Though it be not written down, yet
     forget not that I am an ass. No, thou villain, thou art full of
     piety, as shall be prov'd upon thee by good witness. I am a wise
     fellow; and which is more, an officer; and which is more, a
     householder; and which is more, as pretty a piece of flesh as any
     is in Messina, and one that knows the law, go to! and a rich
     fellow enough, go to! and a fellow that hath had losses; and one
     that hath two gowns and everything handsome about him. Bring him
     away. O that I had been writ down an ass!
                                                          Exeunt.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. Scene I.
 The street, near Leonato's house.
 
 Enter Leonato and his brother [ Antonio].
--**--**--
     Would give preceptial medicine to rage,
     Fetter strong madness in a silken thread,
     Charm ache with air and agony with words.
     No, no! 'Tis all men's office to speak patience
     To those that wring under the load of sorrow,
     But no man's virtue nor sufficiency
     To be so moral when he shall endure
     The like himself. Therefore give me no counsel.
     My griefs cry louder than advertisement.
   Ant. Therein do men from children nothing differ.
   Leon. I pray thee peace. I will be flesh and blood;
     For there was never yet philosopher
     That could endure the toothache patiently,
     However they have writ the style of gods
     And made a push at chance and sufferance.
   Ant. Yet bend not all the harm upon yourself.
     Make those that do offend you suffer too.
   Leon. There thou speak'st reason. Nay, I will do so.
     My soul doth tell me Hero is belied;
     And that shall Claudio know; so shall the Prince,
     And all of them that thus dishonour her.
 
               Enter Don Pedro and Claudio.
 
   Ant. Here comes the Prince and Claudio hastily.
   Pedro. Good den, Good den.
   Claud. Good day to both of you.
   Leon. Hear you, my lords!
   Pedro. We have some haste, Leonato.
   Leon. Some haste, my lord! well, fare you well, my lord.
     Are you so hasty now? Well, all is one.
   Pedro. Nay, do not quarrel with us, good old man.
   Ant. If he could right himself with quarrelling,
     Some of us would lie low.
   Claud. Who wrongs him?
   Leon. Marry, thou dost wrong me, thou dissembler, thou!
     Nay, never lay thy hand upon thy sword;
     I fear thee not.
   Claud. Mary, beshrew my hand
     If it should give your age such cause of fear.
     In faith, my hand meant nothing to my sword.
   Leon. Tush, tush, man! never fleer and jest at me
--**--**--
     But, on my honour, she was charg'd with nothing
     But what was true, and very full of proof.
   Leon. My lord, my lord--
   Pedro. I will not hear you.
   Leon. No? Come, brother, away!--I will be heard.
   Ant. And shall, or some of us will smart for it.
                                                     Exeunt ambo.
 
                   Enter Benedick.
 
   Pedro. See, see! Here comes the man we went to seek.
   Claud. Now, signior, what news?
   Bene. Good day, my lord.
   Pedro. Welcome, signior. You are almost come to part almost a fray.
   Claud. We had lik'd to have had our two noses snapp'd off with two
     old men without teeth.
   Pedro. Leonato and his brother. What think'st thou? Had we fought,
     I doubt we should have been too young for them.
   Bene. In a false quarrel there is no true valour. I came to seek
     you both.
   Claud. We have been up and down to seek thee; for we are high-proof
     melancholy, and would fain have it beaten away. Wilt thou use thy
     wit?
   Bene. It is in my scabbard. Shall I draw it?
   Pedro. Dost thou wear thy wit by thy side?
   Claud. Never any did so, though very many have been beside their
     wit. I will bid thee draw, as we do the minstrel--draw to
     pleasure us.
   Pedro. As I am an honest man, he looks pale. Art thou sick or
     angry?
   Claud. What, courage, man! What though care kill'd a cat, thou hast
     mettle enough in thee to kill care.
   Bene. Sir, I shall meet your wit in the career an you charge it
     against me. I pray you choose another subject.
   Claud. Nay then, give him another staff; this last was broke cross.
   Pedro. By this light, he changes more and more. I think he be angry
     indeed.
   Claud. If he be, he knows how to turn his girdle.
--**--**--
     by helping me to the speech of Beatrice.
   Marg. Will you then write me a sonnet in praise of my beauty?
   Bene. In so high a style, Margaret, that no man living shall come
     over it; for in most comely truth thou deservest it.
   Marg. To have no man come over me? Why, shall I always keep below
     stairs?
   Bene. Thy wit is as quick as the greyhound's mouth--it catches.
   Marg. And yours as blunt as the fencer's foils, which hit but hurt
     not.
   Bene. A most manly wit, Margaret: it will not hurt a woman.
     And so I pray thee call Beatrice. I give thee the bucklers.
   Marg. Give us the swords; we have bucklers of our own.
   Bene. If you use them, Margaret, you must put in the pikes with a
     vice, and they are dangerous weapons for maids.
   Marg. Well, I will call Beatrice to you, who I think hath legs.
   Bene. And therefore will come.
                                                   Exit Margaret.
        [Sings] The god of love,
                That sits above
            And knows me, and knows me,
              How pitiful I deserve--
 
     I mean in singing; but in loving Leander the good swimmer,
     Troilus the first employer of panders, and a whole book full of
     these quondam carpet-mongers, whose names yet run smoothly in the
     even road of a blank verse--why, they were never so truly turn'd
     over and over as my poor self in love. Marry, I cannot show it in
     rhyme. I have tried. I can find out no rhyme to 'lady' but 'baby'
     --an innocent rhyme; for 'scorn,' 'horn'--a hard rhyme; for
     'school', 'fool'--a babbling rhyme: very ominous endings! No, I
     was not born under a rhyming planet, nor cannot woo in festival
     terms.
 
                     Enter Beatrice.
 
     Sweet Beatrice, wouldst thou come when I call'd thee?
   Beat. Yea, signior, and depart when you bid me.
--**--**--
                                                 Dance. [Exeunt.]
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1605
 
 
 THE TRAGEDY OF OTHELLO, MOOR OF VENICE
 
 
 
 
 
 Dramatis Personae
 
   OTHELLO, the Moor, general of the Venetian forces
   DESDEMONA, his wife
   IAGO, ensign to Othello
   EMILIA, his wife, lady-in-waiting to Desdemona
   CASSIO, lieutenant to Othello
   THE DUKE OF VENICE
   BRABANTIO, Venetian Senator, father of Desdemona
   GRATIANO, nobleman of Venice, brother of Brabantio
   LODOVICO, nobleman of Venice, kinsman of Brabantio
   RODERIGO, rejected suitor of Desdemona
   BIANCA, mistress of Cassio
   MONTANO, a Cypriot official
   A Clown in service to Othello
   Senators, Sailors, Messengers, Officers, Gentlemen, Musicians, and
     Attendants
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE: Venice and Cyprus
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 Venice. A street.
 
 Enter Roderigo and Iago.
 
   RODERIGO. Tush, never tell me! I take it much unkindly
     That thou, Iago, who hast had my purse
     As if the strings were thine, shouldst know of this.
   IAGO. 'Sblood, but you will not hear me.
     If ever I did dream of such a matter,
     Abhor me.
   RODERIGO. Thou told'st me thou didst hold him in thy hate.
   IAGO. Despise me, if I do not. Three great ones of the city,
     In personal suit to make me his lieutenant,
     Off-capp'd to him; and, by the faith of man,
     I know my price, I am worth no worse a place.
     But he, as loving his own pride and purposes,
     Evades them, with a bumbast circumstance
     Horribly stuff'd with epithets of war,
     And, in conclusion,
     Nonsuits my mediators; for, "Certes," says he,
     "I have already chose my officer."
     And what was he?
     Forsooth, a great arithmetician,
     One Michael Cassio, a Florentine
     (A fellow almost damn'd in a fair wife)
     That never set a squadron in the field,
     Nor the division of a battle knows
     More than a spinster; unless the bookish theoric,
     Wherein the toged consuls can propose
     As masterly as he. Mere prattle without practice
--**--**--
     My daughter is not for thee; and now, in madness,
     Being full of supper and distempering draughts,
     Upon malicious bravery, dost thou come
     To start my quiet.
   RODERIGO. Sir, sir, sir-
   BRABANTIO.               But thou must needs be sure
     My spirit and my place have in them power
     To make this bitter to thee.
   RODERIGO.                      Patience, good sir.
   BRABANTIO. What tell'st thou me of robbing? This is Venice;
     My house is not a grange.
   RODERIGO.                   Most grave Brabantio,
     In simple and pure soul I come to you.
   IAGO. 'Zounds, sir, you are one of those that will not serve God,
     if the devil bid you. Because we come to do you service and you
     think we are ruffians, you'll have your daughter covered with a
     Barbary horse; you'll have your nephews neigh to you; you'll have
     coursers for cousins, and gennets for germans.
   BRABANTIO. What profane wretch art thou?
   IAGO. I am one, sir, that comes to tell you your daughter and the
     Moor are now making the beast with two backs.
   BRABANTIO. Thou are a villain.
   IAGO.                          You are- a senator.
   BRABANTIO. This thou shalt answer; I know thee, Roderigo.
   RODERIGO. Sir, I will answer anything. But, I beseech you,
     If't be your pleasure and most wise consent,
     As partly I find it is, that your fair daughter,
     At this odd-even and dull watch o' the night,
     Transported with no worse nor better guard
     But with a knave of common hire, a gondolier,
     To the gross clasps of a lascivious Moor-
     If this be known to you, and your allowance,
     We then have done you bold and saucy wrongs;
     But if you know not this, my manners tell me
     We have your wrong rebuke. Do not believe
     That, from the sense of all civility,
     I thus would play and trifle with your reverence.
--**--**--
 
                             Enter Sailor.
 
   DUKE.                                Now, what's the business?
   SAILOR. The Turkish preparation makes for Rhodes,
     So was I bid report here to the state
     By Signior Angelo.
   DUKE. How say you by this change?
   FIRST SENATOR.                    This cannot be,
     By no assay of reason; 'tis a pageant
     To keep us in false gaze. When we consider
     The importancy of Cyprus to the Turk,
     And let ourselves again but understand
     That as it more concerns the Turk than Rhodes,
     So may he with more facile question bear it,
     For that it stands not in such warlike brace,
     But altogether lacks the abilities
     That Rhodes is dress'd in. If we make thought of this,
     We must not think the Turk is so unskillful
     To leave that latest which concerns him first,
     Neglecting an attempt of ease and gain,
     To wake and wage a danger profitless.
   DUKE. Nay, in all confidence, he's not for Rhodes.
   FIRST OFFICER. Here is more news.
 
                           Enter a Messenger.
 
   MESSENGER. The Ottomites, reverend and gracious,
     Steering with due course toward the isle of Rhodes,
     Have there injointed them with an after fleet.
   FIRST SENATOR. Ay, so I thought. How many, as you guess?
   MESSENGER. Of thirty sail; and now they do re-stem
     Their backward course, bearing with frank appearance
     Their purposes toward Cyprus. Signior Montano,
     Your trusty and most valiant servitor,
     With his free duty recommends you thus,
     And prays you to believe him.
   DUKE. 'Tis certain then for Cyprus.
     Marcus Luccicos, is not he in town?
   FIRST SENATOR. He's now in Florence.
   DUKE. Write from us to him, post-post-haste dispatch.
   FIRST SENATOR. Here comes Brabantio and the valiant Moor.
 
        Enter Brabantio, Othello, Iago, Roderigo, and Officers.
 
   DUKE. Valiant Othello, we must straight employ you
     Against the general enemy Ottoman.
     [To Brabantio.] I did not see you; welcome, gentle signior;
--**--**--
     better stead thee than now. Put money in thy purse; follow thou
     the wars; defeat thy favor with an usurped beard. I say, put
     money in thy purse. It cannot be that Desdemona should long
     continue her love to the Moor- put money in thy purse- nor he his
     to her. It was a violent commencement, and thou shalt see an
     answerable sequestration- put but money in thy purse. These Moors
     are changeable in their wills- fill thy purse with money. The
     food that to him now is as luscious as locusts, shall be to him
     shortly as acerb as the coloquintida. She must change for youth;
     when she is sated with his body, she will find the error of her
     choice. She must have change, she must; therefore put money in
     thy purse. If thou wilt needs damn thyself, do it a more delicate
     way than drowning. Make all the money thou canst. If sanctimony
     and a frail vow betwixt an erring barbarian and a supersubtle
     Venetian be not too hard for my wits and all the tribe of hell,
     thou shalt enjoy her- therefore make money. A pox of drowning
     thyself! It is clean out of the way. Seek thou rather to be
     hanged in compassing thy joy than to be drowned and go without
     her.
   RODERIGO. Wilt thou be fast to my hopes, if I depend on the issue?
   IAGO. Thou art sure of me- go, make money. I have told thee often,
     and I retell thee again and again, I hate the Moor. My cause is
     hearted; thine hath no less reason. Let us be conjunctive in our
     revenge against him. If thou canst cuckold him, thou dost thyself
     a pleasure, me a sport. There are many events in the womb of time
     which will be delivered. Traverse, go, provide thy money. We will
--**--**--
   IAGO. Ay, madam.
   DESDEMONA. I am not merry, but I do beguile
     The thing I am by seeming otherwise.
     Come, how wouldst thou praise me?
   IAGO. I am about it, but indeed my invention
     Comes from my pate as birdlime does from frieze;
     It plucks out brains and all. But my Muse labors,
     And thus she is deliver'd.
     If she be fair and wise, fairness and wit,
     The one's for use, the other useth it.
   DESDEMONA. Well praised! How if she be black and witty?
   IAGO. If she be black, and thereto have a wit,
     She'll find a white that shall her blackness fit.
   DESDEMONA. Worse and worse.
   EMILIA. How if fair and foolish?
   IAGO. She never yet was foolish that was fair,
     For even her folly help'd her to an heir.
   DESDEMONA. These are old fond paradoxes to make fools laugh i' the
     alehouse. What miserable praise hast thou for her that's foul and
     foolish?
   IAGO. There's none so foul and foolish thereunto,
     But does foul pranks which fair and wise ones do.
   DESDEMONA. O heavy ignorance! Thou praisest the worst best. But what
     praise couldst thou bestow on a deserving woman indeed, one that
     in the authority of her merit did justly put on the vouch of very
     malice itself?
   IAGO. She that was ever fair and never proud,
     Had tongue at will and yet was never loud,
     Never lack'd gold and yet went never gay,
     Fled from her wish and yet said, "Now I may";
     She that, being anger'd, her revenge being nigh,
     Bade her wrong stay and her displeasure fly;
     She that in wisdom never was so frail
     To change the cod's head for the salmon's tail;
     She that could think and ne'er disclose her mind,
     See suitors following and not look behind;
     She was a wight, if ever such wight were-
--**--**--
 
 SCENE III.
 A hall in the castle.
 
 Enter Othello, Desdemona, Cassio, and Attendants.
 
   OTHELLO. Good Michael, look you to the guard tonight.
     Let's teach ourselves that honorable stop,
     Not to outsport discretion.
   CASSIO. Iago hath direction what to do;
     But notwithstanding with my personal eye
     Will I look to't.
   OTHELLO.            Iago is most honest.
     Michael, good night. Tomorrow with your earliest
     Let me have speech with you. Come, my dear love,
     The purchase made, the fruits are to ensue;
     That profit's yet to come 'tween me and you.
     Good night.
                            Exeunt Othello, Desdemona, and Attendants.
 
                              Enter Iago.
 
   CASSIO. Welcome, Iago; we must to the watch.
   IAGO. Not this hour, lieutenant; 'tis not yet ten o' the clock. Our
     general cast us thus early for the love of his Desdemona; who let
     us not therefore blame. He hath not yet made wanton the night
     with her, and she is sport for Jove.
   CASSIO. She's a most exquisite lady.
   IAGO. And, I'll warrant her, full of game.
   CASSIO. Indeed she's a most fresh and delicate creature.
   IAGO. What an eye she has! Methinks it sounds a parley to
     provocation.
   CASSIO. An inviting eye; and yet methinks right modest.
   IAGO. And when she speaks, is it not an alarum to love?
   CASSIO. She is indeed perfection.
   IAGO. Well, happiness to their sheets! Come, lieutenant, I have a
     stope of wine, and here without are a brace of Cyprus gallants
     that would fain have a measure to the health of black Othello.
   CASSIO. Not tonight, good Iago. I have very poor and unhappy brains
     for drinking. I could well wish courtesy would invent some other
     custom of entertainment.
   IAGO. O, they are our friends! But one cup; I'll drink for you.
   CASSIO. I have drunk but one cup tonight, and that was craftily
--**--**--
     From him that fled some strange indignity,
     Which patience could not pass.
   OTHELLO.                         I know, Iago,
     Thy honesty and love doth mince this matter,
     Making it light to Cassio. Cassio, I love thee,
     But never more be officer of mine.
 
                     Re-enter Desdemona, attended.
 
     Look, if my gentle love be not raised up!
     I'll make thee an example.
   DESDEMONA.                   What's the matter?
   OTHELLO. All's well now, sweeting; come away to bed.
     Sir, for your hurts, myself will be your surgeon.
     Lead him off.                             Exit Montano, attended.
     Iago, look with care about the town,
     And silence those whom this vile brawl distracted.
     Come, Desdemona, 'tis the soldiers' life.
     To have their balmy slumbers waked with strife.
                                       Exeunt all but Iago and Cassio.
   IAGO. What, are you hurt, lieutenant?
   CASSIO. Ay, past all surgery.
   IAGO. Marry, heaven forbid!
   CASSIO. Reputation, reputation, reputation! O, I have lost my
     reputation! I have lost the immortal part of myself, and what
     remains is bestial. My reputation, Iago, my reputation!
   IAGO. As I am an honest man, I thought you had received some bodily
     wound; there is more sense in that than in reputation. Reputation
     is an idle and most false imposition; oft got without merit and
     lost without deserving. You have lost no reputation at all,
     unless you repute yourself such a loser. What, man! there are
     ways to recover the general again. You are but now cast in his
     mood, a punishment more in policy than in malice; even so as one
     would beat his offenseless dog to affright an imperious lion. Sue
     to him again, and he's yours.
   CASSIO. I will rather sue to be despised than to deceive so good a
     commander with so slight, so drunken, and so indiscreet an
     officer. Drunk? and speak parrot? and squabble? swagger? swear?
     and discourse fustian with one's own shadow? O thou invisible
--**--**--
   IAGO. You are in the right. Good night, lieutenant, I must to the
     watch.
   CASSIO. Good night, honest Iago.                              Exit.
   IAGO. And what's he then that says I play the villain?
     When this advice is free I give and honest,
     Probal to thinking, and indeed the course
     To win the Moor again? For 'tis most easy
     The inclining Desdemona to subdue
     In any honest suit. She's framed as fruitful
     As the free elements. And then for her
     To win the Moor, were't to renounce his baptism,
     All seals and symbols of redeemed sin,
     His soul is so enfetter'd to her love,
     That she may make, unmake, do what she list,
     Even as her appetite shall play the god
     With his weak function. How am I then a villain
     To counsel Cassio to this parallel course,
     Directly to his good? Divinity of hell!
     When devils will the blackest sins put on,
     They do suggest at first with heavenly shows,
     As I do now. For whiles this honest fool
     Plies Desdemona to repair his fortune,
     And she for him pleads strongly to the Moor,
     I'll pour this pestilence into his ear,
     That she repeals him for her body's lust;
     And by how much she strives to do him good,
     She shall undo her credit with the Moor.
     So will I turn her virtue into pitch,
     And out of her own goodness make the net
     That shall enmesh them all.
 
                            Enter Roderigo.
 
                                 How now, Roderigo!
   RODERIGO. I do follow here in the chase, not like a hound that
     hunts, but one that fills up the cry. My money is almost spent; I
     have been tonight exceedingly well cudgeled; and I think the
     issue will be, I shall have so much experience for my pains; and
     so, with no money at all and a little more wit, return again to
--**--**--
     That he would steal away so guilty-like,
     Seeing you coming.
   OTHELLO.             I do believe 'twas he.
   DESDEMONA. How now, my lord!
     I have been talking with a suitor here,
     A man that languishes in your displeasure.
   OTHELLO. Who is't you mean?
   DESDEMONA. Why, your lieutenant, Cassio. Good my lord,
     If I have any grace or power to move you,
     His present reconciliation take;
     For if he be not one that truly loves you,
     That errs in ignorance and not in cunning,
     I have no judgement in an honest face.
     I prithee, call him back.
   OTHELLO.                    Went he hence now?
   DESDEMONA. Ay, sooth; so humbled
     That he hath left part of his grief with me
     To suffer with him. Good love, call him back.
   OTHELLO. Not now, sweet Desdemona; some other time.
   DESDEMONA. But shall't be shortly?
   OTHELLO.                           The sooner, sweet, for you.
   DESDEMONA. Shall't be tonight at supper?
   OTHELLO.                                 No, not tonight.
   DESDEMONA. Tomorrow dinner then?
   OTHELLO.                         I shall not dine at home;
     I meet the captains at the citadel.
   DESDEMONA. Why then tomorrow night, or Tuesday morn,
     On Tuesday noon, or night, on Wednesday morn.
     I prithee, name the time, but let it not
     Exceed three days. In faith, he's penitent;
     And yet his trespass, in our common reason-
     Save that, they say, the wars must make example
     Out of their best- is not almost a fault
     To incur a private check. When shall he come?
     Tell me, Othello. I wonder in my soul,
     What you would ask me, that I should deny,
     Or stand so mammering on. What? Michael Cassio,
     That came awooing with you, and so many a time
     When I have spoke of you dispraisingly
     Hath ta'en your part- to have so much to do
     To bring him in! Trust me, I could do much-
--**--**--
     To kiss and talk to. I'll have the work ta'en out,
     And give't Iago. What he will do with it
     Heaven knows, not I;
     I nothing but to please his fantasy.
 
                             Re-enter Iago.
 
   IAGO. How now, what do you here alone?
   EMILIA. Do not you chide; I have a thing for you.
   IAGO. A thing for me? It is a common thing-
   EMILIA. Ha!
   IAGO. To have a foolish wife.
   EMILIA. O, is that all? What will you give me now
     For that same handkerchief?
   IAGO.                         What handkerchief?
   EMILIA. What handkerchief?
     Why, that the Moor first gave to Desdemona,
     That which so often you did bid me steal.
   IAGO. Hast stol'n it from her?
   EMILIA. No, faith; she let it drop by negligence,
     And, to the advantage, I being here took't up.
     Look, here it is.
   IAGO.               A good wench; give it me.
   EMILIA. What will you do with't, that you have been so earnest
     To have me filch it?
   IAGO. [Snatching it.] Why, what is that to you?
   EMILIA. If't be not for some purpose of import,
     Give't me again. Poor lady, she'll run mad
     When she shall lack it.
   IAGO. Be not acknown on't; I have use for it.
     Go, leave me.                                        Exit Emilia.
     I will in Cassio's lodging lose this napkin,
     And let him find it. Trifles light as air
     Are to the jealous confirmations strong
     As proofs of holy writ; this may do something.
     The Moor already changes with my poison:
     Dangerous conceits are in their natures poisons,
     Which at the first are scarce found to distaste,
     But with a little act upon the blood
     Burn like the mines of sulphur. I did say so.
     Look, where he comes!
 
                           Re-enter Othello.
 
                           Not poppy, nor mandragora,
     Nor all the drowsy syrups of the world,
     Shall ever medicine thee to that sweet sleep
--**--**--
     Which lead directly to the door of truth,
     Will give you satisfaction, you may have't.
   OTHELLO. Give me a living reason she's disloyal.
   IAGO. I do not like the office;
     But sith I am enter'd in this cause so far,
     Prick'd to't by foolish honesty and love,
     I will go on. I lay with Cassio lately
     And, being troubled with a raging tooth,
     I could not sleep.
     There are a kind of men so loose of soul,
     That in their sleeps will mutter their affairs;
     One of this kind is Cassio.
     In sleep I heard him say, "Sweet Desdemona,
     Let us be wary, let us hide our loves";
     And then, sir, would he gripe and wring my hand,
     Cry, "O sweet creature!" and then kiss me hard,
     As if he pluck'd up kisses by the roots,
     That grew upon my lips; then laid his leg
     Over my thigh, and sigh'd and kiss'd; and then
     Cried, "Cursed fate that gave thee to the Moor!"
   OTHELLO. O monstrous! monstrous!
   IAGO.                            Nay, this was but his dream.
   OTHELLO. But this denoted a foregone conclusion.
     'Tis a shrewd doubt, though it be but a dream.
   IAGO. And this may help to thicken other proofs
     That do demonstrate thinly.
   OTHELLO.                      I'll tear her all to pieces.
   IAGO. Nay, but be wise; yet we see nothing done;
     She may be honest yet. Tell me but this;
     Have you not sometimes seen a handkerchief
     Spotted with strawberries in your wife's hand?
   OTHELLO. I gave her such a one; 'twas my first gift.
   IAGO. I know not that; but such a handkerchief-
     I am sure it was your wife's- did I today
     See Cassio wipe his beard with.
   OTHELLO.                          If it be that-
   IAGO. If it be that, or any that was hers,
     It speaks against her with the other proofs.
--**--**--
   OTHELLO. Fetch't, let me see it.
   DESDEMONA. Why, so I can, sir, but I will not now.
     This is a trick to put me from my suit.
     Pray you, let Cassio be received again.
   OTHELLO. Fetch me the handkerchief, my mind misgives.
   DESDEMONA. Come, come,
     You'll never meet a more sufficient man.
   OTHELLO. The handkerchief!
   DESDEMONA.                 I pray, talk me of Cassio.
   OTHELLO. The handkerchief!
   DESDEMONA.                 A man that all his time
     Hath founded his good fortunes on your love,
     Shared dangers with you-
   OTHELLO. The handkerchief!
   DESDEMONA. In sooth, you are to blame.
   OTHELLO. Away!                                                Exit.
   EMILIA. Is not this man jealous?
   DESDEMONA. I ne'er saw this before.
     Sure there's some wonder in this handkerchief;
     I am most unhappy in the loss of it.
   EMILIA. 'Tis not a year or two shows us a man.
     They are all but stomachs and we all but food;
     They eat us hungerly, and when they are full
     They belch us. Look you! Cassio and my husband.
 
                         Enter Cassio and Iago.
 
   IAGO. There is no other way; 'tis she must do't.
     And, lo, the happiness! Go and importune her.
   DESDEMONA. How now, good Cassio! What's the news with you?
   CASSIO. Madam, my former suit: I do beseech you
     That by your virtuous means I may again
     Exist and be a member of his love
     Whom I with all the office of my heart
     Entirely honor. I would not be delay'd.
     If my offense be of such mortal kind
     That nor my service past nor present sorrows
     Nor purposed merit in futurity
     Can ransom me into his love again,
     But to know so must be my benefit;
     So shall I clothe me in a forced content
     And shut myself up in some other course
     To Fortune's alms.
   DESDEMONA.           Alas, thrice-gentle Cassio!
     My advocation is not now in tune;
--**--**--
 
     What do you mean by this haunting of me?
   BIANCA. Let the devil and his dam haunt you! What did you mean by
     that same handkerchief you gave me even now? I was a fine fool to
     take it. I must take out the work? A likely piece of work that
     you should find it in your chamber and not know who left it
     there! This is some minx's token, and I must take out the work?
     There, give it your hobbyhorse. Wheresoever you had it, I'll take
     out no work on't.
   CASSIO. How now, my sweet Bianca! how now! how now!
   OTHELLO. By heaven, that should be my handkerchief!
   BIANCA. An you'll come to supper tonight, you may; an you will not,
     come when you are next prepared for.                        Exit.
   IAGO. After her, after her.
   CASSIO. Faith, I must; she'll rail i' the street else.
   IAGO. Will you sup there?
   CASSIO. Faith, I intend so.
   IAGO. Well, I may chance to see you, for I would very fain speak
     with you.
   CASSIO. Prithee, come; will you?
   IAGO. Go to; say no more.                              Exit Cassio.
   OTHELLO. [Advancing.] How shall I murther him, Iago?
   IAGO. Did you perceive how he laughed at his vice?
   OTHELLO. O Iago!
   IAGO. And did you see the handkerchief?
   OTHELLO. Was that mine?
   IAGO. Yours, by this hand. And to see how he prizes the foolish
     woman your wife! She gave it him, and he hath given it his whore.
   OTHELLO. I would have him nine years akilling. A fine woman! a fair
     woman! a sweet woman!
   IAGO. Nay, you must forget that.
   OTHELLO. Ay, let her rot, and perish, and be damned tonight, for
     she shall not live. No, my heart is turned to stone; I strike it,
     and it hurts my hand. O, the world hath not a sweeter creature.
--**--**--
   DESDEMONA.               Heaven doth truly know it.
   OTHELLO. Heaven truly knows that thou art false as hell.
   DESDEMONA. To whom, my lord? with whom? how am I false?
   OTHELLO. O Desdemona! Away! away! away!
   DESDEMONA. Alas the heavy day! Why do you weep?
     Am I the motive of these tears, my lord?
     If haply you my father do suspect
     An instrument of this your calling back,
     Lay not your blame on me. If you have lost him,
     Why, I have lost him too.
   OTHELLO.                    Had it pleased heaven
     To try me with affliction, had they rain'd
     All kinds of sores and shames on my bare head,
     Steep'd me in poverty to the very lips,
     Given to captivity me and my utmost hopes,
     I should have found in some place of my soul
     A drop of patience; but, alas, to make me
     A fixed figure for the time of scorn
     To point his slow unmoving finger at!
     Yet could I bear that too, well, very well;
     But there, where I have garner'd up my heart,
     Where either I must live or bear no life;
     The fountain from the which my current runs,
     Or else dries up; to be discarded thence!
     Or keep it as a cistern for foul toads
     To knot and gender in! Turn thy complexion there,
     Patience, thou young and rose-lipp'd cherubin,
     Ay, there, look grim as hell!
   DESDEMONA. I hope my noble lord esteems me honest.
   OTHELLO. O, ay, as summer flies are in the shambles,
     That quicken even with blowing. O thou weed,
     Who art so lovely fair and smell'st so sweet
     That the sense aches at thee, would thou hadst ne'er been born!
   DESDEMONA. Alas, what ignorant sin have I committed?
   OTHELLO. Was this fair paper, this most goodly book,
     Made to write "whore" upon? What committed?
--**--**--
   EMILIA. Why, with my lord, madam.
   DESDEMONA. Who is thy lord?
   EMILIA.                     He that is yours, sweet lady.
   DESDEMONA. I have none. Do not talk to me, Emilia;
     I cannot weep, nor answer have I none
     But what should go by water. Prithee, tonight
     Lay on my bed my wedding sheets. Remember,
     And call thy husband hither.
   EMILIA.                        Here's a change indeed!
      Exit.
   DESDEMONA. 'Tis meet I should be used so, very meet.
     How have I been behaved, that he might stick
     The small'st opinion on my least misuse?
 
                       Re-enter Emilia with Iago.
 
   IAGO. What is your pleasure, madam? How is't with you?
   DESDEMONA. I cannot tell. Those that do teach young babes
     Do it with gentle means and easy tasks.
     He might have chid me so, for in good faith,
     I am a child to chiding.
   IAGO.                      What's the matter, lady?
   EMILIA. Alas, Iago, my lord hath so bewhored her,
     Thrown such despite and heavy terms upon her,
     As true hearts cannot bear.
   DESDEMONA. Am I that name, Iago?
   IAGO.                            What name, fair lady?
   DESDEMONA. Such as she says my lord did say I was.
   EMILIA. He call'd her whore; a beggar in his drink
     Could not have laid such terms upon his callet.
   IAGO. Why did he so?
   DESDEMONA. I do not know; I am sure I am none such.
   IAGO. Do not weep, do not weep. Alas the day!
   EMILIA. Hath she forsook so many noble matches,
     Her father and her country and her friends,
     To be call'd whore? Would it not make one weep?
   DESDEMONA. It is my wretched fortune.
   IAGO.                                 Beshrew him for't!
     How comes this trick upon him?
   DESDEMONA.                       Nay, heaven doth know.
   EMILIA. I will be hang'd, if some eternal villain,
     Some busy and insinuating rogue,
     Some cogging, cozening slave, to get some office,
--**--**--
 
 ACT V. SCENE I.
 Cyprus. A street.
 
 Enter Iago and Roderigo:
 
   IAGO. Here, stand behind this bulk; straight will he come.
     Wear thy good rapier bare, and put it home.
     Quick, quick; fear nothing; I'll be at thy elbow.
     It makes us, or it mars us; think on that,
     And fix most firm thy resolution.
   RODERIGO. Be near at hand; I may miscarry in't.
   IAGO. Here, at thy hand, be bold, and take thy stand.
   Retires.
   RODERIGO. I have no great devotion to the deed;
     And yet he hath given me satisfying reasons.
     'Tis but a man gone. Forth, my sword; he dies.
   IAGO. I have rubb'd this young quat almost to the sense,
     And he grows angry. Now, whether he kill Cassio,
     Or Cassio him, or each do kill the other,
     Every way makes my gain. Live Roderigo,
     He calls me to a restitution large
     Of gold and jewels that I bobb'd from him,
     As gifts to Desdemona;
     It must not be. If Cassio do remain,
     He hath a daily beauty in his life
     That makes me ugly; and besides, the Moor
     May unfold me to him; there stand I in much peril.
     No, he must die. Be't so. I hear him coming.
 
                             Enter Cassio.
 
   RODERIGO. I know his gait; 'tis he. Villain, thou diest!
                                               Makes a pass at Cassio.
   CASSIO. That thrust had been mine enemy indeed,
     But that my coat is better than thou know'st;
     I will make proof of thine.           Draws, and wounds Roderigo.
   RODERIGO.                     O, I am slain!
             Iago from behind wounds Cassio in the leg, and exit.
   CASSIO. I am maim'd forever. Help, ho! Murther! Murther!
     Falls.
 
                             Enter Othello.
 
   OTHELLO. The voice of Cassio; Iago keeps his word.
   RODERIGO. O, villain that I am!
   OTHELLO.                        It is even so.
   CASSIO. O, help, ho! Light! A surgeon!
--**--**--
   DESDEMONA. A guiltless death I die.
   EMILIA. O, who hath done this deed?
   DESDEMONA. Nobody; I myself. Farewell;
     Commend me to my kind lord. O, farewell!                    Dies.
   OTHELLO. Why, how should she be murther'd?
   EMILIA.                                    Alas, who knows?
   OTHELLO. You heard her say herself, it was not I.
   EMILIA. She said so; I must needs report the truth.
   OTHELLO. She's like a liar gone to burning hell;
     'Twas I that kill'd her.
   EMILIA.                    O, the more angel she,
     And you the blacker devil!
   OTHELLO. She turn'd to folly, and she was a whore.
   EMILIA. Thou dost belie her, and thou art a devil.
   OTHELLO. She was false as water.
   EMILIA.                          Thou art rash as fire, to say
     That she was false. O, she was heavenly true!
   OTHELLO. Cassio did top her; ask thy husband else.
     O, I were damn'd beneath all depth in hell,
     But that I did proceed upon just grounds
     To this extremity. Thy husband knew it all.
   EMILIA. My husband?
   OTHELLO. Thy husband.
   EMILIA. That she was false to wedlock?
   OTHELLO. Ay, with Cassio. Nay, had she been true,
     If heaven would make me such another world
     Of one entire and perfect chrysolite,
     I'ld not have sold her for it.
   EMILIA.                          My husband?
   OTHELLO. Ay, 'twas he that told me first.
     An honest man he is, and hates the slime
     That sticks on filthy deeds.
   EMILIA.                        My husband?
   OTHELLO. What needs this iteration, woman? I say thy husband.
   EMILIA. O mistress, villainy hath made mocks with love!
     My husband say that she was false!
   OTHELLO.                             He, woman;
     I say thy husband. Dost understand the word?
     My friend, thy husband, honest, honest Iago.
   EMILIA. If he say so, may his pernicious soul
     Rot half a grain a day! He lies to the heart.
     She was too fond of her most filthy bargain.
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 
 SCENE:
 England and Wales
 
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 London. The palace
 
 Enter RICHARD, JOHN OF GAUNT, with other NOBLES and attendants
 
   KING RICHARD. Old John of Gaunt, time-honoured Lancaster,
     Hast thou, according to thy oath and band,
     Brought hither Henry Hereford, thy bold son,
     Here to make good the boist'rous late appeal,
     Which then our leisure would not let us hear,
     Against the Duke of Norfolk, Thomas Mowbray?
   GAUNT. I have, my liege.
   KING RICHARD. Tell me, moreover, hast thou sounded him
     If he appeal the Duke on ancient malice,
     Or worthily, as a good subject should,
     On some known ground of treachery in him?
   GAUNT. As near as I could sift him on that argument,
     On some apparent danger seen in him
     Aim'd at your Highness-no inveterate malice.
   KING RICHARD. Then call them to our presence: face to face
     And frowning brow to brow, ourselves will hear
     The accuser and the accused freely speak.
     High-stomach'd are they both and full of ire,
     In rage, deaf as the sea, hasty as fire.
 
          Enter BOLINGBROKE and MOWBRAY
 
   BOLINGBROKE. Many years of happy days befall
     My gracious sovereign, my most loving liege!
   MOWBRAY. Each day still better other's happiness
     Until the heavens, envying earth's good hap,
     Add an immortal title to your crown!
   KING RICHARD. We thank you both; yet one but flatters us,
     As well appeareth by the cause you come;
     Namely, to appeal each other of high treason.
     Cousin of Hereford, what dost thou object
     Against the Duke of Norfolk, Thomas Mowbray?
   BOLINGBROKE. First-heaven be the record to my speech!
     In the devotion of a subject's love,
     Tend'ring the precious safety of my prince,
     And free from other misbegotten hate,
     Come I appellant to this princely presence.
     Now, Thomas Mowbray, do I turn to thee,
     And mark my greeting well; for what I speak
--**--**--
     Take honour from me, and my life is done:
     Then, dear my liege, mine honour let me try;
     In that I live, and for that will I die.
   KING RICHARD. Cousin, throw up your gage; do you begin.
   BOLINGBROKE. O, God defend my soul from such deep sin!
     Shall I seem crest-fallen in my father's sight?
     Or with pale beggar-fear impeach my height
     Before this outdar'd dastard? Ere my tongue
     Shall wound my honour with such feeble wrong
     Or sound so base a parle, my teeth shall tear
     The slavish motive of recanting fear,
     And spit it bleeding in his high disgrace,
     Where shame doth harbour, even in Mowbray's face.
                                                       Exit GAUNT
   KING RICHARD. We were not born to sue, but to command;
     Which since we cannot do to make you friends,
     Be ready, as your lives shall answer it,
     At Coventry, upon Saint Lambert's day.
     There shall your swords and lances arbitrate
     The swelling difference of your settled hate;
     Since we can not atone you, we shall see
     Justice design the victor's chivalry.
     Lord Marshal, command our officers-at-arms
     Be ready to direct these home alarms.                 Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 2.
 London. The DUKE OF LANCASTER'S palace
 
 Enter JOHN OF GAUNT with the DUCHESS OF GLOUCESTER
 
   GAUNT. Alas, the part I had in Woodstock's blood
     Doth more solicit me than your exclaims
     To stir against the butchers of his life!
     But since correction lieth in those hands
     Which made the fault that we cannot correct,
     Put we our quarrel to the will of heaven;
     Who, when they see the hours ripe on earth,
     Will rain hot vengeance on offenders' heads.
   DUCHESS. Finds brotherhood in thee no sharper spur?
     Hath love in thy old blood no living fire?
     Edward's seven sons, whereof thyself art one,
     Were as seven vials of his sacred blood,
--**--**--
   GAUNT. Sister, farewell; I must to Coventry.
     As much good stay with thee as go with me!
   DUCHESS. Yet one word more- grief boundeth where it falls,
     Not with the empty hollowness, but weight.
     I take my leave before I have begun,
     For sorrow ends not when it seemeth done.
     Commend me to thy brother, Edmund York.
     Lo, this is all- nay, yet depart not so;
     Though this be all, do not so quickly go;
     I shall remember more. Bid him- ah, what?-
     With all good speed at Plashy visit me.
     Alack, and what shall good old York there see
     But empty lodgings and unfurnish'd walls,
     Unpeopled offices, untrodden stones?
     And what hear there for welcome but my groans?
     Therefore commend me; let him not come there
     To seek out sorrow that dwells every where.
     Desolate, desolate, will I hence and die;
     The last leave of thee takes my weeping eye.          Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 3.
 The lists at Coventry
 
 Enter the LORD MARSHAL and the DUKE OF AUMERLE
 
   MARSHAL. My Lord Aumerle, is Harry Hereford arm'd?
   AUMERLE. Yea, at all points; and longs to enter in.
   MARSHAL. The Duke of Norfolk, spightfully and bold,
     Stays but the summons of the appelant's trumpet.
   AUMERLE. Why then, the champions are prepar'd, and stay
     For nothing but his Majesty's approach.
 
      The trumpets sound, and the KING enters with his nobles,
      GAUNT, BUSHY, BAGOT, GREEN, and others. When they are set,
      enter MOWBRAY, Duke of Nor folk, in arms, defendant, and
      a HERALD
 
   KING RICHARD. Marshal, demand of yonder champion
     The cause of his arrival here in arms;
     Ask him his name; and orderly proceed
     To swear him in the justice of his cause.
   MARSHAL. In God's name and the King's, say who thou art,
     And why thou comest thus knightly clad in arms;
--**--**--
   MARSHAL. [To an officer] Go bear this lance to Thomas,
       Duke of Norfolk.
   FIRST HERALD. Harry of Hereford, Lancaster, and Derby,
     Stands here for God, his sovereign, and himself,
     On pain to be found false and recreant,
     To prove the Duke of Norfolk, Thomas Mowbray,
     A traitor to his God, his King, and him;
     And dares him to set forward to the fight.
   SECOND HERALD. Here standeth Thomas Mowbray, Duke of Norfolk,
     On pain to be found false and recreant,
     Both to defend himself, and to approve
     Henry of Hereford, Lancaster, and Derby,
     To God, his sovereign, and to him disloyal,
     Courageously and with a free desire
     Attending but the signal to begin.
   MARSHAL. Sound trumpets; and set forward, combatants.
                                            [A charge sounded]
     Stay, the King hath thrown his warder down.
   KING RICHARD. Let them lay by their helmets and their spears,
     And both return back to their chairs again.
     Withdraw with us; and let the trumpets sound
     While we return these dukes what we decree.
 
     A long flourish, while the KING consults his Council
 
     Draw near,
     And list what with our council we have done.
     For that our kingdom's earth should not be soil'd
     With that dear blood which it hath fostered;
     And for our eyes do hate the dire aspect
     Of civil wounds plough'd up with neighbours' sword;
     And for we think the eagle-winged pride
     Of sky-aspiring and ambitious thoughts,
     With rival-hating envy, set on you
     To wake our peace, which in our country's cradle
     Draws the sweet infant breath of gentle sleep;
     Which so rous'd up with boist'rous untun'd drums,
     With harsh-resounding trumpets' dreadful bray,
     And grating shock of wrathful iron arms,
     Might from our quiet confines fright fair peace
     And make us wade even in our kindred's blood-
     Therefore we banish you our territories.
     You, cousin Hereford, upon pain of life,
--**--**--
     Shall be extinct with age and endless night;
     My inch of taper will be burnt and done,
     And blindfold death not let me see my son.
   KING RICHARD. Why, uncle, thou hast many years to live.
   GAUNT. But not a minute, King, that thou canst give:
     Shorten my days thou canst with sullen sorrow
     And pluck nights from me, but not lend a morrow;
     Thou can'st help time to furrow me with age,
     But stop no wrinkle in his pilgrimage;
     Thy word is current with him for my death,
     But dead, thy kingdom cannot buy my breath.
   KING RICHARD. Thy son is banish'd upon good advice,
     Whereto thy tongue a party-verdict gave.
     Why at our justice seem'st thou then to lour?
   GAUNT. Things sweet to taste prove in digestion sour.
     You urg'd me as a judge; but I had rather
     You would have bid me argue like a father.
     O, had it been a stranger, not my child,
     To smooth his fault I should have been more mild.
     A partial slander sought I to avoid,
     And in the sentence my own life destroy'd.
     Alas, I look'd when some of you should say
     I was too strict to make mine own away;
     But you gave leave to my unwilling tongue
     Against my will to do myself this wrong.
   KING RICHARD. Cousin, farewell; and, uncle, bid him so.
     Six years we banish him, and he shall go.
                                   Flourish. Exit KING with train
   AUMERLE. Cousin, farewell; what presence must not know,
     From where you do remain let paper show.
   MARSHAL. My lord, no leave take I, for I will ride
     As far as land will let me by your side.
   GAUNT. O, to what purpose dost thou hoard thy words,
     That thou returnest no greeting to thy friends?
   BOLINGBROKE. I have too few to take my leave of you,
--**--**--
     And liberal largess, are grown somewhat light,
     We are enforc'd to farm our royal realm;
     The revenue whereof shall furnish us
     For our affairs in hand. If that come short,
     Our substitutes at home shall have blank charters;
     Whereto, when they shall know what men are rich,
     They shall subscribe them for large sums of gold,
     And send them after to supply our wants;
     For we will make for Ireland presently.
 
                      Enter BUSHY
 
     Bushy, what news?
   BUSHY. Old John of Gaunt is grievous sick, my lord,
     Suddenly taken; and hath sent poste-haste
     To entreat your Majesty to visit him.
   KING RICHARD. Where lies he?
   BUSHY. At Ely House.
   KING RICHARD. Now put it, God, in the physician's mind
     To help him to his grave immediately!
     The lining of his coffers shall make coats
     To deck our soldiers for these Irish wars.
     Come, gentlemen, let's all go visit him.
     Pray God we may make haste, and come too late!
   ALL. Amen.                                              Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT II. SCENE I.
 London. Ely House
 
 Enter JOHN OF GAUNT, sick, with the DUKE OF YORK, etc.
 
   GAUNT. Will the King come, that I may breathe my last
     In wholesome counsel to his unstaid youth?
   YORK. Vex not yourself, nor strive not with your breath;
     For all in vain comes counsel to his ear.
   GAUNT. O, but they say the tongues of dying men
     Enforce attention like deep harmony.
     Where words are scarce, they are seldom spent in vain;
     For they breathe truth that breathe their words -in pain.
     He that no more must say is listen'd more
     Than they whom youth and ease have taught to glose;
     More are men's ends mark'd than their lives before.
     The setting sun, and music at the close,
     As the last taste of sweets, is sweetest last,
     Writ in remembrance more than things long past.
--**--**--
     O Richard! York is too far gone with grief,
     Or else he never would compare between-
   KING RICHARD. Why, uncle, what's the matter?
   YORK. O my liege,
     Pardon me, if you please; if not, I, pleas'd
     Not to be pardoned, am content withal.
     Seek you to seize and gripe into your hands
     The royalties and rights of banish'd Hereford?
     Is not Gaunt dead? and doth not Hereford live?
     Was not Gaunt just? and is not Harry true?
     Did not the one deserve to have an heir?
     Is not his heir a well-deserving son?
     Take Hereford's rights away, and take from Time
     His charters and his customary rights;
     Let not to-morrow then ensue to-day;
     Be not thyself-for how art thou a king
     But by fair sequence and succession?
     Now, afore God-God forbid I say true!-
     If you do wrongfully seize Hereford's rights,
     Call in the letters patents that he hath
     By his attorneys-general to sue
     His livery, and deny his off'red homage,
     You pluck a thousand dangers on your head,
     You lose a thousand well-disposed hearts,
     And prick my tender patience to those thoughts
     Which honour and allegiance cannot think.
   KING RICHARD. Think what you will, we seize into our hands
     His plate, his goods, his money, and his lands.
   YORK. I'll not be by the while. My liege, farewell.
     What will ensue hereof there's none can tell;
     But by bad courses may be understood
     That their events can never fall out good.              Exit
   KING RICHARD. Go, Bushy, to the Earl of Wiltshire straight;
     Bid him repair to us to Ely House
     To see this business. To-morrow next
     We will for Ireland; and 'tis time, I trow.
     And we create, in absence of ourself,
     Our Uncle York Lord Governor of England;
     For he is just, and always lov'd us well.
--**--**--
     The King had cut off my head with my brother's.
     What, are there no posts dispatch'd for Ireland?
     How shall we do for money for these wars?
     Come, sister-cousin, I would say-pray, pardon me.
     Go, fellow, get thee home, provide some carts,
     And bring away the armour that is there.
                                                  Exit SERVINGMAN
     Gentlemen, will you go muster men?
     If I know how or which way to order these affairs
     Thus disorderly thrust into my hands,
     Never believe me. Both are my kinsmen.
     T'one is my sovereign, whom both my oath
     And duty bids defend; t'other again
     Is my kinsman, whom the King hath wrong'd,
     Whom conscience and my kindred bids to right.
     Well, somewhat we must do.-Come, cousin,
     I'll dispose of you. Gentlemen, go muster up your men
     And meet me presently at Berkeley.
     I should to Plashy too,
     But time will not permit. All is uneven,
     And everything is left at six and seven.
                                            Exeunt YORK and QUEEN
   BUSHY. The wind sits fair for news to go to Ireland.
     But none returns. For us to levy power
     Proportionable to the enemy
     Is all unpossible.
   GREEN. Besides, our nearness to the King in love
     Is near the hate of those love not the King.
   BAGOT. And that is the wavering commons; for their love
     Lies in their purses; and whoso empties them,
     By so much fills their hearts with deadly hate.
   BUSHY. Wherein the King stands generally condemn'd.
   BAGOT. If judgment lie in them, then so do we,
     Because we ever have been near the King.
   GREEN. Well, I will for refuge straight to Bristow Castle.
     The Earl of Wiltshire is already there.
   BUSHY. Thither will I with you; for little office
     Will the hateful commons perform for us,
     Except Eke curs to tear us all to pieces.
     Will you go along with us?
--**--**--
 
   CAPTAIN. My Lord of Salisbury, we have stay'd ten days
     And hardly kept our countrymen together,
     And yet we hear no tidings from the King;
     Therefore we will disperse ourselves. Farewell.
   SALISBURY. Stay yet another day, thou trusty Welshman;
     The King reposeth all his confidence in thee.
   CAPTAIN. 'Tis thought the King is dead; we will not stay.
     The bay trees in our country are all wither'd,
     And meteors fright the fixed stars of heaven;
     The pale-fac'd moon looks bloody on the earth,
     And lean-look'd prophets whisper fearful change;
     Rich men look sad, and ruffians dance and leap-
     The one in fear to lose what they enjoy,
     The other to enjoy by rage and war.
     These signs forerun the death or fall of kings.
     Farewell. Our countrymen are gone and fled,
     As well assur'd Richard their King is dead.             Exit
   SALISBURY. Ah, Richard, with the eyes of heavy mind,
     I see thy glory like a shooting star
     Fall to the base earth from the firmament!
     The sun sets weeping in the lowly west,
     Witnessing storms to come, woe, and unrest;
     Thy friends are fled, to wait upon thy foes;
     And crossly to thy good all fortune goes.               Exit
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT III. SCENE I.
 BOLINGBROKE'S camp at Bristol
 
 Enter BOLINGBROKE, YORK, NORTHUMBERLAND, PERCY, ROSS, WILLOUGHBY,
 BUSHY and GREEN, prisoners
 
   BOLINGBROKE. Bring forth these men.
     Bushy and Green, I will not vex your souls-
     Since presently your souls must part your bodies-
     With too much urging your pernicious lives,
     For 'twere no charity; yet, to wash your blood
     From off my hands, here in the view of men
     I will unfold some causes of your deaths:
     You have misled a prince, a royal king,
     A happy gentleman in blood and lineaments,
     By you unhappied and disfigured clean;
     You have in manner with your sinful hours
--**--**--
     Have been so brief with you to shorten you,
     For taking so the head, your whole head's length.
   BOLINGBROKE. Mistake not, uncle, further than you should.
   YORK. Take not, good cousin, further than you should,
     Lest you mistake. The heavens are over our heads.
   BOLINGBROKE. I know it, uncle; and oppose not myself
     Against their will. But who comes here?
 
                     Enter PERCY
 
     Welcome, Harry. What, will not this castle yield?
   PIERCY. The castle royally is mann'd, my lord,
     Against thy entrance.
   BOLINGBROKE. Royally!
     Why, it contains no king?
   PERCY. Yes, my good lord,
     It doth contain a king; King Richard lies
     Within the limits of yon lime and stone;
     And with him are the Lord Aumerle, Lord Salisbury,
     Sir Stephen Scroop, besides a clergyman
     Of holy reverence; who, I cannot learn.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. O, belike it is the Bishop of Carlisle.
   BOLINGBROKE. [To NORTHUMBERLAND] Noble lord,
     Go to the rude ribs of that ancient castle;
     Through brazen trumpet send the breath of parley
     Into his ruin'd ears, and thus deliver:
     Henry Bolingbroke
     On both his knees doth kiss King Richard's hand,
     And sends allegiance and true faith of heart
     To his most royal person; hither come
     Even at his feet to lay my arms and power,
     Provided that my banishment repeal'd
     And lands restor'd again be freely granted;
     If not, I'll use the advantage of my power
     And lay the summer's dust with showers of blood
     Rain'd from the wounds of slaughtered Englishmen;
     The which how far off from the mind of Bolingbroke
     It is such crimson tempest should bedrench
     The fresh green lap of fair King Richard's land,
     My stooping duty tenderly shall show.
     Go, signify as much, while here we march
     Upon the grassy carpet of this plain.
            [NORTHUMBERLAND advances to the Castle, with a trumpet]
     Let's march without the noise of threat'ning drum,
--**--**--
     Defiance to the traitor, and so die?
   AUMERLE. No, good my lord; let's fight with gentle words
     Till time lend friends, and friends their helpful swords.
   KING RICHARD. O God, O God! that e'er this tongue of mine
     That laid the sentence of dread banishment
     On yon proud man should take it off again
     With words of sooth! O that I were as great
     As is my grief, or lesser than my name!
     Or that I could forget what I have been!
     Or not remember what I must be now!
     Swell'st thou, proud heart? I'll give thee scope to beat,
     Since foes have scope to beat both thee and me.
   AUMERLE. Northumberland comes back from Bolingbroke.
   KING RICHARD. What must the King do now? Must he submit?
     The King shall do it. Must he be depos'd?
     The King shall be contented. Must he lose
     The name of king? A God's name, let it go.
     I'll give my jewels for a set of beads,
     My gorgeous palace for a hermitage,
     My gay apparel for an almsman's gown,
     My figur'd goblets for a dish of wood,
     My sceptre for a palmer's walking staff,
     My subjects for a pair of carved saints,
     And my large kingdom for a little grave,
     A little little grave, an obscure grave-
     Or I'll be buried in the king's high way,
     Some way of common trade, where subjects' feet
     May hourly trample on their sovereign's head;
     For on my heart they tread now whilst I live,
     And buried once, why not upon my head?
     Aumerle, thou weep'st, my tender-hearted cousin!
     We'll make foul weather with despised tears;
     Our sighs and they shall lodge the summer corn
     And make a dearth in this revolting land.
     Or shall we play the wantons with our woes
     And make some pretty match with shedding tears?
--**--**--
     Give some supportance to the bending twigs.
     Go thou, and Eke an executioner
     Cut off the heads of too fast growing sprays
     That look too lofty in our commonwealth:
     All must be even in our government.
     You thus employ'd, I will go root away
     The noisome weeds which without profit suck
     The soil's fertility from wholesome flowers.
   SERVANT. Why should we, in the compass of a pale,
     Keep law and form and due proportion,
     Showing, as in a model, our firm estate,
     When our sea-walled garden, the whole land,
     Is full of weeds; her fairest flowers chok'd up,
     Her fruit trees all unprun'd, her hedges ruin'd,
     Her knots disordered, and her wholesome herbs
     Swarming with caterpillars?
   GARDENER. Hold thy peace.
     He that hath suffer'd this disorder'd spring
     Hath now himself met with the fall of leaf;
     The weeds which his broad-spreading leaves did shelter,
     That seem'd in eating him to hold him up,
     Are pluck'd up root and all by Bolingbroke-
     I mean the Earl of Wiltshire, Bushy, Green.
   SERVANT. What, are they dead?
   GARDENER. They are; and Bolingbroke
     Hath seiz'd the wasteful King. O, what pity is it
     That he had not so trimm'd and dress'd his land
     As we this garden! We at time of year
     Do wound the bark, the skin of our fruit trees,
     Lest, being over-proud in sap and blood,
     With too much riches it confound itself;
     Had he done so to great and growing men,
     They might have Ev'd to bear, and he to taste
     Their fruits of duty. Superfluous branches
     We lop away, that bearing boughs may live;
     Had he done so, himself had home the crown,
     Which waste of idle hours hath quite thrown down.
   SERVANT. What, think you the King shall be deposed?
   GARDENER. Depress'd he is already, and depos'd
--**--**--
     His captain, steward, deputy elect,
     Anointed, crowned, planted many years,
     Be judg'd by subject and inferior breath,
     And he himself not present? O, forfend it, God,
     That in a Christian climate souls refin'd
     Should show so heinous, black, obscene a deed!
     I speak to subjects, and a subject speaks,
     Stirr'd up by God, thus boldly for his king.
     My Lord of Hereford here, whom you call king,
     Is a foul traitor to proud Hereford's king;
     And if you crown him, let me prophesy-
     The blood of English shall manure the ground,
     And future ages groan for this foul act;
     Peace shall go sleep with Turks and infidels,
     And in this seat of peace tumultuous wars
     Shall kin with kin and kind with kind confound;
     Disorder, horror, fear, and mutiny,
     Shall here inhabit, and this land be call'd
     The field of Golgotha and dead men's skulls.
     O, if you raise this house against this house,
     It will the woefullest division prove
     That ever fell upon this cursed earth.
     Prevent it, resist it, let it not be so,
     Lest child, child's children, cry against you woe.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. Well have you argued, sir; and, for your pains,
     Of capital treason we arrest you here.
     My Lord of Westminster, be it your charge
     To keep him safely till his day of trial.
     May it please you, lords, to grant the commons' suit?
   BOLINGBROKE. Fetch hither Richard, that in common view
     He may surrender; so we shall proceed
     Without suspicion.
   YORK. I will be his conduct.                              Exit
   BOLINGBROKE. Lords, you that here are under our arrest,
     Procure your sureties for your days of answer.
     Little are we beholding to your love,
     And little look'd for at your helping hands.
 
       Re-enter YORK, with KING RICHARD, and OFFICERS
                 bearing the regalia
 
   KING RICHARD. Alack, why am I sent for to a king,
--**--**--
     For the deposing of a rightful king.
 
              Enter NORTHUMBERLAND attended
 
   NORTHUMBERLAND. My lord, the mind of Bolingbroke is chang'd;
     You must to Pomfret, not unto the Tower.
     And, madam, there is order ta'en for you:
     With all swift speed you must away to France.
   KING RICHARD. Northumberland, thou ladder wherewithal
     The mounting Bolingbroke ascends my throne,
     The time shall not be many hours of age
     More than it is, ere foul sin gathering head
     Shall break into corruption. Thou shalt think
     Though he divide the realm and give thee half
     It is too little, helping him to all;
     And he shall think that thou, which knowest the way
     To plant unrightful kings, wilt know again,
     Being ne'er so little urg'd, another way
     To pluck him headlong from the usurped throne.
     The love of wicked men converts to fear;
     That fear to hate; and hate turns one or both
     To worthy danger and deserved death.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. My guilt be on my head, and there an end.
     Take leave, and part; for you must part forthwith.
   KING RICHARD. Doubly divorc'd! Bad men, you violate
     A twofold marriage-'twixt my crown and me,
     And then betwixt me and my married wife.
     Let me unkiss the oath 'twixt thee and me;
     And yet not so, for with a kiss 'twas made.
     Part us, Northumberland; I towards the north,
     Where shivering cold and sickness pines the clime;
     My wife to France, from whence set forth in pomp,
     She came adorned hither like sweet May,
     Sent back like Hallowmas or short'st of day.
   QUEEN. And must we be divided? Must we part?
   KING RICHARD. Ay, hand from hand, my love, and heart from heart.
   QUEEN. Banish us both, and send the King with me.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. That were some love, but little policy.
   QUEEN. Then whither he goes thither let me go.
--**--**--
   DUCHESS. After, Aumerle! Mount thee upon his horse;
     Spur post, and get before him to the King,
     And beg thy pardon ere he do accuse thee.
     I'll not be long behind; though I be old,
     I doubt not but to ride as fast as York;
     And never will I rise up from the ground
     Till Bolingbroke have pardon'd thee. Away, be gone.
                                                           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 3.
 Windsor Castle
 
 Enter BOLINGBROKE as King, PERCY, and other LORDS
 
   BOLINGBROKE. Can no man tell me of my unthrifty son?
     'Tis full three months since I did see him last.
     If any plague hang over us, 'tis he.
     I would to God, my lords, he might be found.
     Inquire at London, 'mongst the taverns there,
     For there, they say, he daily doth frequent
     With unrestrained loose companions,
     Even such, they say, as stand in narrow lanes
     And beat our watch and rob our passengers,
     Which he, young wanton and effeminate boy,
     Takes on the point of honour to support
     So dissolute a crew.
   PERCY. My lord, some two days since I saw the Prince,
     And told him of those triumphs held at Oxford.
   BOLINGBROKE. And what said the gallant?
   PERCY. His answer was, he would unto the stews,
     And from the common'st creature pluck a glove
     And wear it as a favour; and with that
     He would unhorse the lustiest challenger.
   BOLINGBROKE. As dissolute as desperate; yet through both
     I see some sparks of better hope, which elder years
     May happily bring forth. But who comes here?
 
                 Enter AUMERLE amazed
 
   AUMERLE. Where is the King?
   BOLINGBROKE. What means our cousin that he stares and looks
     So wildly?
   AUMERLE. God save your Grace! I do beseech your Majesty,
     To have some conference with your Grace alone.
   BOLINGBROKE. Withdraw yourselves, and leave us here alone.
                                           Exeunt PERCY and LORDS
--**--**--
   AUMERLE. Remember, as thou read'st, thy promise pass'd.
     I do repent me; read not my name there;
     My heart is not confederate with my hand.
   YORK. It was, villain, ere thy hand did set it down.
     I tore it from the traitor's bosom, King;
     Fear, and not love, begets his penitence.
     Forget to pity him, lest thy pity prove
     A serpent that will sting thee to the heart.
   BOLINGBROKE. O heinous, strong, and bold conspiracy!
     O loyal father of a treacherous son!
     Thou sheer, immaculate, and silver fountain,
     From whence this stream through muddy passages
     Hath held his current and defil'd himself!
     Thy overflow of good converts to bad;
     And thy abundant goodness shall excuse
     This deadly blot in thy digressing son.
   YORK. So shall my virtue be his vice's bawd;
     And he shall spend mine honour with his shame,
     As thriftless sons their scraping fathers' gold.
     Mine honour lives when his dishonour dies,
     Or my sham'd life in his dishonour lies.
     Thou kill'st me in his life; giving him breath,
     The traitor lives, the true man's put to death.
   DUCHESS. [Within] I What ho, my liege, for God's sake, let me in.
   BOLINGBROKE. What shrill-voic'd suppliant makes this eager cry?
   DUCHESS. [Within] A woman, and thine aunt, great King; 'tis I.
     Speak with me, pity me, open the door.
     A beggar begs that never begg'd before.
   BOLINGBROKE. Our scene is alt'red from a serious thing,
     And now chang'd to 'The Beggar and the King.'
     My dangerous cousin, let your mother in.
     I know she is come to pray for your foul sin.
   YORK. If thou do pardon whosoever pray,
     More sins for this forgiveness prosper may.
     This fest'red joint cut off, the rest rest sound;
     This let alone will all the rest confound.
 
                  Enter DUCHESS
 
   DUCHESS. O King, believe not this hard-hearted man!
--**--**--
     Hath with the King's blood stain'd the King's own land.
     Mount, mount, my soul! thy seat is up on high;
     Whilst my gross flesh sinks downward, here to die.
                                                        [Dies]
   EXTON. As full of valour as of royal blood.
     Both have I spill'd. O, would the deed were good!
     For now the devil, that told me I did well,
     Says that this deed is chronicled in hell.
     This dead King to the living King I'll bear.
     Take hence the rest, and give them burial here.       Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 6.
 Windsor Castle
 
 Flourish. Enter BOLINGBROKE, the DUKE OF YORK, With other LORDS
 and attendants
 
   BOLINGBROKE. Kind uncle York, the latest news we hear
     Is that the rebels have consum'd with fire
     Our town of Ciceter in Gloucestershire;
     But whether they be ta'en or slain we hear not.
 
               Enter NORTHUMBERLAND
 
     Welcome, my lord. What is the news?
   NORTHUMBERLAND. First, to thy sacred state wish I all happiness.
     The next news is, I have to London sent
     The heads of Salisbury, Spencer, Blunt, and Kent.
     The manner of their taking may appear
     At large discoursed in this paper here.
   BOLINGBROKE. We thank thee, gentle Percy, for thy pains;
     And to thy worth will add right worthy gains.
 
                   Enter FITZWATER
 
   FITZWATER. My lord, I have from Oxford sent to London
     The heads of Brocas and Sir Bennet Seely;
     Two of the dangerous consorted traitors
     That sought at Oxford thy dire overthrow.
   BOLINGBROKE. Thy pains, Fitzwater, shall not be forgot;
     Right noble is thy merit, well I wot.
 
          Enter PERCY, With the BISHOP OF CARLISLE
 
   PERCY. The grand conspirator, Abbot of Westminster,
     With clog of conscience and sour melancholy,
     Hath yielded up his body to the grave;
     But here is Carlisle living, to abide
     Thy kingly doom, and sentence of his pride.
   BOLINGBROKE. Carlisle, this is your doom:
--**--**--
   HASTINGS. He is.
   GLOUCESTER. Go you before, and I will follow you.
                                                    Exit HASTINGS
     He cannot live, I hope, and must not die
     Till George be pack'd with posthorse up to heaven.
     I'll in to urge his hatred more to Clarence
     With lies well steel'd with weighty arguments;
     And, if I fail not in my deep intent,
     Clarence hath not another day to live;
     Which done, God take King Edward to his mercy,
     And leave the world for me to bustle in!
     For then I'll marry Warwick's youngest daughter.
     What though I kill'd her husband and her father?
     The readiest way to make the wench amends
     Is to become her husband and her father;
     The which will I-not all so much for love
     As for another secret close intent
     By marrying her which I must reach unto.
     But yet I run before my horse to market.
     Clarence still breathes; Edward still lives and reigns;
     When they are gone, then must I count my gains.         Exit
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 2.
 
 London. Another street
 
 Enter corpse of KING HENRY THE SIXTH, with halberds to guard it;
 LADY ANNE being the mourner, attended by TRESSEL and BERKELEY
 
   ANNE. Set down, set down your honourable load-
     If honour may be shrouded in a hearse;
     Whilst I awhile obsequiously lament
     Th' untimely fall of virtuous Lancaster.
     Poor key-cold figure of a holy king!
     Pale ashes of the house of Lancaster!
     Thou bloodless remnant of that royal blood!
     Be it lawful that I invocate thy ghost
     To hear the lamentations of poor Anne,
     Wife to thy Edward, to thy slaughtered son,
     Stabb'd by the self-same hand that made these wounds.
     Lo, in these windows that let forth thy life
     I pour the helpless balm of my poor eyes.
     O, cursed be the hand that made these holes!
--**--**--
     Out of my sight! Thou dost infect mine eyes.
   GLOUCESTER. Thine eyes, sweet lady, have infected mine.
   ANNE. Would they were basilisks to strike thee dead!
   GLOUCESTER. I would they were, that I might die at once;
     For now they kill me with a living death.
     Those eyes of thine from mine have drawn salt tears,
     Sham'd their aspects with store of childish drops-
     These eyes, which never shed remorseful tear,
     No, when my father York and Edward wept
     To hear the piteous moan that Rutland made
     When black-fac'd Clifford shook his sword at him;
     Nor when thy warlike father, like a child,
     Told the sad story of my father's death,
     And twenty times made pause to sob and weep
     That all the standers-by had wet their cheeks
     Like trees bedash'd with rain-in that sad time
     My manly eyes did scorn an humble tear;
     And what these sorrows could not thence exhale
     Thy beauty hath, and made them blind with weeping.
     I never sued to friend nor enemy;
     My tongue could never learn sweet smoothing word;
     But, now thy beauty is propos'd my fee,
     My proud heart sues, and prompts my tongue to speak.
                                    [She looks scornfully at him]
     Teach not thy lip such scorn; for it was made
     For kissing, lady, not for such contempt.
     If thy revengeful heart cannot forgive,
     Lo here I lend thee this sharp-pointed sword;
     Which if thou please to hide in this true breast
     And let the soul forth that adoreth thee,
     I lay it naked to the deadly stroke,
     And humbly beg the death upon my knee.
       [He lays his breast open; she offers at it with his sword]
     Nay, do not pause; for I did kill King Henry-
     But 'twas thy beauty that provoked me.
     Nay, now dispatch; 'twas I that stabb'd young Edward-
--**--**--
     I do mistake my person all this while.
     Upon my life, she finds, although I cannot,
     Myself to be a marv'llous proper man.
     I'll be at charges for a looking-glass,
     And entertain a score or two of tailors
     To study fashions to adorn my body.
     Since I am crept in favour with myself,
     I will maintain it with some little cost.
     But first I'll turn yon fellow in his grave,
     And then return lamenting to my love.
     Shine out, fair sun, till I have bought a glass,
     That I may see my shadow as I pass.                     Exit
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 3.
 
 London. The palace
 
 Enter QUEEN ELIZABETH, LORD RIVERS, and LORD GREY
 
   RIVERS. Have patience, madam; there's no doubt his Majesty
     Will soon recover his accustom'd health.
   GREY. In that you brook it ill, it makes him worse;
     Therefore, for God's sake, entertain good comfort,
     And cheer his Grace with quick and merry eyes.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. If he were dead, what would betide on
     me?
   GREY. No other harm but loss of such a lord.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. The loss of such a lord includes all
     harms.
   GREY. The heavens have bless'd you with a goodly son
     To be your comforter when he is gone.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Ah, he is young; and his minority
     Is put unto the trust of Richard Gloucester,
     A man that loves not me, nor none of you.
   RIVER. Is it concluded he shall be Protector?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. It is determin'd, not concluded yet;
     But so it must be, if the King miscarry.
 
                      Enter BUCKINGHAM and DERBY
 
   GREY. Here come the Lords of Buckingham and Derby.
   BUCKINGHAM. Good time of day unto your royal Grace!
   DERBY. God make your Majesty joyful as you have been.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. The Countess Richmond, good my Lord
     of Derby,
     To your good prayer will scarcely say amen.
--**--**--
   GLOUCESTER. In all which time you and your husband Grey
     Were factious for the house of Lancaster;
     And, Rivers, so were you. Was not your husband
     In Margaret's battle at Saint Albans slain?
     Let me put in your minds, if you forget,
     What you have been ere this, and what you are;
     Withal, what I have been, and what I am.
   QUEEN MARGARET. A murd'rous villain, and so still thou art.
   GLOUCESTER. Poor Clarence did forsake his father, Warwick,
     Ay, and forswore himself-which Jesu pardon!-
   QUEEN MARGARET. Which God revenge!
   GLOUCESTER. To fight on Edward's party for the crown;
     And for his meed, poor lord, he is mewed up.
     I would to God my heart were flint like Edward's,
     Or Edward's soft and pitiful like mine.
     I am too childish-foolish for this world.
   QUEEN MARGARET. Hie thee to hell for shame and leave this
     world,
     Thou cacodemon; there thy kingdom is.
   RIVERS. My Lord of Gloucester, in those busy days
     Which here you urge to prove us enemies,
     We follow'd then our lord, our sovereign king.
     So should we you, if you should be our king.
   GLOUCESTER. If I should be! I had rather be a pedlar.
     Far be it from my heart, the thought thereof!
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. As little joy, my lord, as you suppose
     You should enjoy were you this country's king,
     As little joy you may suppose in me
     That I enjoy, being the Queen thereof.
   QUEEN MARGARET. As little joy enjoys the Queen thereof;
     For I am she, and altogether joyless.
     I can no longer hold me patient.                 [Advancing]
     Hear me, you wrangling pirates, that fall out
     In sharing that which you have pill'd from me.
     Which of you trembles not that looks on me?
     If not that, I am Queen, you bow like subjects,
--**--**--
 
 
 SCENE 4.
 
 London. The Tower
 
 Enter CLARENCE and KEEPER
 
   KEEPER. Why looks your Grace so heavily to-day?
   CLARENCE. O, I have pass'd a miserable night,
     So full of fearful dreams, of ugly sights,
     That, as I am a Christian faithful man,
     I would not spend another such a night
     Though 'twere to buy a world of happy days-
     So full of dismal terror was the time!
   KEEPER. What was your dream, my lord? I pray you
     tell me.
   CLARENCE. Methoughts that I had broken from the Tower
     And was embark'd to cross to Burgundy;
     And in my company my brother Gloucester,
     Who from my cabin tempted me to walk
     Upon the hatches. Thence we look'd toward England,
     And cited up a thousand heavy times,
     During the wars of York and Lancaster,
     That had befall'n us. As we pac'd along
     Upon the giddy footing of the hatches,
     Methought that Gloucester stumbled, and in falling
     Struck me, that thought to stay him, overboard
     Into the tumbling billows of the main.
     O Lord, methought what pain it was to drown,
     What dreadful noise of waters in my ears,
     What sights of ugly death within my eyes!
     Methoughts I saw a thousand fearful wrecks,
     A thousand men that fishes gnaw'd upon,
     Wedges of gold, great anchors, heaps of pearl,
     Inestimable stones, unvalued jewels,
     All scatt'red in the bottom of the sea;
     Some lay in dead men's skulls, and in the holes
     Where eyes did once inhabit there were crept,
     As 'twere in scorn of eyes, reflecting gems,
     That woo'd the slimy bottom of the deep
     And mock'd the dead bones that lay scatt'red by.
   KEEPER. Had you such leisure in the time of death
     To gaze upon these secrets of the deep?
   CLARENCE. Methought I had; and often did I strive
     To yield the ghost, but still the envious flood
--**--**--
   SECOND MURDERER. Nor you as we are, loyal.
   CLARENCE. Thy voice is thunder, but thy looks are humble.
   FIRST MURDERER. My voice is now the King's, my looks
     mine own.
   CLARENCE. How darkly and how deadly dost thou speak!
     Your eyes do menace me. Why look you pale?
     Who sent you hither? Wherefore do you come?
   SECOND MURDERER. To, to, to-
   CLARENCE. To murder me?
   BOTH MURDERERS. Ay, ay.
   CLARENCE. You scarcely have the hearts to tell me so,
     And therefore cannot have the hearts to do it.
     Wherein, my friends, have I offended you?
   FIRST MURDERER. Offended us you have not, but the King.
   CLARENCE. I shall be reconcil'd to him again.
   SECOND MURDERER. Never, my lord; therefore prepare to die.
   CLARENCE. Are you drawn forth among a world of men
     To slay the innocent? What is my offence?
     Where is the evidence that doth accuse me?
     What lawful quest have given their verdict up
     Unto the frowning judge, or who pronounc'd
     The bitter sentence of poor Clarence' death?
     Before I be convict by course of law,
     To threaten me with death is most unlawful.
     I charge you, as you hope to have redemption
     By Christ's dear blood shed for our grievous sins,
     That you depart and lay no hands on me.
     The deed you undertake is damnable.
   FIRST MURDERER. What we will do, we do upon command.
   SECOND MURDERER. And he that hath commanded is our
     King.
   CLARENCE. Erroneous vassals! the great King of kings
     Hath in the tables of his law commanded
     That thou shalt do no murder. Will you then
     Spurn at his edict and fulfil a man's?
     Take heed; for he holds vengeance in his hand
     To hurl upon their heads that break his law.
   SECOND MURDERER. And that same vengeance doth he hurl
--**--**--
     Incapable and shallow innocents,
     You cannot guess who caus'd your father's death.
   SON. Grandam, we can; for my good uncle Gloucester
     Told me the King, provok'd to it by the Queen,
     Devis'd impeachments to imprison him.
     And when my uncle told me so, he wept,
     And pitied me, and kindly kiss'd my cheek;
     Bade me rely on him as on my father,
     And he would love me dearly as a child.
   DUCHESS. Ah, that deceit should steal such gentle shape,
     And with a virtuous vizor hide deep vice!
     He is my son; ay, and therein my shame;
     Yet from my dugs he drew not this deceit.
   SON. Think you my uncle did dissemble, grandam?
   DUCHESS. Ay, boy.
   SON. I cannot think it. Hark! what noise is this?
 
             Enter QUEEN ELIZABETH, with her hair about her
                 ears; RIVERS and DORSET after her
 
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Ah, who shall hinder me to wail and
     weep,
     To chide my fortune, and torment myself?
     I'll join with black despair against my soul
     And to myself become an enemy.
   DUCHESS. What means this scene of rude impatience?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. To make an act of tragic violence.
   EDWARD, my lord, thy son, our king, is dead.
     Why grow the branches when the root is gone?
     Why wither not the leaves that want their sap?
     If you will live, lament; if die, be brief,
     That our swift-winged souls may catch the King's,
     Or like obedient subjects follow him
     To his new kingdom of ne'er-changing night.
   DUCHESS. Ah, so much interest have I in thy sorrow
     As I had title in thy noble husband!
     I have bewept a worthy husband's death,
     And liv'd with looking on his images;
     But now two mirrors of his princely semblance
     Are crack'd in pieces by malignant death,
     And I for comfort have but one false glass,
--**--**--
 
 ACT III. SCENE 1.
 
 London. A street
 
 The trumpets sound. Enter the PRINCE OF WALES, GLOUCESTER, BUCKINGHAM,
 CATESBY, CARDINAL BOURCHIER, and others
 
   BUCKINGHAM. Welcome, sweet Prince, to London, to your
     chamber.
   GLOUCESTER. Welcome, dear cousin, my thoughts' sovereign.
     The weary way hath made you melancholy.
   PRINCE. No, uncle; but our crosses on the way
     Have made it tedious, wearisome, and heavy.
     I want more uncles here to welcome me.
   GLOUCESTER. Sweet Prince, the untainted virtue of your
     years
     Hath not yet div'd into the world's deceit;
     Nor more can you distinguish of a man
     Than of his outward show; which, God He knows,
     Seldom or never jumpeth with the heart.
     Those uncles which you want were dangerous;
     Your Grace attended to their sug'red words
     But look'd not on the poison of their hearts.
     God keep you from them and from such false friends!
   PRINCE. God keep me from false friends! but they were
     none.
   GLOUCESTER. My lord, the Mayor of London comes to greet
     you.
 
                 Enter the LORD MAYOR and his train
 
   MAYOR. God bless your Grace with health and happy days!
   PRINCE. I thank you, good my lord, and thank you all.
     I thought my mother and my brother York
     Would long ere this have met us on the way.
     Fie, what a slug is Hastings, that he comes not
     To tell us whether they will come or no!
 
                         Enter LORD HASTINGS
 
   BUCKINGHAM. And, in good time, here comes the sweating
     Lord.
   PRINCE. Welcome, my lord. What, will our mother come?
   HASTINGS. On what occasion, God He knows, not I,
     The Queen your mother and your brother York
     Have taken sanctuary. The tender Prince
     Would fain have come with me to meet your Grace,
     But by his mother was perforce withheld.
   BUCKINGHAM. Fie, what an indirect and peevish course
--**--**--
     Which by his death hath lost much majesty.
   GLOUCESTER. How fares our cousin, noble Lord of York?
   YORK. I thank you, gentle uncle. O, my lord,
     You said that idle weeds are fast in growth.
     The Prince my brother hath outgrown me far.
   GLOUCESTER. He hath, my lord.
   YORK. And therefore is he idle?
   GLOUCESTER. O, my fair cousin, I must not say so.
   YORK. Then he is more beholding to you than I.
   GLOUCESTER. He may command me as my sovereign;
     But you have power in me as in a kinsman.
   YORK. I pray you, uncle, give me this dagger.
   GLOUCESTER. My dagger, little cousin? With all my heart!
   PRINCE. A beggar, brother?
   YORK. Of my kind uncle, that I know will give,
     And being but a toy, which is no grief to give.
   GLOUCESTER. A greater gift than that I'll give my cousin.
   YORK. A greater gift! O, that's the sword to it!
   GLOUCESTER. Ay, gentle cousin, were it light enough.
   YORK. O, then, I see you will part but with light gifts:
     In weightier things you'll say a beggar nay.
   GLOUCESTER. It is too heavy for your Grace to wear.
   YORK. I weigh it lightly, were it heavier.
   GLOUCESTER. What, would you have my weapon, little
     Lord?
   YORK. I would, that I might thank you as you call me.
   GLOUCESTER. How?
   YORK. Little.
   PRINCE. My Lord of York will still be cross in talk.
     Uncle, your Grace knows how to bear with him.
   YORK. You mean, to bear me, not to bear with me.
     Uncle, my brother mocks both you and me;
     Because that I am little, like an ape,
     He thinks that you should bear me on your shoulders.
   BUCKINGHAM. With what a sharp-provided wit he reasons!
     To mitigate the scorn he gives his uncle
--**--**--
   HASTINGS. I thank thee, good Sir John, with all my heart.
     I am in your debt for your last exercise;
     Come the next Sabbath, and I will content you.
                                         [He whispers in his ear]
   PRIEST. I'll wait upon your lordship.
 
                             Enter BUCKINGHAM
 
   BUCKINGHAM. What, talking with a priest, Lord
     Chamberlain!
     Your friends at Pomfret, they do need the priest:
     Your honour hath no shriving work in hand.
   HASTINGS. Good faith, and when I met this holy man,
     The men you talk of came into my mind.
     What, go you toward the Tower?
   BUCKINGHAM. I do, my lord, but long I cannot stay there;
     I shall return before your lordship thence.
   HASTINGS. Nay, like enough, for I stay dinner there.
   BUCKINGHAM.  [Aside]  And supper too, although thou
     knowest it not.-
     Come, will you go?
   HASTINGS. I'll wait upon your lordship.                 Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 3.
 
 Pomfret Castle
 
 Enter SIR RICHARD RATCLIFF, with halberds, carrying the Nobles,
 RIVERS, GREY, and VAUGHAN, to death
 
   RIVERS. Sir Richard Ratcliff, let me tell thee this:
     To-day shalt thou behold a subject die
     For truth, for duty, and for loyalty.
   GREY. God bless the Prince from all the pack of you!
     A knot you are of damned blood-suckers.
   VAUGHAN. You live that shall cry woe for this hereafter.
   RATCLIFF. Dispatch; the limit of your lives is out.
   RIVERS. O Pomfret, Pomfret! O thou bloody prison,
     Fatal and ominous to noble peers!
     Within the guilty closure of thy walls
   RICHARD the Second here was hack'd to death;
     And for more slander to thy dismal seat,
     We give to thee our guiltless blood to drink.
   GREY. Now Margaret's curse is fall'n upon our heads,
     When she exclaim'd on Hastings, you, and I,
     For standing by when Richard stabb'd her son.
   RIVERS. Then curs'd she Richard, then curs'd she
     Buckingham,
--**--**--
     That you might well have signified the same
     Unto the citizens, who haply may
     Misconster us in him and wail his death.
   MAYOR. But, my good lord, your Grace's words shall serve
     As well as I had seen and heard him speak;
     And do not doubt, right noble Princes both,
     But I'll acquaint our duteous citizens
     With all your just proceedings in this cause.
   GLOUCESTER. And to that end we wish'd your lordship here,
     T' avoid the the the censures of the carping world.
   BUCKINGHAM. Which since you come too late of our intent,
     Yet witness what you hear we did intend.
     And so, my good Lord Mayor, we bid farewell.
                                                  Exit LORD MAYOR
   GLOUCESTER. Go, after, after, cousin Buckingham.
     The Mayor towards Guildhall hies him in an post.
     There, at your meet'st advantage of the time,
     Infer the bastardy of Edward's children.
     Tell them how Edward put to death a citizen
     Only for saying he would make his son
     Heir to the crown-meaning indeed his house,
     Which by the sign thereof was termed so.
     Moreover, urge his hateful luxury
     And bestial appetite in change of lust,
     Which stretch'd unto their servants, daughters, wives,
     Even where his raging eye or savage heart
     Without control lusted to make a prey.
     Nay, for a need, thus far come near my person:
     Tell them, when that my mother went with child
     Of that insatiate Edward, noble York
     My princely father then had wars in France
     And, by true computation of the time,
     Found that the issue was not his begot;
     Which well appeared in his lineaments,
     Being nothing like the noble Duke my father.
     Yet touch this sparingly, as 'twere far off;
     Because, my lord, you know my mother lives.
   BUCKINGHAM. Doubt not, my lord, I'll play the orator
     As if the golden fee for which I plead
--**--**--
     Save that, for reverence to some alive,
     I give a sparing limit to my tongue.
     Then, good my lord, take to your royal self
     This proffer'd benefit of dignity;
     If not to bless us and the land withal,
     Yet to draw forth your noble ancestry
     From the corruption of abusing times
     Unto a lineal true-derived course.
   MAYOR. Do, good my lord; your citizens entreat you.
   BUCKINGHAM. Refuse not, mighty lord, this proffer'd love.
   CATESBY. O, make them joyful, grant their lawful suit!
   GLOUCESTER. Alas, why would you heap this care on me?
     I am unfit for state and majesty.
     I do beseech you, take it not amiss:
     I cannot nor I will not yield to you.
   BUCKINGHAM. If you refuse it-as, in love and zeal,
     Loath to depose the child, your brother's son;
     As well we know your tenderness of heart
     And gentle, kind, effeminate remorse,
     Which we have noted in you to your kindred
     And egally indeed to all estates-
     Yet know, whe'er you accept our suit or no,
     Your brother's son shall never reign our king;
     But we will plant some other in the throne
     To the disgrace and downfall of your house;
     And in this resolution here we leave you.
     Come, citizens. Zounds, I'll entreat no more.
   GLOUCESTER. O, do not swear, my lord of Buckingham.
                           Exeunt BUCKINGHAM, MAYOR, and citizens
   CATESBY. Call him again, sweet Prince, accept their suit.
     If you deny them, all the land will rue it.
   GLOUCESTER. Will you enforce me to a world of cares?
     Call them again. I am not made of stones,
     But penetrable to your kind entreaties,
     Albeit against my conscience and my soul.
 
                   Re-enter BUCKINGHAM and the rest
 
     Cousin of Buckingham, and sage grave men,
     Since you will buckle fortune on my back,
     To bear her burden, whe'er I will or no,
--**--**--
     hither, Tyrrel.
     Go, by this token. Rise, and lend thine ear.      [Whispers]
     There is no more but so: say it is done,
     And I will love thee and prefer thee for it.
   TYRREL. I will dispatch it straight.                      Exit
 
                     Re-enter BUCKINGHAM
 
     BUCKINGHAM. My lord, I have consider'd in my mind
     The late request that you did sound me in.
   KING RICHARD. Well, let that rest. Dorset is fled to
     Richmond.
   BUCKINGHAM. I hear the news, my lord.
   KING RICHARD. Stanley, he is your wife's son: well, look
     unto it.
   BUCKINGHAM. My lord, I claim the gift, my due by promise,
     For which your honour and your faith is pawn'd:
     Th' earldom of Hereford and the movables
     Which you have promised I shall possess.
   KING RICHARD. Stanley, look to your wife; if she convey
     Letters to Richmond, you shall answer it.
   BUCKINGHAM. What says your Highness to my just request?
   KING RICHARD. I do remember me: Henry the Sixth
     Did prophesy that Richmond should be King,
     When Richmond was a little peevish boy.
     A king!-perhaps-
   BUCKINGHAM. My lord-
   KING RICHARD. How chance the prophet could not at that
     time
     Have told me, I being by, that I should kill him?
   BUCKINGHAM. My lord, your promise for the earldom-
   KING RICHARD. Richmond! When last I was at Exeter,
     The mayor in courtesy show'd me the castle
     And call'd it Rugemount, at which name I started,
     Because a bard of Ireland told me once
     I should not live long after I saw Richmond.
   BUCKINGHAM. My lord-
   KING RICHARD. Ay, what's o'clock?
   BUCKINGHAM. I am thus bold to put your Grace in mind
     Of what you promis'd me.
   KING RICHARD. Well, but o'clock?
   BUCKINGHAM. Upon the stroke of ten.
   KING RICHARD. Well, let it strike.
   BUCKINGHAM. Why let it strike?
   KING RICHARD. Because that like a Jack thou keep'st the
--**--**--
     Thy womb let loose to chase us to our graves.
     O upright, just, and true-disposing God,
     How do I thank thee that this carnal cur
     Preys on the issue of his mother's body
     And makes her pew-fellow with others' moan!
   DUCHESS. O Harry's wife, triumph not in my woes!
     God witness with me, I have wept for thine.
   QUEEN MARGARET. Bear with me; I am hungry for revenge,
     And now I cloy me with beholding it.
     Thy Edward he is dead, that kill'd my Edward;
     The other Edward dead, to quit my Edward;
     Young York he is but boot, because both they
     Match'd not the high perfection of my loss.
     Thy Clarence he is dead that stabb'd my Edward;
     And the beholders of this frantic play,
     Th' adulterate Hastings, Rivers, Vaughan, Grey,
     Untimely smother'd in their dusky graves.
     Richard yet lives, hell's black intelligencer;
     Only reserv'd their factor to buy souls
     And send them thither. But at hand, at hand,
     Ensues his piteous and unpitied end.
     Earth gapes, hell burns, fiends roar, saints pray,
     To have him suddenly convey'd from hence.
     Cancel his bond of life, dear God, I pray,
     That I may live and say 'The dog is dead.'
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. O, thou didst prophesy the time would
       come
     That I should wish for thee to help me curse
     That bottled spider, that foul bunch-back'd toad!
   QUEEN MARGARET. I Call'd thee then vain flourish of my
       fortune;
     I call'd thee then poor shadow, painted queen,
     The presentation of but what I was,
     The flattering index of a direful pageant,
     One heav'd a-high to be hurl'd down below,
     A mother only mock'd with two fair babes,
     A dream of what thou wast, a garish flag
     To be the aim of every dangerous shot,
     A sign of dignity, a breath, a bubble,
--**--**--
     pierce like mine.                                       Exit
   DUCHESS. Why should calamity be fun of words?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Windy attorneys to their client woes,
     Airy succeeders of intestate joys,
     Poor breathing orators of miseries,
     Let them have scope; though what they will impart
     Help nothing else, yet do they case the heart.
   DUCHESS. If so, then be not tongue-tied. Go with me,
     And in the breath of bitter words let's smother
     My damned son that thy two sweet sons smother'd.
     The trumpet sounds; be copious in exclaims.
 
          Enter KING RICHARD and his train, marching with
                      drums and trumpets
 
   KING RICHARD. Who intercepts me in my expedition?
   DUCHESS. O, she that might have intercepted thee,
     By strangling thee in her accursed womb,
     From all the slaughters, wretch, that thou hast done!
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Hidest thou that forehead with a golden
     crown
     Where't should be branded, if that right were right,
     The slaughter of the Prince that ow'd that crown,
     And the dire death of my poor sons and brothers?
     Tell me, thou villain slave, where are my children?
   DUCHESS. Thou toad, thou toad, where is thy brother
     Clarence?
     And little Ned Plantagenet, his son?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Where is the gentle Rivers, Vaughan,
     Grey?
   DUCHESS. Where is kind Hastings?
   KING RICHARD. A flourish, trumpets! Strike alarum, drums!
     Let not the heavens hear these tell-tale women
     Rail on the Lord's anointed. Strike, I say!
                                              [Flourish. Alarums]
     Either be patient and entreat me fair,
     Or with the clamorous report of war
     Thus will I drown your exclamations.
   DUCHESS. Art thou my son?
   KING RICHARD. Ay, I thank God, my father, and yourself.
   DUCHESS. Then patiently hear my impatience.
   KING RICHARD. Madam, I have a touch of your condition
     That cannot brook the accent of reproof.
   DUCHESS. O, let me speak!
   KING RICHARD. Do, then; but I'll not hear.
--**--**--
     And be not peevish-fond in great designs.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Shall I be tempted of the devil thus?
   KING RICHARD. Ay, if the devil tempt you to do good.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Shall I forget myself to be myself?
   KING RICHARD. Ay, if your self's remembrance wrong
     yourself.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Yet thou didst kill my children.
   KING RICHARD. But in your daughter's womb I bury them;
     Where, in that nest of spicery, they will breed
     Selves of themselves, to your recomforture.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Shall I go win my daughter to thy will?
   KING RICHARD. And be a happy mother by the deed.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. I go. Write to me very shortly,
     And you shall understand from me her mind.
   KING RICHARD. Bear her my true love's kiss; and so, farewell.
                                Kissing her. Exit QUEEN ELIZABETH
     Relenting fool, and shallow, changing woman!
 
                  Enter RATCLIFF; CATESBY following
 
     How now! what news?
   RATCLIFF. Most mighty sovereign, on the western coast
     Rideth a puissant navy; to our shores
     Throng many doubtful hollow-hearted friends,
     Unarm'd, and unresolv'd to beat them back.
     'Tis thought that Richmond is their admiral;
     And there they hull, expecting but the aid
     Of Buckingham to welcome them ashore.
   KING RICHARD. Some light-foot friend post to the Duke of
     Norfolk.
     Ratcliff, thyself-or Catesby; where is he?
   CATESBY. Here, my good lord.
   KING RICHARD. Catesby, fly to the Duke.
   CATESBY. I will my lord, with all convenient haste.
   KING RICHARD. Ratcliff, come hither. Post to Salisbury;
     When thou com'st thither-  [To CATESBY]  Dull,
     unmindfull villain,
     Why stay'st thou here, and go'st not to the Duke?
   CATESBY. First, mighty liege, tell me your Highness' pleasure,
     What from your Grace I shall deliver to him.
   KING RICHARD. O, true, good Catesby. Bid him levy straight
     The greatest strength and power that he can make
     And meet me suddenly at Salisbury.
--**--**--
     If not to fight with foreign enemies,
     Yet to beat down these rebels here at home.
 
                           Re-enter CATESBY
 
   CATESBY. My liege, the Duke of Buckingham is taken-
     That is the best news. That the Earl of Richmond
     Is with a mighty power landed at Milford
     Is colder tidings, yet they must be told.
   KING RICHARD. Away towards Salisbury! While we reason
     here
     A royal battle might be won and lost.
     Some one take order Buckingham be brought
     To Salisbury; the rest march on with me.
     Flourish.                                             Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 5.
 
 LORD DERBY'S house
 
 Enter STANLEY and SIR CHRISTOPHER URSWICK
 
   STANLEY. Sir Christopher, tell Richmond this from me:
     That in the sty of the most deadly boar
     My son George Stanley is frank'd up in hold;
     If I revolt, off goes young George's head;
     The fear of that holds off my present aid.
     So, get thee gone; commend me to thy lord.
     Withal say that the Queen hath heartily consented
     He should espouse Elizabeth her daughter.
     But tell me, where is princely Richmond now?
   CHRISTOPHER. At Pembroke, or at Ha'rford west in Wales.
   STANLEY. What men of name resort to him?
   CHRISTOPHER. Sir Walter Herbert, a renowned soldier;
   SIR Gilbert Talbot, Sir William Stanley,
   OXFORD, redoubted Pembroke, Sir James Blunt,
     And Rice ap Thomas, with a valiant crew;
     And many other of great name and worth;
     And towards London do they bend their power,
     If by the way they be not fought withal.
   STANLEY. Well, hie thee to thy lord; I kiss his hand;
     My letter will resolve him of my mind.
     Farewell.                                             Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE 1.
 
 Salisbury. An open place
 
 Enter the SHERIFF and guard, with BUCKINGHAM, led to execution
 
   BUCKINGHAM. Will not King Richard let me speak with
     him?
   SHERIFF. No, my good lord; therefore be patient.
   BUCKINGHAM. Hastings, and Edward's children, Grey, and
--**--**--
   BLUNT. Unless I have mista'en his colours much-
     Which well I am assur'd I have not done-
     His regiment lies half a mile at least
     South from the mighty power of the King.
   RICHMOND. If without peril it be possible,
     Sweet Blunt, make some good means to speak with him
     And give him from me this most needful note.
   BLUNT. Upon my life, my lord, I'll undertake it;
     And so, God give you quiet rest to-night!
   RICHMOND. Good night, good Captain Blunt. Come,
     gentlemen,
     Let us consult upon to-morrow's business.
     In to my tent; the dew is raw and cold.
                                    [They withdraw into the tent]
 
             Enter, to his-tent, KING RICHARD, NORFOLK,
                        RATCLIFF, and CATESBY
 
   KING RICHARD. What is't o'clock?
   CATESBY. It's supper-time, my lord;
     It's nine o'clock.
   KING RICHARD. I will not sup to-night.
     Give me some ink and paper.
     What, is my beaver easier than it was?
     And all my armour laid into my tent?
   CATESBY. It is, my liege; and all things are in readiness.
   KING RICHARD. Good Norfolk, hie thee to thy charge;
     Use careful watch, choose trusty sentinels.
   NORFOLK. I go, my lord.
   KING RICHARD. Stir with the lark to-morrow, gentle Norfolk.
   NORFOLK. I warrant you, my lord.                          Exit
   KING RICHARD. Catesby!
   CATESBY. My lord?
   KING RICHARD. Send out a pursuivant-at-arms
     To Stanley's regiment; bid him bring his power
     Before sunrising, lest his son George fall
     Into the blind cave of eternal night.           Exit CATESBY
     Fill me a bowl of wine. Give me a watch.
     Saddle white Surrey for the field to-morrow.
     Look that my staves be sound, and not too heavy.
     Ratcliff!
   RATCLIFF. My lord?
   KING RICHARD. Saw'st thou the melancholy Lord
     Northumberland?
   RATCLIFF. Thomas the Earl of Surrey and himself,
     Much about cock-shut time, from troop to troop
     Went through the army, cheering up the soldiers.
--**--**--
 
           Enter the GHOST of LADY ANNE, his wife
 
   GHOST.  [To RICHARD]  Richard, thy wife, that wretched
     Anne thy wife
     That never slept a quiet hour with thee
     Now fills thy sleep with perturbations.
     To-morrow in the battle think on me,
     And fall thy edgeless sword. Despair and die.
     [To RICHMOND]  Thou quiet soul, sleep thou a quiet sleep;
     Dream of success and happy victory.
     Thy adversary's wife doth pray for thee.
 
                    Enter the GHOST of BUCKINGHAM
 
   GHOST.  [To RICHARD]  The first was I that help'd thee
     to the crown;
     The last was I that felt thy tyranny.
     O, in the battle think on Buckingham,
     And die in terror of thy guiltiness!
     Dream on, dream on of bloody deeds and death;
     Fainting, despair; despairing, yield thy breath!
     [To RICHMOND]  I died for hope ere I could lend thee aid;
     But cheer thy heart and be thou not dismay'd:
     God and good angels fight on Richmond's side;
     And Richard falls in height of all his pride.
             [The GHOSTS vanish. RICHARD starts out of his dream]
   KING RICHARD. Give me another horse. Bind up my wounds.
     Have mercy, Jesu! Soft! I did but dream.
     O coward conscience, how dost thou afflict me!
     The lights burn blue. It is now dead midnight.
     Cold fearful drops stand on my trembling flesh.
     What do I fear? Myself? There's none else by.
     Richard loves Richard; that is, I am I.
     Is there a murderer here? No-yes, I am.
     Then fly. What, from myself? Great reason why-
     Lest I revenge. What, myself upon myself!
     Alack, I love myself. Wherefore? For any good
     That I myself have done unto myself?
     O, no! Alas, I rather hate myself
     For hateful deeds committed by myself!
     I am a villain; yet I lie, I am not.
     Fool, of thyself speak well. Fool, do not flatter.
--**--**--
     Ravish our daughters?  [Drum afar off]  Hark! I hear their
     drum.
     Fight, gentlemen of England! Fight, bold yeomen!
     Draw, archers, draw your arrows to the head!
     Spur your proud horses hard, and ride in blood;
     Amaze the welkin with your broken staves!
 
                         Enter a MESSENGER
 
     What says Lord Stanley? Will he bring his power?
   MESSENGER. My lord, he doth deny to come.
   KING RICHARD. Off with his son George's head!
   NORFOLK. My lord, the enemy is pass'd the marsh.
     After the battle let George Stanley die.
   KING RICHARD. A thousand hearts are great within my
     bosom.
     Advance our standards, set upon our foes;
     Our ancient word of courage, fair Saint George,
     Inspire us with the spleen of fiery dragons!
     Upon them! Victory sits on our helms.                 Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 4.
 
 Another part of the field
 
 Alarum; excursions. Enter NORFOLK and forces; to him CATESBY
 
   CATESBY. Rescue, my Lord of Norfolk, rescue, rescue!
     The King enacts more wonders than a man,
     Daring an opposite to every danger.
     His horse is slain, and all on foot he fights,
     Seeking for Richmond in the throat of death.
     Rescue, fair lord, or else the day is lost.
 
                      Alarums. Enter KING RICHARD
 
   KING RICHARD. A horse! a horse! my kingdom for a horse!
   CATESBY. Withdraw, my lord! I'll help you to a horse.
   KING RICHARD. Slave, I have set my life upon a cast
     And I Will stand the hazard of the die.
     I think there be six Richmonds in the field;
     Five have I slain to-day instead of him.
     A horse! a horse! my kingdom for a horse!             Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 5.
 
 Another part of the field
 
 Alarum. Enter RICHARD and RICHMOND; they fight; RICHARD is slain.
 Retreat and flourish. Enter RICHMOND, DERBY bearing the crown,
 with other LORDS
 
   RICHMOND. God and your arms be prais'd, victorious friends;
--**--**--
     And makes himself an artificial night.
     Black and portentous must this humour prove
     Unless good counsel may the cause remove.
   Ben. My noble uncle, do you know the cause?
   Mon. I neither know it nor can learn of him
   Ben. Have you importun'd him by any means?
   Mon. Both by myself and many other friend;
     But he, his own affections' counsellor,
     Is to himself- I will not say how true-
     But to himself so secret and so close,
     So far from sounding and discovery,
     As is the bud bit with an envious worm
     Ere he can spread his sweet leaves to the air
     Or dedicate his beauty to the sun.
     Could we but learn from whence his sorrows grow,
     We would as willingly give cure as know.
 
                        Enter Romeo.
 
   Ben. See, where he comes. So please you step aside,
     I'll know his grievance, or be much denied.
   Mon. I would thou wert so happy by thy stay
     To hear true shrift. Come, madam, let's away,
                                      Exeunt [Montague and Wife].
   Ben. Good morrow, cousin.
   Rom. Is the day so young?
   Ben. But new struck nine.
   Rom. Ay me! sad hours seem long.
     Was that my father that went hence so fast?
   Ben. It was. What sadness lengthens Romeo's hours?
   Rom. Not having that which having makes them short.
   Ben. In love?
   Rom. Out-
   Ben. Of love?
   Rom. Out of her favour where I am in love.
   Ben. Alas that love, so gentle in his view,
     Should be so tyrannous and rough in proof!
   Rom. Alas that love, whose view is muffled still,
     Should without eyes see pathways to his will!
     Where shall we dine? O me! What fray was here?
     Yet tell me not, for I have heard it all.
     Here's much to do with hate, but more with love.
--**--**--
     But to rejoice in splendour of my own.              [Exeunt.]
 
 
 
 
 Scene III.
 Capulet's house.
 
 Enter Capulet's Wife, and Nurse.
 
   Wife. Nurse, where's my daughter? Call her forth to me.
   Nurse. Now, by my maidenhead at twelve year old,
     I bade her come. What, lamb! what ladybird!
     God forbid! Where's this girl? What, Juliet!
 
                          Enter Juliet.
 
   Jul. How now? Who calls?
   Nurse. Your mother.
   Jul. Madam, I am here.
     What is your will?
   Wife. This is the matter- Nurse, give leave awhile,
     We must talk in secret. Nurse, come back again;
     I have rememb'red me, thou's hear our counsel.
     Thou knowest my daughter's of a pretty age.
   Nurse. Faith, I can tell her age unto an hour.
   Wife. She's not fourteen.
   Nurse. I'll lay fourteen of my teeth-
     And yet, to my teen be it spoken, I have but four-
     She is not fourteen. How long is it now
     To Lammastide?
   Wife. A fortnight and odd days.
   Nurse. Even or odd, of all days in the year,
     Come Lammas Eve at night shall she be fourteen.
     Susan and she (God rest all Christian souls!)
     Were of an age. Well, Susan is with God;
     She was too good for me. But, as I said,
     On Lammas Eve at night shall she be fourteen;
     That shall she, marry; I remember it well.
     'Tis since the earthquake now eleven years;
     And she was wean'd (I never shall forget it),
     Of all the days of the year, upon that day;
     For I had then laid wormwood to my dug,
     Sitting in the sun under the dovehouse wall.
     My lord and you were then at Mantua.
     Nay, I do bear a brain. But, as I said,
     When it did taste the wormwood on the nipple
     Of my dug and felt it bitter, pretty fool,
     To see it tetchy and fall out with the dug!
--**--**--
     So stakes me to the ground I cannot move.
   Mer. You are a lover. Borrow Cupid's wings
     And soar with them above a common bound.
   Rom. I am too sore enpierced with his shaft
     To soar with his light feathers; and so bound
     I cannot bound a pitch above dull woe.
     Under love's heavy burthen do I sink.
   Mer. And, to sink in it, should you burthen love-
     Too great oppression for a tender thing.
   Rom. Is love a tender thing? It is too rough,
     Too rude, too boist'rous, and it pricks like thorn.
   Mer. If love be rough with you, be rough with love.
     Prick love for pricking, and you beat love down.
     Give me a case to put my visage in.
     A visor for a visor! What care I
     What curious eye doth quote deformities?
     Here are the beetle brows shall blush for me.
   Ben. Come, knock and enter; and no sooner in
     But every man betake him to his legs.
   Rom. A torch for me! Let wantons light of heart
     Tickle the senseless rushes with their heels;
     For I am proverb'd with a grandsire phrase,
     I'll be a candle-holder and look on;
     The game was ne'er so fair, and I am done.
   Mer. Tut! dun's the mouse, the constable's own word!
     If thou art Dun, we'll draw thee from the mire
     Of this sir-reverence love, wherein thou stick'st
     Up to the ears. Come, we burn daylight, ho!
   Rom. Nay, that's not so.
   Mer. I mean, sir, in delay
     We waste our lights in vain, like lamps by day.
     Take our good meaning, for our judgment sits
     Five times in that ere once in our five wits.
   Rom. And we mean well, in going to this masque;
     But 'tis no wit to go.
   Mer. Why, may one ask?
--**--**--
 
   Ben. Romeo! my cousin Romeo! Romeo!
   Mer. He is wise,
     And, on my life, hath stol'n him home to bed.
   Ben. He ran this way, and leapt this orchard wall.
     Call, good Mercutio.
   Mer. Nay, I'll conjure too.
     Romeo! humours! madman! passion! lover!
     Appear thou in the likeness of a sigh;
     Speak but one rhyme, and I am satisfied!
     Cry but 'Ay me!' pronounce but 'love' and 'dove';
     Speak to my gossip Venus one fair word,
     One nickname for her purblind son and heir,
     Young Adam Cupid, he that shot so trim
     When King Cophetua lov'd the beggar maid!
     He heareth not, he stirreth not, be moveth not;
     The ape is dead, and I must conjure him.
     I conjure thee by Rosaline's bright eyes.
     By her high forehead and her scarlet lip,
     By her fine foot, straight leg, and quivering thigh,
     And the demesnes that there adjacent lie,
     That in thy likeness thou appear to us!
   Ben. An if he hear thee, thou wilt anger him.
   Mer. This cannot anger him. 'Twould anger him
     To raise a spirit in his mistress' circle
     Of some strange nature, letting it there stand
     Till she had laid it and conjur'd it down.
     That were some spite; my invocation
     Is fair and honest: in his mistress' name,
     I conjure only but to raise up him.
   Ben. Come, he hath hid himself among these trees
     To be consorted with the humorous night.
     Blind is his love and best befits the dark.
   Mer. If love be blind, love cannot hit the mark.
     Now will he sit under a medlar tree
     And wish his mistress were that kind of fruit
     As maids call medlars when they laugh alone.
     O, Romeo, that she were, O that she were
     An open et cetera, thou a pop'rin pear!
     Romeo, good night. I'll to my truckle-bed;
--**--**--
     What's in a name? That which we call a rose
     By any other name would smell as sweet.
     So Romeo would, were he not Romeo call'd,
     Retain that dear perfection which he owes
     Without that title. Romeo, doff thy name;
     And for that name, which is no part of thee,
     Take all myself.
   Rom. I take thee at thy word.
     Call me but love, and I'll be new baptiz'd;
     Henceforth I never will be Romeo.
   Jul. What man art thou that, thus bescreen'd in night,
     So stumblest on my counsel?
   Rom. By a name
     I know not how to tell thee who I am.
     My name, dear saint, is hateful to myself,
     Because it is an enemy to thee.
     Had I it written, I would tear the word.
   Jul. My ears have yet not drunk a hundred words
     Of that tongue's utterance, yet I know the sound.
     Art thou not Romeo, and a Montague?
   Rom. Neither, fair saint, if either thee dislike.
   Jul. How cam'st thou hither, tell me, and wherefore?
     The orchard walls are high and hard to climb,
     And the place death, considering who thou art,
     If any of my kinsmen find thee here.
   Rom. With love's light wings did I o'erperch these walls;
     For stony limits cannot hold love out,
     And what love can do, that dares love attempt.
     Therefore thy kinsmen are no let to me.
   Jul. If they do see thee, they will murther thee.
   Rom. Alack, there lies more peril in thine eye
     Than twenty of their swords! Look thou but sweet,
     And I am proof against their enmity.
   Jul. I would not for the world they saw thee here.
   Rom. I have night's cloak to hide me from their sight;
     And but thou love me, let them find me here.
     My life were better ended by their hate
--**--**--
     Nor aught so good but, strain'd from that fair use,
     Revolts from true birth, stumbling on abuse.
     Virtue itself turns vice, being misapplied,
     And vice sometime's by action dignified.
     Within the infant rind of this small flower
     Poison hath residence, and medicine power;
     For this, being smelt, with that part cheers each part;
     Being tasted, slays all senses with the heart.
     Two such opposed kings encamp them still
     In man as well as herbs- grace and rude will;
     And where the worser is predominant,
     Full soon the canker death eats up that plant.
 
                         Enter Romeo.
 
   Rom. Good morrow, father.
   Friar. Benedicite!
     What early tongue so sweet saluteth me?
     Young son, it argues a distempered head
     So soon to bid good morrow to thy bed.
     Care keeps his watch in every old man's eye,
     And where care lodges sleep will never lie;
     But where unbruised youth with unstuff'd brain
     Doth couch his limbs, there golden sleep doth reign.
     Therefore thy earliness doth me assure
     Thou art uprous'd with some distemp'rature;
     Or if not so, then here I hit it right-
     Our Romeo hath not been in bed to-night.
   Rom. That last is true-the sweeter rest was mine.
   Friar. God pardon sin! Wast thou with Rosaline?
   Rom. With Rosaline, my ghostly father? No.
     I have forgot that name, and that name's woe.
   Friar. That's my good son! But where hast thou been then?
   Rom. I'll tell thee ere thou ask it me again.
     I have been feasting with mine enemy,
     Where on a sudden one hath wounded me
     That's by me wounded. Both our remedies
     Within thy help and holy physic lies.
     I bear no hatred, blessed man, for, lo,
     My intercession likewise steads my foe.
   Friar. Be plain, good son, and homely in thy drift
     Riddling confession finds but riddling shrift.
--**--**--
     Say either, and I'll stay the circumstance.
     Let me be satisfied, is't good or bad?
   Nurse. Well, you have made a simple choice; you know not how to
     choose a man. Romeo? No, not he. Though his face be better than
     any man's, yet his leg excels all men's; and for a hand and a
     foot, and a body, though they be not to be talk'd on, yet they
     are past compare. He is not the flower of courtesy, but, I'll
     warrant him, as gentle as a lamb. Go thy ways, wench; serve God.
     What, have you din'd at home?
   Jul. No, no. But all this did I know before.
     What says he of our marriage? What of that?
   Nurse. Lord, how my head aches! What a head have I!
     It beats as it would fall in twenty pieces.
     My back o' t' other side,- ah, my back, my back!
     Beshrew your heart for sending me about
     To catch my death with jauncing up and down!
   Jul. I' faith, I am sorry that thou art not well.
     Sweet, sweet, Sweet nurse, tell me, what says my love?
   Nurse. Your love says, like an honest gentleman, and a courteous,
     and a kind, and a handsome; and, I warrant, a virtuous- Where is
     your mother?
   Jul. Where is my mother? Why, she is within.
     Where should she be? How oddly thou repliest!
     'Your love says, like an honest gentleman,
     "Where is your mother?"'
   Nurse. O God's Lady dear!
     Are you so hot? Marry come up, I trow.
     Is this the poultice for my aching bones?
     Henceforward do your messages yourself.
   Jul. Here's such a coil! Come, what says Romeo?
   Nurse. Have you got leave to go to shrift to-day?
   Jul. I have.
   Nurse. Then hie you hence to Friar Laurence' cell;
--**--**--
     I have inform'd his Highness so at large,
     As, liking of the lady's virtuous gifts,
     Her beauty, and the value of her dower,
     He doth intend she shall be England's Queen.
   KING HENRY.  [To AMBASSADOR]  In argument and proof of
     which contract,
     Bear her this jewel, pledge of my affection.
     And so, my Lord Protector, see them guarded
     And safely brought to Dover; where inshipp'd,
     Commit them to the fortune of the sea.
 
                         Exeunt all but WINCHESTER and the LEGATE
   WINCHESTER. Stay, my Lord Legate; you shall first receive
     The sum of money which I promised
     Should be delivered to his Holiness
     For clothing me in these grave ornaments.
   LEGATE. I will attend upon your lordship's leisure.
   WINCHESTER.  [Aside]  Now Winchester will not submit, I
     trow,
     Or be inferior to the proudest peer.
     Humphrey of Gloucester, thou shalt well perceive
     That neither in birth or for authority
     The Bishop will be overborne by thee.
     I'll either make thee stoop and bend thy knee,
     Or sack this country with a mutiny.                   Exeunt
 
 
                               SCENE 2.
 
                        France. Plains in Anjou
 
               Enter CHARLES, BURGUNDY, ALENCON, BASTARD,
                    REIGNIER, LA PUCELLE, and forces
 
   CHARLES. These news, my lords, may cheer our drooping
     spirits:
     'Tis said the stout Parisians do revolt
     And turn again unto the warlike French.
   ALENCON. Then march to Paris, royal Charles of France,
     And keep not back your powers in dalliance.
   PUCELLE. Peace be amongst them, if they turn to us;
     Else ruin combat with their palaces!
 
                             Enter a SCOUT
 
   SCOUT. Success unto our valiant general,
     And happiness to his accomplices!
   CHARLES. What tidings send our scouts? I prithee speak.
   SCOUT. The English army, that divided was
     Into two parties, is now conjoin'd in one,
     And means to give you battle presently.
   CHARLES. Somewhat too sudden, sirs, the warning is;
     But we will presently provide for them.
--**--**--
   MARGARET. Margaret my name, and daughter to a king,
     The King of Naples-whosoe'er thou art.
   SUFFOLK. An earl I am, and Suffolk am I call'd.
     Be not offended, nature's miracle,
     Thou art allotted to be ta'en by me.
     So doth the swan her downy cygnets save,
     Keeping them prisoner underneath her wings.
     Yet, if this servile usage once offend,
     Go and be free again as Suffolk's friend.     [She is going]
     O, stay!  [Aside]  I have no power to let her pass;
     My hand would free her, but my heart says no.
     As plays the sun upon the glassy streams,
     Twinkling another counterfeited beam,
     So seems this gorgeous beauty to mine eyes.
     Fain would I woo her, yet I dare not speak.
     I'll call for pen and ink, and write my mind.
     Fie, de la Pole! disable not thyself;
     Hast not a tongue? Is she not here thy prisoner?
     Wilt thou be daunted at a woman's sight?
     Ay, beauty's princely majesty is such
     Confounds the tongue and makes the senses rough.
   MARGARET. Say, Earl of Suffolk, if thy name be so,
     What ransom must I pay before I pass?
     For I perceive I am thy prisoner.
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside]  How canst thou tell she will deny thy
     suit,
     Before thou make a trial of her love?
   MARGARET. Why speak'st thou not? What ransom must I
     pay?
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside]  She's beautiful, and therefore to be woo'd;
     She is a woman, therefore to be won.
   MARGARET. Wilt thou accept of ransom-yea or no?
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside]  Fond man, remember that thou hast a
     wife;
     Then how can Margaret be thy paramour?
   MARGARET. I were best leave him, for he will not hear.
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside]  There all is marr'd; there lies a cooling
     card.
   MARGARET. He talks at random; sure, the man is mad.
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside]  And yet a dispensation may be had.
--**--**--
     Of benefit proceeding from our king
     And not of any challenge of desert,
     Or we will plague thee with incessant wars.
   REIGNIER.  [To CHARLES]  My lord, you do not well in
     obstinacy
     To cavil in the course of this contract.
     If once it be neglected, ten to one
     We shall not find like opportunity.
   ALENCON.  [To CHARLES]  To say the truth, it is your policy
     To save your subjects from such massacre
     And ruthless slaughters as are daily seen
     By our proceeding in hostility;
     And therefore take this compact of a truce,
     Although you break it when your pleasure serves.
   WARWICK. How say'st thou, Charles? Shall our condition
     stand?
   CHARLES. It shall;
     Only reserv'd, you claim no interest
     In any of our towns of garrison.
   YORK. Then swear allegiance to his Majesty:
     As thou art knight, never to disobey
     Nor be rebellious to the crown of England
     Thou, nor thy nobles, to the crown of England.
                     [CHARLES and the rest give tokens of fealty]
     So, now dismiss your army when ye please;
     Hang up your ensigns, let your drums be still,
     For here we entertain a solemn peace.                 Exeunt
 
 
 
 
                               SCENE 5.
 
                          London. The palace
 
             Enter SUFFOLK, in conference with the KING,
                      GLOUCESTER and EXETER
 
   KING HENRY. Your wondrous rare description, noble Earl,
     Of beauteous Margaret hath astonish'd me.
     Her virtues, graced with external gifts,
     Do breed love's settled passions in my heart;
     And like as rigour of tempestuous gusts
     Provokes the mightiest hulk against the tide,
     So am I driven by breath of her renown
     Either to suffer shipwreck or arrive
     Where I may have fruition of her love.
   SUFFOLK. Tush, my good lord! This superficial tale
     Is but a preface of her worthy praise.
     The chief perfections of that lovely dame,
     Had I sufficient skill to utter them,
--**--**--
 England
 
 
 ACT I. SCENE I.
 London. The palace
 
 Flourish of trumpets; then hautboys. Enter the KING, DUKE HUMPHREY
 OF GLOUCESTER, SALISBURY, WARWICK, and CARDINAL BEAUFORT, on the one side;
 the QUEEN, SUFFOLK, YORK, SOMERSET, and BUCKINGHAM, on the other
 
   SUFFOLK. As by your high imperial Majesty
     I had in charge at my depart for France,
     As procurator to your Excellence,
     To marry Princess Margaret for your Grace;
     So, in the famous ancient city Tours,
     In presence of the Kings of France and Sicil,
     The Dukes of Orleans, Calaber, Bretagne, and Alencon,
     Seven earls, twelve barons, and twenty reverend bishops,
     I have perform'd my task, and was espous'd;
     And humbly now upon my bended knee,
     In sight of England and her lordly peers,
     Deliver up my title in the Queen
     To your most gracious hands, that are the substance
     Of that great shadow I did represent:
     The happiest gift that ever marquis gave,
     The fairest queen that ever king receiv'd.
   KING HENRY. Suffolk, arise. Welcome, Queen Margaret:
     I can express no kinder sign of love
     Than this kind kiss. O Lord, that lends me life,
     Lend me a heart replete with thankfulness!
     For thou hast given me in this beauteous face
     A world of earthly blessings to my soul,
     If sympathy of love unite our thoughts.
   QUEEN. Great King of England, and my gracious lord,
     The mutual conference that my mind hath had,
     By day, by night, waking and in my dreams,
     In courtly company or at my beads,
     With you, mine alder-liefest sovereign,
     Makes me the bolder to salute my king
     With ruder terms, such as my wit affords
     And over-joy of heart doth minister.
   KING HENRY. Her sight did ravish, but her grace in speech,
     Her words y-clad with wisdom's majesty,
     Makes me from wond'ring fall to weeping joys,
--**--**--
     She should have stay'd in France, and starv'd in France,
     Before-
   CARDINAL. My Lord of Gloucester, now ye grow too hot:
     It was the pleasure of my lord the King.
   GLOUCESTER. My Lord of Winchester, I know your mind;
     'Tis not my speeches that you do mislike,
     But 'tis my presence that doth trouble ye.
     Rancour will out: proud prelate, in thy face
     I see thy fury; if I longer stay
     We shall begin our ancient bickerings.
     Lordings, farewell; and say, when I am gone,
     I prophesied France will be lost ere long.              Exit
   CARDINAL. So, there goes our Protector in a rage.
     'Tis known to you he is mine enemy;
     Nay, more, an enemy unto you all,
     And no great friend, I fear me, to the King.
     Consider, lords, he is the next of blood
     And heir apparent to the English crown.
     Had Henry got an empire by his marriage
     And all the wealthy kingdoms of the west,
     There's reason he should be displeas'd at it.
     Look to it, lords; let not his smoothing words
     Bewitch your hearts; be wise and circumspect.
     What though the common people favour him,
     Calling him 'Humphrey, the good Duke of Gloucester,'
     Clapping their hands, and crying with loud voice
     'Jesu maintain your royal excellence!'
     With 'God preserve the good Duke Humphrey!'
     I fear me, lords, for all this flattering gloss,
     He will be found a dangerous Protector.
   BUCKINGHAM. Why should he then protect our sovereign,
     He being of age to govern of himself?
     Cousin of Somerset, join you with me,
     And all together, with the Duke of Suffolk,
     We'll quickly hoise Duke Humphrey from his seat.
   CARDINAL. This weighty business will not brook delay;
     I'll to the Duke of Suffolk presently.                  Exit
   SOMERSET. Cousin of Buckingham, though Humphrey's pride
     And greatness of his place be grief to us,
--**--**--
 Enter three or four PETITIONERS, PETER, the Armourer's man, being one
 
   FIRST PETITIONER. My masters, let's stand close; my Lord Protector
     will come this way by and by, and then we may deliver our
     supplications in the quill.
   SECOND PETITIONER. Marry, the Lord protect him, for he's a good
     man, Jesu bless him!
 
                        Enter SUFFOLK and QUEEN
 
   FIRST PETITIONER. Here 'a comes, methinks, and the Queen with him.
     I'll be the first, sure.
   SECOND PETITIONER. Come back, fool; this is the Duke of Suffolk and
     not my Lord Protector.
   SUFFOLK. How now, fellow! Wouldst anything with me?
   FIRST PETITIONER. I pray, my lord, pardon me; I took ye for my Lord
     Protector.
   QUEEN. [Reads] 'To my Lord Protector!' Are your supplications to
     his lordship? Let me see them. What is thine?
   FIRST PETITIONER. Mine is, an't please your Grace, against John
     Goodman, my Lord Cardinal's man, for keeping my house and lands,
     and wife and all, from me.
   SUFFOLK. Thy wife too! That's some wrong indeed. What's yours?
     What's here! [Reads] 'Against the Duke of Suffolk, for enclosing
     the commons of Melford.' How now, sir knave!
   SECOND PETITIONER. Alas, sir, I am but a poor petitioner of our
     whole township.
   PETER. [Presenting his petition] Against my master, Thomas Horner,
     for saying that the Duke of York was rightful heir to the crown.
   QUEEN. What say'st thou? Did the Duke of York say he was rightful
     heir to the crown?
   PETER. That my master was? No, forsooth. My master said that he
     was, and that the King was an usurper.
   SUFFOLK. Who is there? [Enter servant] Take this fellow in, and
     send for his master with a pursuivant presently. We'll hear more
     of your matter before the King.
                                          Exit servant with PETER
   QUEEN. And as for you, that love to be protected
--**--**--
     you be by her aloft while we be busy below; and so I pray you go,
     in God's name, and leave us. [Exit HUME] Mother Jourdain, be you
     prostrate and grovel on the earth; John Southwell, read you; and
     let us to our work.
 
                  Enter DUCHESS aloft, followed by HUME
 
   DUCHESS. Well said, my masters; and welcome all. To this gear, the
     sooner the better.
   BOLINGBROKE. Patience, good lady; wizards know their times:
     Deep night, dark night, the silent of the night,
     The time of night when Troy was set on fire;
     The time when screech-owls cry and ban-dogs howl,
     And spirits walk and ghosts break up their graves-
     That time best fits the work we have in hand.
     Madam, sit you, and fear not: whom we raise
     We will make fast within a hallow'd verge.
 
      [Here they do the ceremonies belonging, and make the circle;
           BOLINGBROKE or SOUTHWELL reads: 'Conjuro te,' &c.
      It thunders and lightens terribly; then the SPIRIT riseth]
 
   SPIRIT. Adsum.
   MARGERY JOURDAIN. Asmath,
     By the eternal God, whose name and power
     Thou tremblest at, answer that I shall ask;
     For till thou speak thou shalt not pass from hence.
   SPIRIT. Ask what thou wilt; that I had said and done.
   BOLINGBROKE. [Reads] 'First of the king: what shall of him become?'
   SPIRIT. The Duke yet lives that Henry shall depose;
     But him outlive, and die a violent death.
              [As the SPIRIT speaks, SOUTHWELL writes the answer]
   BOLINGBROKE. 'What fates await the Duke of Suffolk?'
   SPIRIT. By water shall he die and take his end.
   BOLINGBROKE. 'What shall befall the Duke of Somerset?'
   SPIRIT. Let him shun castles:
     Safer shall he be upon the sandy plains
     Than where castles mounted stand.
     Have done, for more I hardly can endure.
   BOLINGBROKE. Descend to darkness and the burning lake;
--**--**--
   GLOUCESTER. A subtle knave! But yet it shall not serve:
     Let me see thine eyes; wink now; now open them;
     In my opinion yet thou seest not well.
   SIMPCOX. Yes, master, clear as day, I thank God and Saint Alban.
   GLOUCESTER. Say'st thou me so? What colour is this cloak of?
   SIMPCOX. Red, master; red as blood.
   GLOUCESTER. Why, that's well said. What colour is my gown of?
   SIMPCOX. Black, forsooth; coal-black as jet.
   KING HENRY. Why, then, thou know'st what colour jet is of?
   SUFFOLK. And yet, I think, jet did he never see.
   GLOUCESTER. But cloaks and gowns before this day a many.
   WIFE. Never before this day in all his life.
   GLOUCESTER. Tell me, sirrah, what's my name?
   SIMPCOX. Alas, master, I know not.
   GLOUCESTER. What's his name?
   SIMPCOX. I know not.
   GLOUCESTER. Nor his?
   SIMPCOX. No, indeed, master.
   GLOUCESTER. What's thine own name?
   SIMPCOX. Saunder Simpcox, an if it please you, master.
   GLOUCESTER. Then, Saunder, sit there, the lying'st knave in
     Christendom. If thou hadst been born blind, thou mightst as well
     have known all our names as thus to name the several colours we
     do wear. Sight may distinguish of colours; but suddenly to
     nominate them all, it is impossible. My lords, Saint Alban here
     hath done a miracle; and would ye not think his cunning to be
     great that could restore this cripple to his legs again?
   SIMPCOX. O master, that you could!
   GLOUCESTER. My masters of Saint Albans, have you not beadles in
     your town, and things call'd whips?
   MAYOR. Yes, my lord, if it please your Grace.
   GLOUCESTER. Then send for one presently.
   MAYOR. Sirrah, go fetch the beadle hither straight.
                                                Exit an attendant
   GLOUCESTER. Now fetch me a stool hither by and by. [A stool
     brought] Now, sirrah, if you mean to save yourself from whipping,
--**--**--
   WARWICK. Father, the Duke hath told the truth;
     Thus got the house of Lancaster the crown.
   YORK. Which now they hold by force, and not by right;
     For Richard, the first son's heir, being dead,
     The issue of the next son should have reign'd.
   SALISBURY. But William of Hatfield died without an heir.
   YORK. The third son, Duke of Clarence, from whose line
     I claim the crown, had issue Philippe, a daughter,
     Who married Edmund Mortimer, Earl of March;
     Edmund had issue, Roger Earl of March;
     Roger had issue, Edmund, Anne, and Eleanor.
   SALISBURY. This Edmund, in the reign of Bolingbroke,
     As I have read, laid claim unto the crown;
     And, but for Owen Glendower, had been king,
     Who kept him in captivity till he died.
     But, to the rest.
   YORK. His eldest sister, Anne,
     My mother, being heir unto the crown,
     Married Richard Earl of Cambridge, who was
     To Edmund Langley, Edward the Third's fifth son, son.
     By her I claim the kingdom: she was heir
     To Roger Earl of March, who was the son
     Of Edmund Mortimer, who married Philippe,
     Sole daughter unto Lionel Duke of Clarence;
     So, if the issue of the elder son
     Succeed before the younger, I am King.
   WARWICK. What plain proceedings is more plain than this?
     Henry doth claim the crown from John of Gaunt,
     The fourth son: York claims it from the third.
     Till Lionel's issue fails, his should not reign.
     It fails not yet, but flourishes in thee
     And in thy sons, fair slips of such a stock.
     Then, father Salisbury, kneel we together,
     And in this private plot be we the first
     That shall salute our rightful sovereign
     With honour of his birthright to the crown.
   BOTH. Long live our sovereign Richard, England's King!
   YORK. We thank you, lords. But I am not your king
--**--**--
     And his advantage following your decease-
     That he should come about your royal person
     Or be admitted to your Highness' Council.
     By flattery hath he won the commons' hearts;
     And when he please to make commotion,
     'Tis to be fear'd they all will follow him.
     Now 'tis the spring, and weeds are shallow-rooted;
     Suffer them now, and they'll o'ergrow the garden
     And choke the herbs for want of husbandry.
     The reverent care I bear unto my lord
     Made me collect these dangers in the Duke.
     If it be fond, can it a woman's fear;
     Which fear if better reasons can supplant,
     I will subscribe, and say I wrong'd the Duke.
     My Lord of Suffolk, Buckingham, and York,
     Reprove my allegation if you can,
     Or else conclude my words effectual.
   SUFFOLK. Well hath your Highness seen into this duke;
     And had I first been put to speak my mind,
     I think I should have told your Grace's tale.
     The Duchess, by his subornation,
     Upon my life, began her devilish practices;
     Or if he were not privy to those faults,
     Yet by reputing of his high descent-
     As next the King he was successive heir-
     And such high vaunts of his nobility,
     Did instigate the bedlam brainsick Duchess
     By wicked means to frame our sovereign's fall.
     Smooth runs the water where the brook is deep,
     And in his simple show he harbours treason.
     The fox barks not when he would steal the lamb.
     No, no, my sovereign, Gloucester is a man
     Unsounded yet, and full of deep deceit.
   CARDINAL. Did he not, contrary to form of law,
     Devise strange deaths for small offences done?
   YORK. And did he not, in his protectorship,
     Levy great sums of money through the realm
     For soldiers' pay in France, and never sent it?
     By means whereof the towns each day revolted.
--**--**--
     Unless it were a bloody murderer,
     Or foul felonious thief that fleec'd poor passengers,
     I never gave them condign punishment.
     Murder indeed, that bloody sin, I tortur'd
     Above the felon or what trespass else.
   SUFFOLK. My lord, these faults are easy, quickly answer'd;
     But mightier crimes are laid unto your charge,
     Whereof you cannot easily purge yourself.
     I do arrest you in His Highness' name,
     And here commit you to my Lord Cardinal
     To keep until your further time of trial.
   KING HENRY. My Lord of Gloucester, 'tis my special hope
     That you will clear yourself from all suspense.
     My conscience tells me you are innocent.
   GLOUCESTER. Ah, gracious lord, these days are dangerous!
     Virtue is chok'd with foul ambition,
     And charity chas'd hence by rancour's hand;
     Foul subornation is predominant,
     And equity exil'd your Highness' land.
     I know their complot is to have my life;
     And if my death might make this island happy
     And prove the period of their tyranny,
     I would expend it with all willingness.
     But mine is made the prologue to their play;
     For thousands more that yet suspect no peril
     Will not conclude their plotted tragedy.
     Beaufort's red sparkling eyes blab his heart's malice,
     And Suffolk's cloudy brow his stormy hate;
     Sharp Buckingham unburdens with his tongue
     The envious load that lies upon his heart;
     And dogged York, that reaches at the moon,
     Whose overweening arm I have pluck'd back,
     By false accuse doth level at my life.
     And you, my sovereign lady, with the rest,
     Causeless have laid disgraces on my head,
     And with your best endeavour have stirr'd up
     My liefest liege to be mine enemy;
     Ay, all of you have laid your heads together-
     Myself had notice of your conventicles-
     And all to make away my guiltless life.
     I shall not want false witness to condemn me
--**--**--
     Bearing it to the bloody slaughter-house,
     Even so, remorseless, have they borne him hence;
     And as the dam runs lowing up and down,
     Looking the way her harmless young one went,
     And can do nought but wail her darling's loss,
     Even so myself bewails good Gloucester's case
     With sad unhelpful tears, and with dimm'd eyes
     Look after him, and cannot do him good,
     So mighty are his vowed enemies.
     His fortunes I will weep, and 'twixt each groan
     Say 'Who's a traitor? Gloucester he is none.'           Exit
   QUEEN. Free lords, cold snow melts with the sun's hot beams:
     Henry my lord is cold in great affairs,
     Too full of foolish pity; and Gloucester's show
     Beguiles him as the mournful crocodile
     With sorrow snares relenting passengers;
     Or as the snake, roll'd in a flow'ring bank,
     With shining checker'd slough, doth sting a child
     That for the beauty thinks it excellent.
     Believe me, lords, were none more wise than I-
     And yet herein I judge mine own wit good-
     This Gloucester should be quickly rid the world
     To rid us from the fear we have of him.
   CARDINAL. That he should die is worthy policy;
     But yet we want a colour for his death.
     'Tis meet he be condemn'd by course of law.
   SUFFOLK. But, in my mind, that were no policy:
     The King will labour still to save his life;
     The commons haply rise to save his life;
     And yet we have but trivial argument,
     More than mistrust, that shows him worthy death.
   YORK. So that, by this, you would not have him die.
   SUFFOLK. Ah, York, no man alive so fain as I!
   YORK. 'Tis York that hath more reason for his death.
     But, my Lord Cardinal, and you, my Lord of Suffolk,
     Say as you think, and speak it from your souls:
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 Bury St. Edmunds. A room of state
 
 Enter two or three MURDERERS running over the stage,
 from the murder of DUKE HUMPHREY
 
   FIRST MURDERER. Run to my Lord of Suffolk; let him know
     We have dispatch'd the Duke, as he commanded.
   SECOND MURDERER. O that it were to do! What have we done?
     Didst ever hear a man so penitent?
 
                            Enter SUFFOLK
 
   FIRST MURDERER. Here comes my lord.
   SUFFOLK. Now, sirs, have you dispatch'd this thing?
   FIRST MURDERER. Ay, my good lord, he's dead.
   SUFFOLK. Why, that's well said. Go, get you to my house;
     I will reward you for this venturous deed.
     The King and all the peers are here at hand.
     Have you laid fair the bed? Is all things well,
     According as I gave directions?
   FIRST MURDERER. 'Tis, my good lord.
   SUFFOLK. Away! be gone.                       Exeunt MURDERERS
 
              Sound trumpets. Enter the KING, the QUEEN,
                 CARDINAL, SOMERSET, with attendants
 
   KING HENRY. Go call our uncle to our presence straight;
     Say we intend to try his Grace to-day,
     If he be guilty, as 'tis published.
   SUFFOLK. I'll call him presently, my noble lord.          Exit
   KING HENRY. Lords, take your places; and, I pray you all,
     Proceed no straiter 'gainst our uncle Gloucester
     Than from true evidence, of good esteem,
     He be approv'd in practice culpable.
   QUEEN. God forbid any malice should prevail
     That faultless may condemn a nobleman!
     Pray God he may acquit him of suspicion!
   KING HENRY. I thank thee, Meg; these words content me much.
 
                            Re-enter SUFFOLK
 
     How now! Why look'st thou pale? Why tremblest thou?
     Where is our uncle? What's the matter, Suffolk?
   SUFFOLK. Dead in his bed, my lord; Gloucester is dead.
   QUEEN. Marry, God forfend!
   CARDINAL. God's secret judgment! I did dream to-night
     The Duke was dumb and could not speak a word.
--**--**--
     That want their leader, scatter up and down
     And care not who they sting in his revenge.
     Myself have calm'd their spleenful mutiny
     Until they hear the order of his death.
   KING HENRY. That he is dead, good Warwick, 'tis too true;
     But how he died God knows, not Henry.
     Enter his chamber, view his breathless corpse,
     And comment then upon his sudden death.
   WARWICK. That shall I do, my liege. Stay, Salisbury,
     With the rude multitude till I return.                  Exit
                                    Exit SALISBURY with the commons
   KING HENRY. O Thou that judgest all things, stay my thoughts-
     My thoughts that labour to persuade my soul
     Some violent hands were laid on Humphrey's life!
     If my suspect be false, forgive me, God;
     For judgment only doth belong to Thee.
     Fain would I go to chafe his paly lips
     With twenty thousand kisses and to drain
     Upon his face an ocean of salt tears
     To tell my love unto his dumb deaf trunk;
     And with my fingers feel his hand un-feeling;
     But all in vain are these mean obsequies;
     And to survey his dead and earthy image,
     What were it but to make my sorrow greater?
 
                Bed put forth with the body. Enter WARWICK
 
   WARWICK. Come hither, gracious sovereign, view this body.
   KING HENRY. That is to see how deep my grave is made;
     For with his soul fled all my worldly solace,
     For, seeing him, I see my life in death.
   WARWICK. As surely as my soul intends to live
     With that dread King that took our state upon Him
     To free us from his Father's wrathful curse,
     I do believe that violent hands were laid
     Upon the life of this thrice-famed Duke.
   SUFFOLK. A dreadful oath, sworn with a solemn tongue!
     What instance gives Lord Warwick for his vow?
--**--**--
     Or I should breathe it so into thy body,
     And then it liv'd in sweet Elysium.
     To die by thee were but to die in jest:
     From thee to die were torture more than death.
     O, let me stay, befall what may befall!
   QUEEN. Away! Though parting be a fretful corrosive,
     It is applied to a deathful wound.
     To France, sweet Suffolk. Let me hear from thee;
     For whereso'er thou art in this world's globe
     I'll have an Iris that shall find thee out.
   SUFFOLK. I go.
   QUEEN. And take my heart with thee.           [She kisses him]
   SUFFOLK. A jewel, lock'd into the woefull'st cask
     That ever did contain a thing of worth.
     Even as a splitted bark, so sunder we:
     This way fall I to death.
   QUEEN. This way for me.                       Exeunt severally
 
 
 
 
 SCENE III.
 London. CARDINAL BEAUFORT'S bedchamber
 
 Enter the KING, SALISBURY, and WARWICK, to the CARDINAL in bed
 
   KING HENRY. How fares my lord? Speak, Beaufort, to thy sovereign.
   CARDINAL. If thou be'st Death I'll give thee England's treasure,
     Enough to purchase such another island,
     So thou wilt let me live and feel no pain.
   KING HENRY. Ah, what a sign it is of evil life
     Where death's approach is seen so terrible!
   WARWICK. Beaufort, it is thy sovereign speaks to thee.
   CARDINAL. Bring me unto my trial when you will.
     Died he not in his bed? Where should he die?
     Can I make men live, whe'er they will or no?
     O, torture me no more! I will confess.
     Alive again? Then show me where he is;
     I'll give a thousand pound to look upon him.
     He hath no eyes, the dust hath blinded them.
     Comb down his hair; look, look! it stands upright,
     Like lime-twigs set to catch my winged soul!
     Give me some drink; and bid the apothecary
--**--**--
     in common, and in Cheapside shall my palfrey go to grass. And
     when I am king- as king I will be
   ALL. God save your Majesty!
   CADE. I thank you, good people- there shall be no money; all shall
     eat and drink on my score, and I will apparel them all in one
     livery, that they may agree like brothers and worship me their
     lord.
   DICK. The first thing we do, let's kill all the lawyers.
   CADE. Nay, that I mean to do. Is not this a lamentable thing, that
     of the skin of an innocent lamb should be made parchment? That
     parchment, being scribbl'd o'er, should undo a man? Some say the
     bee stings; but I say 'tis the bee's wax; for I did but seal once
     to a thing, and I was never mine own man since. How now! Who's
     there?
 
               Enter some, bringing in the CLERK OF CHATHAM
 
   SMITH. The clerk of Chatham. He can write and read and cast
     accompt.
   CADE. O monstrous!
   SMITH. We took him setting of boys' copies.
   CADE. Here's a villain!
   SMITH. Has a book in his pocket with red letters in't.
   CADE. Nay, then he is a conjurer.
   DICK. Nay, he can make obligations and write court-hand.
   CADE. I am sorry for't; the man is a proper man, of mine honour;
     unless I find him guilty, he shall not die. Come hither, sirrah,
     I must examine thee. What is thy name?
   CLERK. Emmanuel.
   DICK. They use to write it on the top of letters; 'twill go hard
     with you.
   CADE. Let me alone. Dost thou use to write thy name, or hast thou a
     mark to thyself, like a honest plain-dealing man?
   CLERK. Sir, I thank God, I have been so well brought up that I can
     write my name.
--**--**--
     And so, farewell, for I must hence again.             Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE VI.
 London. Cannon street
 
 Enter JACK CADE and the rest, and strikes his staff on London Stone
 
   CADE. Now is Mortimer lord of this city. And here, sitting upon
     London Stone, I charge and command that, of the city's cost, the
     pissing conduit run nothing but claret wine this first year of
     our reign. And now henceforward it shall be treason for any that
     calls me other than Lord Mortimer.
 
                     Enter a SOLDIER, running
 
   SOLDIER. Jack Cade! Jack Cade!
   CADE. Knock him down there.                    [They kill him]
   SMITH. If this fellow be wise, he'll never call ye Jack Cade more;
     I think he hath a very fair warning.
   DICK. My lord, there's an army gathered together in Smithfield.
   CADE. Come then, let's go fight with them. But first go and set
     London Bridge on fire; and, if you can, burn down the Tower too.
     Come, let's away.                                     Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE VII.
 London. Smithfield
 
 Alarums. MATTHEW GOFFE is slain, and all the rest.  Then enter JACK CADE,
 with his company
 
   CADE. So, sirs. Now go some and pull down the Savoy; others to th'
     Inns of Court; down with them all.
   DICK. I have a suit unto your lordship.
   CADE. Be it a lordship, thou shalt have it for that word.
   DICK. Only that the laws of England may come out of your mouth.
   JOHN. [Aside] Mass, 'twill be sore law then; for he was thrust in
     the mouth with a spear, and 'tis not whole yet.
   SMITH. [Aside] Nay, John, it will be stinking law; for his breath
     stinks with eating toasted cheese.
   CADE. I have thought upon it; it shall be so. Away, burn all the
     records of the realm. My mouth shall be the Parliament of
     England.
   JOHN. [Aside] Then we are like to have biting statutes, unless his
--**--**--
     Or let a rebel lead you to your deaths?
     Who loves the King, and will embrace his pardon,
     Fling up his cap and say 'God save his Majesty!'
     Who hateth him and honours not his father,
     Henry the Fifth, that made all France to quake,
     Shake he his weapon at us and pass by.
   ALL. God save the King! God save the King!
   CADE. What, Buckingham and Clifford, are ye so brave?
     And you, base peasants, do ye believe him? Will you needs be
     hang'd with your about your necks? Hath my sword therefore broke
     through London gates, that you should leave me at the White Hart
     in Southwark? I thought ye would never have given out these arms
     till you had recovered your ancient freedom. But you are all
     recreants and dastards, and delight to live in slavery to the
     nobility. Let them break your backs with burdens, take your
     houses over your heads, ravish your wives and daughters before
     your faces. For me, I will make shift for one; and so God's curse
     light upon you all!
   ALL. We'll follow Cade, we'll follow Cade!
   CLIFFORD. Is Cade the son of Henry the Fifth,
     That thus you do exclaim you'll go with him?
     Will he conduct you through the heart of France,
     And make the meanest of you earls and dukes?
     Alas, he hath no home, no place to fly to;
     Nor knows he how to live but by the spoil,
     Unless by robbing of your friends and us.
     Were't not a shame that whilst you live at jar
     The fearful French, whom you late vanquished,
     Should make a start o'er seas and vanquish you?
     Methinks already in this civil broil
     I see them lording it in London streets,
     Crying 'Villiago!' unto all they meet.
     Better ten thousand base-born Cades miscarry
--**--**--
     On sheep or oxen could I spend my fury.
     I am far better born than is the King,
     More like a king, more kingly in my thoughts;
     But I must make fair weather yet awhile,
     Till Henry be more weak and I more strong.-
     Buckingham, I prithee, pardon me
     That I have given no answer all this while;
     My mind was troubled with deep melancholy.
     The cause why I have brought this army hither
     Is to remove proud Somerset from the King,
     Seditious to his Grace and to the state.
   BUCKINGHAM. That is too much presumption on thy part;
     But if thy arms be to no other end,
     The King hath yielded unto thy demand:
     The Duke of Somerset is in the Tower.
   YORK. Upon thine honour, is he prisoner?
   BUCKINGHAM. Upon mine honour, he is prisoner.
   YORK. Then, Buckingham, I do dismiss my pow'rs.
     Soldiers, I thank you all; disperse yourselves;
     Meet me to-morrow in Saint George's field,
     You shall have pay and everything you wish.
     And let my sovereign, virtuous Henry,
     Command my eldest son, nay, all my sons,
     As pledges of my fealty and love.
     I'll send them all as willing as I live:
     Lands, goods, horse, armour, anything I have,
     Is his to use, so Somerset may die.
   BUCKINGHAM. York, I commend this kind submission.
     We twain will go into his Highness' tent.
 
                   Enter the KING, and attendants
 
   KING HENRY. Buckingham, doth York intend no harm to us,
     That thus he marcheth with thee arm in arm?
   YORK. In all submission and humility
     York doth present himself unto your Highness.
   KING HENRY. Then what intends these forces thou dost bring?
   YORK. To heave the traitor Somerset from hence,
     And fight against that monstrous rebel Cade,
     Who since I heard to be discomfited.
 
                     Enter IDEN, with CADE's head
--**--**--
                Enter the EARLS OF WARWICK and SALISBURY
 
   CLIFFORD. Are these thy bears? We'll bait thy bears to death,
     And manacle the berard in their chains,
     If thou dar'st bring them to the baiting-place.
   RICHARD. Oft have I seen a hot o'er weening cur
     Run back and bite, because he was withheld;
     Who, being suffer'd, with the bear's fell paw,
     Hath clapp'd his tail between his legs and cried;
     And such a piece of service will you do,
     If you oppose yourselves to match Lord Warwick.
   CLIFFORD. Hence, heap of wrath, foul indigested lump,
     As crooked in thy manners as thy shape!
   YORK. Nay, we shall heat you thoroughly anon.
   CLIFFORD. Take heed, lest by your heat you burn yourselves.
   KING HENRY. Why, Warwick, hath thy knee forgot to bow?
     Old Salisbury, shame to thy silver hair,
     Thou mad misleader of thy brainsick son!
     What, wilt thou on thy death-bed play the ruffian
     And seek for sorrow with thy spectacles?
     O, where is faith? O, where is loyalty?
     If it be banish'd from the frosty head,
     Where shall it find a harbour in the earth?
     Wilt thou go dig a grave to find out war
     And shame thine honourable age with blood?
     Why art thou old, and want'st experience?
     Or wherefore dost abuse it, if thou hast it?
     For shame! In duty bend thy knee to me,
     That bows unto the grave with mickle age.
   SALISBURY. My lord, I have considered with myself
     The tide of this most renowned duke,
     And in my conscience do repute his Grace
     The rightful heir to England's royal seat.
   KING HENRY. Hast thou not sworn allegiance unto me?
   SALISBURY. I have.
   KING HENRY. Canst thou dispense with heaven for such an oath?
   SALISBURY. It is great sin to swear unto a sin;
     But greater sin to keep a sinful oath.
--**--**--
     And like rich hangings in a homely house,
     So was his will in his old feeble body.
     But, noble as he is, look where he comes.
 
                          Enter SALISBURY
 
   SALISBURY. Now, by my sword, well hast thou fought to-day!
     By th' mass, so did we all. I thank you, Richard:
     God knows how long it is I have to live,
     And it hath pleas'd Him that three times to-day
     You have defended me from imminent death.
     Well, lords, we have not got that which we have;
     'Tis not enough our foes are this time fled,
     Being opposites of such repairing nature.
   YORK. I know our safety is to follow them;
     For, as I hear, the King is fled to London
     To call a present court of Parliament.
     Let us pursue him ere the writs go forth.
     What says Lord Warwick? Shall we after them?
   WARWICK. After them? Nay, before them, if we can.
     Now, by my faith, lords, 'twas a glorious day:
     Saint Albans' battle, won by famous York,
     Shall be eterniz'd in all age to come.
     Sound drum and trumpets and to London all;
     And more such days as these to us befall!             Exeunt
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1591
 
 THE THIRD PART OF KING HENRY THE SIXTH
 
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
   KING HENRY THE SIXTH
   EDWARD, PRINCE OF WALES, his son
   LEWIS XI, King of France           DUKE OF SOMERSET
   DUKE OF EXETER                     EARL OF OXFORD
   EARL OF NORTHUMBERLAND             EARL OF WESTMORELAND
   LORD CLIFFORD
   RICHARD PLANTAGENET, DUKE OF YORK
   EDWARD, EARL OF MARCH, afterwards KING EDWARD IV, his son
   EDMUND, EARL OF RUTLAND, his son
   GEORGE, afterwards DUKE OF CLARENCE, his son
   RICHARD, afterwards DUKE OF GLOUCESTER, his son
   DUKE OF NORFOLK                    MARQUIS OF MONTAGUE
   EARL OF WARWICK                    EARL OF PEMBROKE
   LORD HASTINGS                      LORD STAFFORD
   SIR JOHN MORTIMER, uncle to the Duke of York
--**--**--
     Lord Clifford vows to fight in thy defence.
     May that ground gape, and swallow me alive,
     Where I shall kneel to him that slew my father!
   KING HENRY. O Clifford, how thy words revive my heart!
   YORK. Henry of Lancaster, resign thy crown.
     What mutter you, or what conspire you, lords?
   WARWICK. Do right unto this princely Duke of York;
     Or I will fill the house with armed men,
     And over the chair of state, where now he sits,
     Write up his title with usurping blood.
                                 [He stamps with his foot and the
                                        soldiers show themselves]
   KING HENRY. My Lord of Warwick, hear but one word:
     Let me for this my life-time reign as king.
   YORK. Confirm the crown to me and to mine heirs,
     And thou shalt reign in quiet while thou liv'st.
   KING HENRY. I am content. Richard Plantagenet,
     Enjoy the kingdom after my decease.
   CLIFFORD. What wrong is this unto the Prince your son!
   WARWICK. What good is this to England and himself!
   WESTMORELAND. Base, fearful, and despairing Henry!
   CLIFFORD. How hast thou injur'd both thyself and or us!
   WESTMORELAND. I cannot stay to hear these articles.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. Nor I.
   CLIFFORD. Come, cousin, let us tell the Queen these news.
   WESTMORELAND. Farewell, faint-hearted and degenerate king,
     In whose cold blood no spark of honour bides.
   NORTHUMBERLAND. Be thou a prey unto the house of York
     And die in bands for this unmanly deed!
   CLIFFORD. In dreadful war mayst thou be overcome,
     Or live in peace abandon'd and despis'd!
                                 Exeunt NORTHUMBERLAND, CLIFFORD,
                                                 and WESTMORELAND
   WARWICK. Turn this way, Henry, and regard them not.
   EXETER. They seek revenge, and therefore will not yield.
   KING HENRY. Ah, Exeter!
   WARWICK. Why should you sigh, my lord?
   KING HENRY. Not for myself, Lord Warwick, but my son,
     Whom I unnaturally shall disinherit.
--**--**--
                      Enter the DUKE OF YORK
 
   YORK. Why, how now, sons and brother! at a strife?
     What is your quarrel? How began it first?
   EDWARD. No quarrel, but a slight contention.
   YORK. About what?
   RICHARD. About that which concerns your Grace and us-
     The crown of England, father, which is yours.
   YORK. Mine, boy? Not till King Henry be dead.
   RICHARD. Your right depends not on his life or death.
   EDWARD. Now you are heir, therefore enjoy it now.
     By giving the house of Lancaster leave to breathe,
     It will outrun you, father, in the end.
   YORK. I took an oath that he should quietly reign.
   EDWARD. But for a kingdom any oath may be broken:
     I would break a thousand oaths to reign one year.
   RICHARD. No; God forbid your Grace should be forsworn.
   YORK. I shall be, if I claim by open war.
   RICHARD. I'll prove the contrary, if you'll hear me speak.
   YORK. Thou canst not, son; it is impossible.
   RICHARD. An oath is of no moment, being not took
     Before a true and lawful magistrate
     That hath authority over him that swears.
     Henry had none, but did usurp the place;
     Then, seeing 'twas he that made you to depose,
     Your oath, my lord, is vain and frivolous.
     Therefore, to arms. And, father, do but think
     How sweet a thing it is to wear a crown,
     Within whose circuit is Elysium
     And all that poets feign of bliss and joy.
     Why do we linger thus? I cannot rest
     Until the white rose that I wear be dy'd
     Even in the lukewarm blood of Henry's heart.
   YORK. Richard, enough; I will be King, or die.
     Brother, thou shalt to London presently
     And whet on Warwick to this enterprise.
     Thou, Richard, shalt to the Duke of Norfolk
     And tell him privily of our intent.
--**--**--
                                                   [Stabbing him]
   QUEEN MARGARET. And here's to right our gentle-hearted king.
                                                   [Stabbing him]
   YORK. Open Thy gate of mercy, gracious God!
     My soul flies through these wounds to seek out Thee.
                                                           [Dies]
   QUEEN MARGARET. Off with his head, and set it on York gates;
     So York may overlook the town of York.
                                                 Flourish. Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT II. SCENE I.
 A plain near Mortimer's Cross in Herefordshire
 
 A march. Enter EDWARD, RICHARD, and their power
 
   EDWARD. I wonder how our princely father scap'd,
     Or whether he be scap'd away or no
     From Clifford's and Northumberland's pursuit.
     Had he been ta'en, we should have heard the news;
     Had he been slain, we should have heard the news;
     Or had he scap'd, methinks we should have heard
     The happy tidings of his good escape.
     How fares my brother? Why is he so sad?
   RICHARD. I cannot joy until I be resolv'd
     Where our right valiant father is become.
     I saw him in the battle range about,
     And watch'd him how he singled Clifford forth.
     Methought he bore him in the thickest troop
     As doth a lion in a herd of neat;
     Or as a bear, encompass'd round with dogs,
     Who having pinch'd a few and made them cry,
     The rest stand all aloof and bark at him.
     So far'd our father with his enemies;
     So fled his enemies my warlike father.
     Methinks 'tis prize enough to be his son.
     See how the morning opes her golden gates
     And takes her farewell of the glorious sun.
     How well resembles it the prime of youth,
     Trimm'd like a younker prancing to his love!
   EDWARD. Dazzle mine eyes, or do I see three suns?
   RICHARD. Three glorious suns, each one a perfect sun;
     Not separated with the racking clouds,
     But sever'd in a pale clear-shining sky.
--**--**--
     Making another head to fight again.
   EDWARD. Where is the Duke of Norfolk, gentle Warwick?
     And when came George from Burgundy to England?
   WARWICK. Some six miles off the Duke is with the soldiers;
     And for your brother, he was lately sent
     From your kind aunt, Duchess of Burgundy,
     With aid of soldiers to this needful war.
   RICHARD. 'Twas odds, belike, when valiant Warwick fled.
     Oft have I heard his praises in pursuit,
     But ne'er till now his scandal of retire.
   WARWICK. Nor now my scandal, Richard, dost thou hear;
     For thou shalt know this strong right hand of mine
     Can pluck the diadem from faint Henry's head
     And wring the awful sceptre from his fist,
     Were he as famous and as bold in war
     As he is fam'd for mildness, peace, and prayer.
   RICHARD. I know it well, Lord Warwick; blame me not.
     'Tis love I bear thy glories makes me speak.
     But in this troublous time what's to be done?
     Shall we go throw away our coats of steel
     And wrap our bodies in black mourning-gowns,
     Numbering our Ave-Maries with our beads?
     Or shall we on the helmets of our foes
     Tell our devotion with revengeful arms?
     If for the last, say 'Ay,' and to it, lords.
   WARWICK. Why, therefore Warwick came to seek you out;
     And therefore comes my brother Montague.
     Attend me, lords. The proud insulting Queen,
     With Clifford and the haught Northumberland,
     And of their feather many moe proud birds,
     Have wrought the easy-melting King like wax.
     He swore consent to your succession,
     His oath enrolled in the parliament;
     And now to London all the crew are gone
     To frustrate both his oath and what beside
     May make against the house of Lancaster.
     Their power, I think, is thirty thousand strong.
     Now if the help of Norfolk and myself,
--**--**--
 Alarum; excursions. Enter WARWICK
 
   WARWICK. Forspent with toil, as runners with a race,
     I lay me down a little while to breathe;
     For strokes receiv'd and many blows repaid
     Have robb'd my strong-knit sinews of their strength,
     And spite of spite needs must I rest awhile.
 
                      Enter EDWARD, running
 
   EDWARD. Smile, gentle heaven, or strike, ungentle death;
     For this world frowns, and Edward's sun is clouded.
   WARWICK. How now, my lord. What hap? What hope of good?
 
                          Enter GEORGE
 
   GEORGE. Our hap is lost, our hope but sad despair;
     Our ranks are broke, and ruin follows us.
     What counsel give you? Whither shall we fly?
   EDWARD. Bootless is flight: they follow us with wings;
     And weak we are, and cannot shun pursuit.
 
                          Enter RICHARD
 
   RICHARD. Ah, Warwick, why hast thou withdrawn thyself?
     Thy brother's blood the thirsty earth hath drunk,
     Broach'd with the steely point of Clifford's lance;
     And in the very pangs of death he cried,
     Like to a dismal clangor heard from far,
     'Warwick, revenge! Brother, revenge my death.'
     So, underneath the belly of their steeds,
     That stain'd their fetlocks in his smoking blood,
     The noble gentleman gave up the ghost.
   WARWICK. Then let the earth be drunken with our blood.
     I'll kill my horse, because I will not fly.
     Why stand we like soft-hearted women here,
     Wailing our losses, whiles the foe doth rage,
     And look upon, as if the tragedy
     Were play'd in jest by counterfeiting actors?
     Here on my knee I vow to God above
     I'll never pause again, never stand still,
     Till either death hath clos'd these eyes of mine
     Or fortune given me measure of revenge.
   EDWARD. O Warwick, I do bend my knee with thine,
     And in this vow do chain my soul to thine!
     And ere my knee rise from the earth's cold face
--**--**--
     This man whom hand to hand I slew in fight
     May be possessed with some store of crowns;
     And I, that haply take them from him now,
     May yet ere night yield both my life and them
     To some man else, as this dead man doth me.
     Who's this? O God! It is my father's face,
     Whom in this conflict I unwares have kill'd.
     O heavy times, begetting such events!
     From London by the King was I press'd forth;
     My father, being the Earl of Warwick's man,
     Came on the part of York, press'd by his master;
     And I, who at his hands receiv'd my life,
     Have by my hands of life bereaved him.
     Pardon me, God, I knew not what I did.
     And pardon, father, for I knew not thee.
     My tears shall wipe away these bloody marks;
     And no more words till they have flow'd their fill.
   KING HENRY. O piteous spectacle! O bloody times!
     Whiles lions war and battle for their dens,
     Poor harmless lambs abide their enmity.
     Weep, wretched man; I'll aid thee tear for tear;
     And let our hearts and eyes, like civil war,
     Be blind with tears and break o'ercharg'd with grief.
 
                Enter FATHER, bearing of his SON
 
   FATHER. Thou that so stoutly hath resisted me,
     Give me thy gold, if thou hast any gold;
     For I have bought it with an hundred blows.
     But let me see. Is this our foeman's face?
     Ah, no, no, no, no, it is mine only son!
     Ah, boy, if any life be left in thee,
     Throw up thine eye! See, see what show'rs arise,
     Blown with the windy tempest of my heart
     Upon thy wounds, that kills mine eye and heart!
     O, pity, God, this miserable age!
     What stratagems, how fell, how butcherly,
     Erroneous, mutinous, and unnatural,
--**--**--
     Some troops pursue the bloody-minded Queen
     That led calm Henry, though he were a king,
     As doth a sail, fill'd with a fretting gust,
     Command an argosy to stern the waves.
     But think you, lords, that Clifford fled with them?
   WARWICK. No, 'tis impossible he should escape;
     For, though before his face I speak the words,
     Your brother Richard mark'd him for the grave;
     And, whereso'er he is, he's surely dead.
                                      [CLIFFORD groans, and dies]
   RICHARD. Whose soul is that which takes her heavy leave?
     A deadly groan, like life and death's departing.
     See who it is.
   EDWARD. And now the battle's ended,
     If friend or foe, let him be gently used.
   RICHARD. Revoke that doom of mercy, for 'tis Clifford;
     Who not contented that he lopp'd the branch
     In hewing Rutland when his leaves put forth,
     But set his murd'ring knife unto the root
     From whence that tender spray did sweetly spring-
     I mean our princely father, Duke of York.
   WARWICK. From off the gates of York fetch down the head,
     Your father's head, which Clifford placed there;
     Instead whereof let this supply the room.
     Measure for measure must be answered.
   EDWARD. Bring forth that fatal screech-owl to our house,
     That nothing sung but death to us and ours.
     Now death shall stop his dismal threat'ning sound,
     And his ill-boding tongue no more shall speak.
   WARWICK. I think his understanding is bereft.
     Speak, Clifford, dost thou know who speaks to thee?
     Dark cloudy death o'ershades his beams of life,
     And he nor sees nor hears us what we say.
   RICHARD. O, would he did! and so, perhaps, he doth.
     'Tis but his policy to counterfeit,
     Because he would avoid such bitter taunts
     Which in the time of death he gave our father.
   GEORGE. If so thou think'st, vex him with eager words.
--**--**--
   KING EDWARD. Then get your husband's lands, to do them good.
   LADY GREY. Therefore I came unto your Majesty.
   KING EDWARD. I'll tell you how these lands are to be got.
   LADY GREY. So shall you bind me to your Highness' service.
   KING EDWARD. What service wilt thou do me if I give them?
   LADY GREY. What you command that rests in me to do.
   KING EDWARD. But you will take exceptions to my boon.
   LADY GREY. No, gracious lord, except I cannot do it.
   KING EDWARD. Ay, but thou canst do what I mean to ask.
   LADY GREY. Why, then I will do what your Grace commands.
   GLOUCESTER. He plies her hard; and much rain wears the marble.
   CLARENCE. As red as fire! Nay, then her wax must melt.
   LADY GREY. Why stops my lord? Shall I not hear my task?
   KING EDWARD. An easy task; 'tis but to love a king.
   LADY GREY. That's soon perform'd, because I am a subject.
   KING EDWARD. Why, then, thy husband's lands I freely give thee.
   LADY GREY. I take my leave with many thousand thanks.
   GLOUCESTER. The match is made; she seals it with a curtsy.
   KING EDWARD. But stay thee- 'tis the fruits of love I mean.
   LADY GREY. The fruits of love I mean, my loving liege.
   KING EDWARD. Ay, but, I fear me, in another sense.
     What love, thinkst thou, I sue so much to get?
   LADY GREY. My love till death, my humble thanks, my prayers;
     That love which virtue begs and virtue grants.
   KING EDWARD. No, by my troth, I did not mean such love.
   LADY GREY. Why, then you mean not as I thought you did.
   KING EDWARD. But now you partly may perceive my mind.
   LADY GREY. My mind will never grant what I perceive
--**--**--
     And now forthwith shall articles be drawn
     Touching the jointure that your king must make,
     Which with her dowry shall be counterpois'd.
     Draw near, Queen Margaret, and be a witness
     That Bona shall be wife to the English king.
   PRINCE OF WALES. To Edward, but not to the English king.
   QUEEN MARGARET. Deceitful Warwick, it was thy device
     By this alliance to make void my suit.
     Before thy coming, Lewis was Henry's friend.
   LEWIS. And still is friend to him and Margaret.
     But if your title to the crown be weak,
     As may appear by Edward's good success,
     Then 'tis but reason that I be releas'd
     From giving aid which late I promised.
     Yet shall you have all kindness at my hand
     That your estate requires and mine can yield.
   WARWICK. Henry now lives in Scotland at his case,
     Where having nothing, nothing can he lose.
     And as for you yourself, our quondam queen,
     You have a father able to maintain you,
     And better 'twere you troubled him than France.
   QUEEN MARGARET. Peace, impudent and shameless Warwick,
     Proud setter up and puller down of kings!
     I will not hence till with my talk and tears,
     Both full of truth, I make King Lewis behold
     Thy sly conveyance and thy lord's false love;
     For both of you are birds of self-same feather.
                                     [POST blowing a horn within]
   LEWIS. Warwick, this is some post to us or thee.
 
                        Enter the POST
 
   POST. My lord ambassador, these letters are for you,
     Sent from your brother, Marquis Montague.
     These from our King unto your Majesty.
     And, madam, these for you; from whom I know not.
                                    [They all read their letters]
   OXFORD. I like it well that our fair Queen and mistress
     Smiles at her news, while Warwick frowns at his.
   PRINCE OF WALES. Nay, mark how Lewis stamps as he were nettled.
--**--**--
     'Gainst foreign storms than any home-bred marriage.
   HASTINGS. Why, knows not Montague that of itself
     England is safe, if true within itself?
   MONTAGUE. But the safer when 'tis back'd with France.
   HASTINGS. 'Tis better using France than trusting France.
     Let us be back'd with God, and with the seas
     Which He hath giv'n for fence impregnable,
     And with their helps only defend ourselves.
     In them and in ourselves our safety lies.
   CLARENCE. For this one speech Lord Hastings well deserves
     To have the heir of the Lord Hungerford.
   KING EDWARD. Ay, what of that? it was my will and grant;
     And for this once my will shall stand for law.
   GLOUCESTER. And yet methinks your Grace hath not done well
     To give the heir and daughter of Lord Scales
     Unto the brother of your loving bride.
     She better would have fitted me or Clarence;
     But in your bride you bury brotherhood.
   CLARENCE. Or else you would not have bestow'd the heir
     Of the Lord Bonville on your new wife's son,
     And leave your brothers to go speed elsewhere.
   KING EDWARD. Alas, poor Clarence! Is it for a wife
     That thou art malcontent? I will provide thee.
   CLARENCE. In choosing for yourself you show'd your judgment,
     Which being shallow, you shall give me leave
     To play the broker in mine own behalf;
     And to that end I shortly mind to leave you.
   KING EDWARD. Leave me or tarry, Edward will be King,
     And not be tied unto his brother's will.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. My lords, before it pleas'd his Majesty
     To raise my state to title of a queen,
     Do me but right, and you must all confess
     That I was not ignoble of descent:
     And meaner than myself have had like fortune.
     But as this title honours me and mine,
--**--**--
     Lewis and the Lady Bona send to him.
     Now for a while farewell, good Duke of York.
   KING EDWARD. What fates impose, that men must needs abide;
     It boots not to resist both wind and tide.
                                     [They lead him out forcibly]
   OXFORD. What now remains, my lords, for us to do
     But march to London with our soldiers?
   WARWICK. Ay, that's the first thing that we have to do;
     To free King Henry from imprisonment,
     And see him seated in the regal throne.               Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.
 London. The palace
 
 Enter QUEEN ELIZABETH and RIVERS
 
   RIVERS. Madam, what makes you in this sudden change?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Why, brother Rivers, are you yet to learn
     What late misfortune is befall'n King Edward?
   RIVERS. What, loss of some pitch'd battle against Warwick?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. No, but the loss of his own royal person.
   RIVERS. Then is my sovereign slain?
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Ay, almost slain, for he is taken prisoner;
     Either betray'd by falsehood of his guard
     Or by his foe surpris'd at unawares;
     And, as I further have to understand,
     Is new committed to the Bishop of York,
     Fell Warwick's brother, and by that our foe.
   RIVERS. These news, I must confess, are full of grief;
     Yet, gracious madam, bear it as you may:
     Warwick may lose that now hath won the day.
   QUEEN ELIZABETH. Till then, fair hope must hinder life's decay.
     And I the rather wean me from despair
     For love of Edward's offspring in my womb.
     This is it that makes me bridle passion
     And bear with mildness my misfortune's cross;
     Ay, ay, for this I draw in many a tear
     And stop the rising of blood-sucking sighs,
     Lest with my sighs or tears I blast or drown
     King Edward's fruit, true heir to th' English crown.
   RIVERS. But, madam, where is Warwick then become?
--**--**--
 
                           Enter a POST
 
   WARWICK. What news, my friend?
   POST. That Edward is escaped from your brother
     And fled, as he hears since, to Burgundy.
   WARWICK. Unsavoury news! But how made he escape?
   POST. He was convey'd by Richard Duke of Gloucester
     And the Lord Hastings, who attended him
     In secret ambush on the forest side
     And from the Bishop's huntsmen rescu'd him;
     For hunting was his daily exercise.
   WARWICK. My brother was too careless of his charge.
     But let us hence, my sovereign, to provide
     A salve for any sore that may betide.
                    Exeunt all but SOMERSET, RICHMOND, and OXFORD
   SOMERSET. My lord, I like not of this flight of Edward's;
     For doubtless Burgundy will yield him help,
     And we shall have more wars befor't be long.
     As Henry's late presaging prophecy
     Did glad my heart with hope of this young Richmond,
     So doth my heart misgive me, in these conflicts,
     What may befall him to his harm and ours.
     Therefore, Lord Oxford, to prevent the worst,
     Forthwith we'll send him hence to Brittany,
     Till storms be past of civil enmity.
   OXFORD. Ay, for if Edward repossess the crown,
     'Tis like that Richmond with the rest shall down.
   SOMERSET. It shall be so; he shall to Brittany.
     Come therefore, let's about it speedily.              Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE VII.
 Before York
 
 Flourish. Enter KING EDWARD, GLOUCESTER, HASTINGS, and soldiers
 
   KING EDWARD. Now, brother Richard, Lord Hastings, and the rest,
     Yet thus far fortune maketh us amends,
     And says that once more I shall interchange
     My waned state for Henry's regal crown.
     Well have we pass'd and now repass'd the seas,
     And brought desired help from Burgundy;
     What then remains, we being thus arriv'd
     From Ravenspurgh haven before the gates of York,
     But that we enter, as into our dukedom?
   GLOUCESTER. The gates made fast! Brother, I like not this;
--**--**--
   OXFORD. [Kissing the KING'S band] And thus I seal my truth and bid
     adieu.
   KING HENRY. Sweet Oxford, and my loving Montague,
     And all at once, once more a happy farewell.
   WARWICK. Farewell, sweet lords; let's meet at Coventry.
                               Exeunt all but the KING and EXETER
   KING HENRY. Here at the palace will I rest a while.
     Cousin of Exeter, what thinks your lordship?
     Methinks the power that Edward hath in field
     Should not be able to encounter mine.
   EXETER. The doubt is that he will seduce the rest.
   KING HENRY. That's not my fear; my meed hath got me fame:
     I have not stopp'd mine ears to their demands,
     Nor posted off their suits with slow delays;
     My pity hath been balm to heal their wounds,
     My mildness hath allay'd their swelling griefs,
     My mercy dried their water-flowing tears;
     I have not been desirous of their wealth,
     Nor much oppress'd them with great subsidies,
     Nor forward of revenge, though they much err'd.
     Then why should they love Edward more than me?
     No, Exeter, these graces challenge grace;
     And, when the lion fawns upon the lamb,
     The lamb will never cease to follow him.
                       [Shout within 'A Lancaster! A Lancaster!']
   EXETER. Hark, hark, my lord! What shouts are these?
 
             Enter KING EDWARD, GLOUCESTER, and soldiers
 
   KING EDWARD. Seize on the shame-fac'd Henry, bear him hence;
     And once again proclaim us King of England.
     You are the fount that makes small brooks to flow.
     Now stops thy spring; my sea shall suck them dry,
     And swell so much the higher by their ebb.
     Hence with him to the Tower: let him not speak.
                                      Exeunt some with KING HENRY
     And, lords, towards Coventry bend we our course,
     Where peremptory Warwick now remains.
     The sun shines hot; and, if we use delay,
--**--**--
     And do expect him here some two hours hence.
                                                     [Drum heard]
   WARWICK. Then Clarence is at hand; I hear his drum.
   SOMERVILLE. It is not his, my lord; here Southam lies.
     The drum your Honour hears marcheth from Warwick.
   WARWICK. Who should that be? Belike unlook'd for friends.
   SOMERVILLE. They are at hand, and you shall quickly know.
 
         March. Flourish. Enter KING EDWARD, GLOUCESTER,
                          and soldiers
 
   KING EDWARD. Go, trumpet, to the walls, and sound a parle.
   GLOUCESTER. See how the surly Warwick mans the wall.
   WARWICK. O unbid spite! Is sportful Edward come?
     Where slept our scouts or how are they seduc'd
     That we could hear no news of his repair?
   KING EDWARD. Now, Warwick, wilt thou ope the city gates,
     Speak gentle words, and humbly bend thy knee,
     Call Edward King, and at his hands beg mercy?
     And he shall pardon thee these outrages.
   WARWICK. Nay, rather, wilt thou draw thy forces hence,
     Confess who set thee up and pluck'd thee down,
     Call Warwick patron, and be penitent?
     And thou shalt still remain the Duke of York.
   GLOUCESTER. I thought, at least, he would have said the King;
     Or did he make the jest against his will?
   WARWICK. Is not a dukedom, sir, a goodly gift?
   GLOUCESTER. Ay, by my faith, for a poor earl to give.
     I'll do thee service for so good a gift.
   WARWICK. 'Twas I that gave the kingdom to thy brother.
   KING EDWARD. Why then 'tis mine, if but by Warwick's gift.
   WARWICK. Thou art no Atlas for so great a weight;
     And, weakling, Warwick takes his gift again;
     And Henry is my King, Warwick his subject.
   KING EDWARD. But Warwick's king is Edward's prisoner.
     And, gallant Warwick, do but answer this:
     What is the body when the head is off?
   GLOUCESTER. Alas, that Warwick had no more forecast,
--**--**--
     I well might hear, delivered with a groan,
     'O farewell, Warwick!'
   WARWICK. Sweet rest his soul! Fly, lords, and save yourselves:
     For Warwick bids you all farewell, to meet in heaven.
                                                           [Dies]
   OXFORD. Away, away, to meet the Queen's great power!
                                   [Here they bear away his body]
 
 
 
 
 SCENE III.
 Another part of the field
 
 Flourish. Enter KING in triumph; with GLOUCESTER, CLARENCE, and the rest
 
   KING EDWARD. Thus far our fortune keeps an upward course,
     And we are grac'd with wreaths of victory.
     But in the midst of this bright-shining day
     I spy a black, suspicious, threat'ning cloud
     That will encounter with our glorious sun
     Ere he attain his easeful western bed-
     I mean, my lords, those powers that the Queen
     Hath rais'd in Gallia have arriv'd our coast
     And, as we hear, march on to fight with us.
   CLARENCE. A little gale will soon disperse that cloud
     And blow it to the source from whence it came;
     Thy very beams will dry those vapours up,
     For every cloud engenders not a storm.
   GLOUCESTER. The Queen is valued thirty thousand strong,
     And Somerset, with Oxford, fled to her.
     If she have time to breathe, be well assur'd
     Her faction will be full as strong as ours.
   KING EDWARD. are advertis'd by our loving friends
     That they do hold their course toward Tewksbury;
     We, having now the best at Barnet field,
     Will thither straight, for willingness rids way;
     And as we march our strength will be augmented
     In every county as we go along.
     Strike up the drum; cry 'Courage!' and away.          Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.
 Plains wear Tewksbury
 
 Flourish. March. Enter QUEEN MARGARET, PRINCE EDWARD, SOMERSET, OXFORD,
 and SOLDIERS
 
   QUEEN MARGARET. Great lords, wise men ne'er sit and wail their
       loss,
     But cheerly seek how to redress their harms.
     What though the mast be now blown overboard,
--**--**--
 
   KING EDWARD. Once more we sit in England's royal throne,
     Repurchas'd with the blood of enemies.
     What valiant foemen, like to autumn's corn,
     Have we mow'd down in tops of all their pride!
     Three Dukes of Somerset, threefold renown'd
     For hardy and undoubted champions;
     Two Cliffords, as the father and the son;
     And two Northumberlands- two braver men
     Ne'er spurr'd their coursers at the trumpet's sound;
     With them the two brave bears, Warwick and Montague,
     That in their chains fetter'd the kingly lion
     And made the forest tremble when they roar'd.
     Thus have we swept suspicion from our seat
     And made our footstool of security.
     Come hither, Bess, and let me kiss my boy.
     Young Ned, for thee thine uncles and myself
     Have in our armours watch'd the winter's night,
     Went all afoot in summer's scalding heat,
     That thou might'st repossess the crown in peace;
     And of our labours thou shalt reap the gain.
   GLOUCESTER. [Aside] I'll blast his harvest if your head were laid;
     For yet I am not look'd on in the world.
     This shoulder was ordain'd so thick to heave;
     And heave it shall some weight or break my back.
     Work thou the way- and that shall execute.
   KING EDWARD. Clarence and Gloucester, love my lovely queen;
     And kiss your princely nephew, brothers both.
   CLARENCE. The duty that I owe unto your Majesty
     I seal upon the lips of this sweet babe.
   KING EDWARD. Thanks, noble Clarence; worthy brother, thanks.
   GLOUCESTER. And that I love the tree from whence thou sprang'st,
     Witness the loving kiss I give the fruit.
     [Aside] To say the truth, so Judas kiss'd his master
     And cried 'All hail!' when as he meant all harm.
   KING EDWARD. Now am I seated as my soul delights,
     Having my country's peace and brothers' loves.
--**--**--
 London. The palace
 
 Enter the DUKE OF NORFOLK at one door; at the other,
 the DUKE OF BUCKINGHAM and the LORD ABERGAVENNY
 
   BUCKINGHAM. Good morrow, and well met. How have ye done
     Since last we saw in France?
   NORFOLK. I thank your Grace,
     Healthful; and ever since a fresh admirer
     Of what I saw there.
   BUCKINGHAM. An untimely ague
     Stay'd me a prisoner in my chamber when
     Those suns of glory, those two lights of men,
     Met in the vale of Andren.
   NORFOLK. 'Twixt Guynes and Arde-
     I was then present, saw them salute on horseback;
     Beheld them, when they lighted, how they clung
     In their embracement, as they grew together;
     Which had they, what four thron'd ones could have weigh'd
     Such a compounded one?
   BUCKINGHAM. All the whole time
     I was my chamber's prisoner.
   NORFOLK. Then you lost
     The view of earthly glory; men might say,
     Till this time pomp was single, but now married
     To one above itself. Each following day
     Became the next day's master, till the last
     Made former wonders its. To-day the French,
     All clinquant, all in gold, like heathen gods,
     Shone down the English; and to-morrow they
     Made Britain India: every man that stood
     Show'd like a mine. Their dwarfish pages were
     As cherubins, an gilt; the madams too,
     Not us'd to toil, did almost sweat to bear
     The pride upon them, that their very labour
     Was to them as a painting. Now this masque
     Was cried incomparable; and th' ensuing night
     Made it a fool and beggar. The two kings,
     Equal in lustre, were now best, now worst,
     As presence did present them: him in eye
     still him in praise; and being present both,
     'Twas said they saw but one, and no discerner
     Durst wag his tongue in censure. When these suns-
--**--**--
     The sudden breach on't.
   NORFOLK. Which is budded out;
     For France hath flaw'd the league, and hath attach'd
     Our merchants' goods at Bordeaux.
   ABERGAVENNY. Is it therefore
     Th' ambassador is silenc'd?
   NORFOLK. Marry, is't.
   ABERGAVENNY. A proper tide of a peace, and purchas'd
     At a superfluous rate!
   BUCKINGHAM. Why, all this business
     Our reverend Cardinal carried.
   NORFOLK. Like it your Grace,
     The state takes notice of the private difference
     Betwixt you and the Cardinal. I advise you-
     And take it from a heart that wishes towards you
     Honour and plenteous safety-that you read
     The Cardinal's malice and his potency
     Together; to consider further, that
     What his high hatred would effect wants not
     A minister in his power. You know his nature,
     That he's revengeful; and I know his sword
     Hath a sharp edge-it's long and't may be said
     It reaches far, and where 'twill not extend,
     Thither he darts it. Bosom up my counsel
     You'll find it wholesome. Lo, where comes that rock
     That I advise your shunning.
 
       Enter CARDINAL WOLSEY, the purse borne before
       him, certain of the guard, and two SECRETARIES
       with papers. The CARDINAL in his passage fixeth his
       eye on BUCKINGHAM, and BUCKINGHAM on him,
       both full of disdain
 
   WOLSEY. The Duke of Buckingham's surveyor? Ha!
     Where's his examination?
   SECRETARY. Here, so please you.
   WOLSEY. Is he in person ready?
   SECRETARY. Ay, please your Grace.
   WOLSEY. Well, we shall then know more, and Buckingham
     shall lessen this big look.
                                           Exeunt WOLSEY and his train
   BUCKINGHAM. This butcher's cur is venom-mouth'd, and I
     Have not the power to muzzle him; therefore best
     Not wake him in his slumber. A beggar's book
     Outworths a noble's blood.
   NORFOLK. What, are you chaf'd?
     Ask God for temp'rance; that's th' appliance only
     Which your disease requires.
   BUCKINGHAM. I read in's looks
--**--**--
     This was his gentleman in trust-of him
     Things to strike honour sad. Bid him recount
     The fore-recited practices, whereof
     We cannot feel too little, hear too much.
   WOLSEY. Stand forth, and with bold spirit relate what you,
     Most like a careful subject, have collected
     Out of the Duke of Buckingham.
   KING. Speak freely.
   SURVEYOR. First, it was usual with him-every day
     It would infect his speech-that if the King
     Should without issue die, he'll carry it so
     To make the sceptre his. These very words
     I've heard him utter to his son-in-law,
     Lord Aberga'ny, to whom by oath he menac'd
     Revenge upon the Cardinal.
   WOLSEY. Please your Highness, note
     This dangerous conception in this point:
     Not friended by his wish, to your high person
     His will is most malignant, and it stretches
     Beyond you to your friends.
   QUEEN KATHARINE. My learn'd Lord Cardinal,
     Deliver all with charity.
   KING. Speak on.
     How grounded he his title to the crown
     Upon our fail? To this point hast thou heard him
     At any time speak aught?
   SURVEYOR. He was brought to this
     By a vain prophecy of Nicholas Henton.
   KING. What was that Henton?
   SURVEYOR. Sir, a Chartreux friar,
     His confessor, who fed him every minute
     With words of sovereignty.
   KING. How know'st thou this?
   SURVEYOR. Not long before your Highness sped to France,
     The Duke being at the Rose, within the parish
     Saint Lawrence Poultney, did of me demand
     What was the speech among the Londoners
     Concerning the French journey. I replied
     Men fear'd the French would prove perfidious,
     To the King's danger. Presently the Duke
     Said 'twas the fear indeed and that he doubted
     'Twould prove the verity of certain words
     Spoke by a holy monk 'that oft' says he
     'Hath sent to me, wishing me to permit
     John de la Car, my chaplain, a choice hour
--**--**--
                              [Drum and trumpet. Chambers discharg'd]
   WOLSEY. What's that?
   CHAMBERLAIN. Look out there, some of ye.             Exit a SERVANT
   WOLSEY. What warlike voice,
     And to what end, is this? Nay, ladies, fear not:
     By all the laws of war y'are privileg'd.
 
             Re-enter SERVANT
 
   CHAMBERLAIN. How now! what is't?
   SERVANT. A noble troop of strangers-
     For so they seem. Th' have left their barge and landed,
     And hither make, as great ambassadors
     From foreign princes.
   WOLSEY. Good Lord Chamberlain,
     Go, give 'em welcome; you can speak the French tongue;
     And pray receive 'em nobly and conduct 'em
     Into our presence, where this heaven of beauty
     Shall shine at full upon them. Some attend him.
               Exit CHAMBERLAIN attended. All rise, and tables remov'd
     You have now a broken banquet, but we'll mend it.
     A good digestion to you all; and once more
     I show'r a welcome on ye; welcome all.
 
       Hautboys. Enter the KING, and others, as maskers,
       habited like shepherds, usher'd by the LORD CHAMBERLAIN.
       They pass directly before the CARDINAL,
       and gracefully salute him
 
     A noble company! What are their pleasures?
   CHAMBERLAIN. Because they speak no English, thus they pray'd
     To tell your Grace, that, having heard by fame
     Of this so noble and so fair assembly
     This night to meet here, they could do no less,
     Out of the great respect they bear to beauty,
     But leave their flocks and, under your fair conduct,
     Crave leave to view these ladies and entreat
     An hour of revels with 'em.
   WOLSEY. Say, Lord Chamberlain,
     They have done my poor house grace; for which I pay 'em
     A thousand thanks, and pray 'em take their pleasures.
                    [They choose ladies. The KING chooses ANNE BULLEN]
   KING. The fairest hand I ever touch'd! O beauty,
     Till now I never knew thee!                        [Music. Dance]
   WOLSEY. My lord!
--**--**--
     Cardinal Campeius is arriv'd and lately;
     As all think, for this business.
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. 'Tis the Cardinal;
     And merely to revenge him on the Emperor
     For not bestowing on him at his asking
     The archbishopric of Toledo, this is purpos'd.
   SECOND GENTLEMAN. I think you have hit the mark; but is't
         not cruel
     That she should feel the smart of this? The Cardinal
     Will have his will, and she must fall.
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. 'Tis woeful.
     We are too open here to argue this;
     Let's think in private more.                               Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 ACT II. SCENE 2.
 
 London. The palace
 
 Enter the LORD CHAMBERLAIN reading this letter
 
   CHAMBERLAIN. 'My lord,
     'The horses your lordship sent for, with all the care
     had, I saw well chosen, ridden, and furnish'd. They were
     young and handsome, and of the best breed in the north.
     When they were ready to set out for London, a man of
     my Lord Cardinal's, by commission, and main power, took
     'em from me, with this reason: his master would be serv'd
     before a subject, if not before the King; which stopp'd
     our mouths, sir.'
 
     I fear he will indeed. Well, let him have them.
     He will have all, I think.
 
     Enter to the LORD CHAMBERLAIN the DUKES OF NORFOLK and SUFFOLK
 
   NORFOLK. Well met, my Lord Chamberlain.
   CHAMBERLAIN. Good day to both your Graces.
   SUFFOLK. How is the King employ'd?
   CHAMBERLAIN. I left him private,
     Full of sad thoughts and troubles.
   NORFOLK. What's the cause?
   CHAMBERLAIN. It seems the marriage with his brother's wife
     Has crept too near his conscience.
   SUFFOLK. No, his conscience
     Has crept too near another lady.
   NORFOLK. 'Tis so;
     This is the Cardinal's doing; the King-Cardinal,
     That blind priest, like the eldest son of fortune,
     Turns what he list. The King will know him one day.
   SUFFOLK. Pray God he do! He'll never know himself else.
--**--**--
     From these sad thoughts that work too much upon him.
     My lord, you'll bear us company?
   CHAMBERLAIN. Excuse me,
     The King has sent me otherwhere; besides,
     You'll find a most unfit time to disturb him.
     Health to your lordships!
   NORFOLK. Thanks, my good Lord Chamberlain.
                             Exit LORD CHAMBERLAIN; and the KING draws
                                the curtain and sits reading pensively
   SUFFOLK. How sad he looks; sure, he is much afflicted.
   KING. Who's there, ha?
   NORFOLK. Pray God he be not angry.
   KING HENRY. Who's there, I say? How dare you thrust yourselves
     Into my private meditations?
     Who am I, ha?
   NORFOLK. A gracious king that pardons all offences
     Malice ne'er meant. Our breach of duty this way
     Is business of estate, in which we come
     To know your royal pleasure.
   KING. Ye are too bold.
     Go to; I'll make ye know your times of business.
     Is this an hour for temporal affairs, ha?
 
       Enter WOLSEY and CAMPEIUS with a commission
 
     Who's there? My good Lord Cardinal? O my Wolsey,
     The quiet of my wounded conscience,
     Thou art a cure fit for a King.  [To CAMPEIUS]  You're
       welcome,
     Most learned reverend sir, into our kingdom.
     Use us and it.  [To WOLSEY]  My good lord, have great care
     I be not found a talker.
   WOLSEY. Sir, you cannot.
     I would your Grace would give us but an hour
     Of private conference.
   KING.  [To NORFOLK and SUFFOLK]  We are busy; go.
   NORFOLK.  [Aside to SUFFOLK]  This priest has no pride in him!
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside to NORFOLK]  Not to speak of!
     I would not be so sick though for his place.
     But this cannot continue.
   NORFOLK.  [Aside to SUFFOLK]  If it do,
     I'll venture one have-at-him.
   SUFFOLK.  [Aside to NORFOLK]  I another.
                                            Exeunt NORFOLK and SUFFOLK
   WOLSEY. Your Grace has given a precedent of wisdom
--**--**--
     So many courses of the sun enthroned,
     Still growing in a majesty and pomp, the which
     To leave a thousand-fold more bitter than
     'Tis sweet at first t' acquire-after this process,
     To give her the avaunt, it is a pity
     Would move a monster.
   OLD LADY. Hearts of most hard temper
     Melt and lament for her.
   ANNE. O, God's will! much better
     She ne'er had known pomp; though't be temporal,
     Yet, if that quarrel, fortune, do divorce
     It from the bearer, 'tis a sufferance panging
     As soul and body's severing.
   OLD LADY. Alas, poor lady!
     She's a stranger now again.
   ANNE. So much the more
     Must pity drop upon her. Verily,
     I swear 'tis better to be lowly born
     And range with humble livers in content
     Than to be perk'd up in a glist'ring grief
     And wear a golden sorrow.
   OLD LADY. Our content
     Is our best having.
   ANNE. By my troth and maidenhead,
     I would not be a queen.
   OLD LADY. Beshrew me, I would,
     And venture maidenhead for 't; and so would you,
     For all this spice of your hypocrisy.
     You that have so fair parts of woman on you
     Have too a woman's heart, which ever yet
     Affected eminence, wealth, sovereignty;
     Which, to say sooth, are blessings; and which gifts,
     Saving your mincing, the capacity
     Of your soft cheveril conscience would receive
     If you might please to stretch it.
   ANNE. Nay, good troth.
   OLD LADY. Yes, troth and troth. You would not be a queen!
   ANNE. No, not for all the riches under heaven.
   OLD LADY. 'Tis strange: a threepence bow'd would hire me,
     Old as I am, to queen it. But, I pray you,
     What think you of a duchess? Have you limbs
     To bear that load of title?
   ANNE. No, in truth.
   OLD LADY. Then you are weakly made. Pluck off a little;
--**--**--
     Let silence be commanded.
   KING. What's the need?
     It hath already publicly been read,
     And on all sides th' authority allow'd;
     You may then spare that time.
   WOLSEY. Be't so; proceed.
   SCRIBE. Say 'Henry King of England, come into the court.'
   CRIER. Henry King of England, &c.
   KING. Here.
   SCRIBE. Say 'Katharine Queen of England, come into the court.'
   CRIER. Katharine Queen of England, &c.
 
      The QUEEN makes no answer, rises out of her chair,
      goes about the court, comes to the KING, and kneels
      at his feet; then speaks
 
   QUEEN KATHARINE. Sir, I desire you do me right and justice,
     And to bestow your pity on me; for
     I am a most poor woman and a stranger,
     Born out of your dominions, having here
     No judge indifferent, nor no more assurance
     Of equal friendship and proceeding. Alas, sir,
     In what have I offended you? What cause
     Hath my behaviour given to your displeasure
     That thus you should proceed to put me of
     And take your good grace from me? Heaven witness,
     I have been to you a true and humble wife,
     At all times to your will conformable,
     Ever in fear to kindle your dislike,
     Yea, subject to your countenance-glad or sorry
     As I saw it inclin'd. When was the hour
     I ever contradicted your desire
     Or made it not mine too? Or which of your friends
     Have I not strove to love, although I knew
     He were mine enemy? What friend of mine
     That had to him deriv'd your anger did
     Continue in my liking? Nay, gave notice
     He was from thence discharg'd? Sir, call to mind
     That I have been your wife in this obedience
     Upward of twenty years, and have been blest
     With many children by you. If, in the course
     And process of this time, you can report,
--**--**--
     Your high profession spiritual; that again
     I do refuse you for my judge and here,
     Before you all, appeal unto the Pope,
     To bring my whole cause 'fore his Holiness
     And to be judg'd by him.
                      [She curtsies to the KING, and offers to depart]
   CAMPEIUS. The Queen is obstinate,
     Stubborn to justice, apt to accuse it, and
     Disdainful to be tried by't; 'tis not well.
     She's going away.
   KING. Call her again.
   CRIER. Katharine Queen of England, come into the court.
   GENTLEMAN USHER. Madam, you are call'd back.
   QUEEN KATHARINE. What need you note it? Pray you keep your way;
     When you are call'd, return. Now the Lord help!
     They vex me past my patience. Pray you pass on.
     I will not tarry; no, nor ever more
     Upon this business my appearance make
     In any of their courts.           Exeunt QUEEN and her attendants
   KING. Go thy ways, Kate.
     That man i' th' world who shall report he has
     A better wife, let him in nought be trusted
     For speaking false in that. Thou art, alone-
     If thy rare qualities, sweet gentleness,
     Thy meekness saint-like, wife-like government,
     Obeying in commanding, and thy parts
     Sovereign and pious else, could speak thee out-
     The queen of earthly queens. She's noble born;
     And like her true nobility she has
     Carried herself towards me.
   WOLSEY. Most gracious sir,
     In humblest manner I require your Highness
     That it shall please you to declare in hearing
     Of all these ears-for where I am robb'd and bound,
     There must I be unloos'd, although not there
     At once and fully satisfied-whether ever I
     Did broach this business to your Highness, or
     Laid any scruple in your way which might
     Induce you to the question on't, or ever
     Have to you, but with thanks to God for such
--**--**--
   LINCOLN. Very well, my liege.
   KING. I have spoke long; be pleas'd yourself to say
     How far you satisfied me.
   LINCOLN. So please your Highness,
     The question did at first so stagger me-
     Bearing a state of mighty moment in't
     And consequence of dread-that I committed
     The daring'st counsel which I had to doubt,
     And did entreat your Highness to this course
     Which you are running here.
   KING. I then mov'd you,
     My Lord of Canterbury, and got your leave
     To make this present summons. Unsolicited
     I left no reverend person in this court,
     But by particular consent proceeded
     Under your hands and seals; therefore, go on,
     For no dislike i' th' world against the person
     Of the good Queen, but the sharp thorny points
     Of my alleged reasons, drives this forward.
     Prove but our marriage lawful, by my life
     And kingly dignity, we are contented
     To wear our moral state to come with her,
     Katharine our queen, before the primest creature
     That's paragon'd o' th' world.
   CAMPEIUS. So please your Highness,
     The Queen being absent, 'tis a needful fitness
     That we adjourn this court till further day;
     Meanwhile must be an earnest motion
     Made to the Queen to call back her appeal
     She intends unto his Holiness.
   KING.  [Aside]  I may perceive
     These cardinals trifle with me. I abhor
     This dilatory sloth and tricks of Rome.
     My learn'd and well-beloved servant, Cranmer,
     Prithee return. With thy approach I know
     My comfort comes along. -Break up the court;
     I say, set on.                   Exuent in manner as they entered
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT III. SCENE 1.
 
 London. The QUEEN'S apartments
 
 Enter the QUEEN and her women, as at work
 
   QUEEN KATHARINE. Take thy lute, wench. My soul grows
       sad with troubles;
     Sing and disperse 'em, if thou canst. Leave working.
 
                     SONG
 
         Orpheus with his lute made trees,
--**--**--
   SURREY. How came
     His practices to light?
   SUFFOLK. Most Strangely.
   SURREY. O, how, how?
   SUFFOLK. The Cardinal's letters to the Pope miscarried,
     And came to th' eye o' th' King; wherein was read
     How that the Cardinal did entreat his Holiness
     To stay the judgment o' th' divorce; for if
     It did take place, 'I do' quoth he 'perceive
     My king is tangled in affection to
     A creature of the Queen's, Lady Anne Bullen.'
   SURREY. Has the King this?
   SUFFOLK. Believe it.
   SURREY. Will this work?
   CHAMBERLAIN. The King in this perceives him how he coasts
     And hedges his own way. But in this point
     All his tricks founder, and he brings his physic
     After his patient's death: the King already
     Hath married the fair lady.
   SURREY. Would he had!
   SUFFOLK. May you be happy in your wish, my lord!
     For, I profess, you have it.
   SURREY. Now, all my joy
     Trace the conjunction!
   SUFFOLK. My amen to't!
   NORFOLK. An men's!
   SUFFOLK. There's order given for her coronation;
     Marry, this is yet but young, and may be left
     To some ears unrecounted. But, my lords,
     She is a gallant creature, and complete
     In mind and feature. I persuade me from her
     Will fall some blessing to this land, which shall
     In it be memoriz'd.
   SURREY. But will the King
     Digest this letter of the Cardinal's?
     The Lord forbid!
   NORFOLK. Marry, amen!
   SUFFOLK. No, no;
     There be moe wasps that buzz about his nose
     Will make this sting the sooner. Cardinal Campeius
     Is stol'n away to Rome; hath ta'en no leave;
     Has left the cause o' th' King unhandled, and
     Is posted, as the agent of our Cardinal,
     To second all his plot. I do assure you
     The King cried 'Ha!' at this.
   CHAMBERLAIN. Now, God incense him,
     And let him cry 'Ha!' louder!
--**--**--
     Have ever come too short of my desires,
     Yet fil'd with my abilities; mine own ends
     Have been mine so that evermore they pointed
     To th' good of your most sacred person and
     The profit of the state. For your great graces
     Heap'd upon me, poor undeserver, I
     Can nothing render but allegiant thanks;
     My pray'rs to heaven for you; my loyalty,
     Which ever has and ever shall be growing,
     Till death, that winter, kill it.
   KING. Fairly answer'd!
     A loyal and obedient subject is
     Therein illustrated; the honour of it
     Does pay the act of it, as, i' th' contrary,
     The foulness is the punishment. I presume
     That, as my hand has open'd bounty to you,
     My heart dropp'd love, my pow'r rain'd honour, more
     On you than any, so your hand and heart,
     Your brain, and every function of your power,
     Should, notwithstanding that your bond of duty,
     As 'twere in love's particular, be more
     To me, your friend, than any.
   WOLSEY. I do profess
     That for your Highness' good I ever labour'd
     More than mine own; that am, have, and will be-
     Though all the world should crack their duty to you,
     And throw it from their soul; though perils did
     Abound as thick as thought could make 'em, and
     Appear in forms more horrid-yet my duty,
     As doth a rock against the chiding flood,
     Should the approach of this wild river break,
     And stand unshaken yours.
   KING. 'Tis nobly spoken.
     Take notice, lords, he has a loyal breast,
     For you have seen him open 't. Read o'er this;
                                                   [Giving him papers]
     And after, this; and then to breakfast with
     What appetite you have.
                 Exit the KING, frowning upon the CARDINAL; the NOBLES
                              throng after him, smiling and whispering
   WOLSEY. What should this mean?
     What sudden anger's this? How have I reap'd it?
--**--**--
     From any private malice in his end,
     His noble jury and foul cause can witness.
     If I lov'd many words, lord, I should tell you
     You have as little honesty as honour,
     That in the way of loyalty and truth
     Toward the King, my ever royal master,
     Dare mate a sounder man than Surrey can be
     And an that love his follies.
   SURREY. By my soul,
     Your long coat, priest, protects you; thou shouldst feel
     My sword i' the life-blood of thee else. My lords
     Can ye endure to hear this arrogance?
     And from this fellow? If we live thus tamely,
     To be thus jaded by a piece of scarlet,
     Farewell nobility! Let his Grace go forward
     And dare us with his cap like larks.
   WOLSEY. All goodness
     Is poison to thy stomach.
   SURREY. Yes, that goodness
     Of gleaning all the land's wealth into one,
     Into your own hands, Cardinal, by extortion;
     The goodness of your intercepted packets
     You writ to th' Pope against the King; your goodness,
     Since you provoke me, shall be most notorious.
     My Lord of Norfolk, as you are truly noble,
     As you respect the common good, the state
     Of our despis'd nobility, our issues,
     Whom, if he live, will scarce be gentlemen-
     Produce the grand sum of his sins, the articles
     Collected from his life. I'll startle you
     Worse than the sacring bell, when the brown wench
     Lay kissing in your arms, Lord Cardinal.
   WOLSEY. How much, methinks, I could despise this man,
     But that I am bound in charity against it!
   NORFOLK. Those articles, my lord, are in the King's hand;
     But, thus much, they are foul ones.
   WOLSEY. So much fairer
     And spotless shall mine innocence arise,
     When the King knows my truth.
   SURREY. This cannot save you.
     I thank my memory I yet remember
--**--**--
     Love thyself last; cherish those hearts that hate thee;
     Corruption wins not more than honesty.
     Still in thy right hand carry gentle peace
     To silence envious tongues. Be just, and fear not;
     Let all the ends thou aim'st at be thy country's,
     Thy God's, and truth's; then, if thou fall'st, O Cromwell,
     Thou fall'st a blessed martyr!
     Serve the King, and-prithee lead me in.
     There take an inventory of all I have
     To the last penny; 'tis the King's. My robe,
     And my integrity to heaven, is all
     I dare now call mine own. O Cromwell, Cromwell!
     Had I but serv'd my God with half the zeal
     I serv'd my King, he would not in mine age
     Have left me naked to mine enemies.
   CROMWELL. Good sir, have patience.
   WOLSEY. So I have. Farewell
     The hopes of court! My hopes in heaven do dwell.           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV. SCENE 1.
 
 A street in Westminster
 
 Enter two GENTLEMEN, meeting one another
 
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. Y'are well met once again.
   SECOND GENTLEMAN. So are you.
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. You come to take your stand here, and
       behold
     The Lady Anne pass from her coronation?
   SECOND GENTLEMAN. 'Tis all my business. At our last encounter
     The Duke of Buckingham came from his trial.
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. 'Tis very true. But that time offer'd
       sorrow;
     This, general joy.
   SECOND GENTLEMAN. 'Tis well. The citizens,
     I am sure, have shown at full their royal minds-
     As, let 'em have their rights, they are ever forward-
     In celebration of this day with shows,
     Pageants, and sights of honour.
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. Never greater,
     Nor, I'll assure you, better taken, sir.
   SECOND GENTLEMAN. May I be bold to ask what that contains,
     That paper in your hand?
   FIRST GENTLEMAN. Yes; 'tis the list
     Of those that claim their offices this day,
--**--**--
     They promis'd me eternal happiness,
     And brought me garlands, Griffith, which I feel
     I am not worthy yet to wear. I shall, assuredly.
   GRIFFITH. I am most joyful, madam, such good dreams
     Possess your fancy.
   KATHARINE. Bid the music leave,
     They are harsh and heavy to me.                    [Music ceases]
   PATIENCE. Do you note
     How much her Grace is alter'd on the sudden?
     How long her face is drawn! How pale she looks,
     And of an earthly cold! Mark her eyes.
   GRIFFITH. She is going, wench. Pray, pray.
   PATIENCE. Heaven comfort her!
 
              Enter a MESSENGER
 
   MESSENGER. An't like your Grace-
   KATHARINE. You are a saucy fellow.
     Deserve we no more reverence?
   GRIFFITH. You are to blame,
     Knowing she will not lose her wonted greatness,
     To use so rude behaviour. Go to, kneel.
   MESSENGER. I humbly do entreat your Highness' pardon;
     My haste made me unmannerly. There is staying
     A gentleman, sent from the King, to see you.
   KATHARINE. Admit him entrance, Griffith; but this fellow
     Let me ne'er see again.                            Exit MESSENGER
 
               Enter LORD CAPUCIUS
 
     If my sight fail not,
     You should be Lord Ambassador from the Emperor,
     My royal nephew, and your name Capucius.
   CAPUCIUS. Madam, the same-your servant.
   KATHARINE. O, my Lord,
     The times and titles now are alter'd strangely
     With me since first you knew me. But, I pray you,
     What is your pleasure with me?
   CAPUCIUS. Noble lady,
     First, mine own service to your Grace; the next,
     The King's request that I would visit you,
     Who grieves much for your weakness, and by me
     Sends you his princely commendations
     And heartily entreats you take good comfort.
   KATHARINE. O my good lord, that comfort comes too late,
     'Tis like a pardon after execution:
     That gentle physic, given in time, had cur'd me;
     But now I am past all comforts here, but prayers.
--**--**--
     Out of this world. Tell him in death I bless'd him,
     For so I will. Mine eyes grow dim. Farewell,
     My lord. Griffith, farewell. Nay, Patience,
     You must not leave me yet. I must to bed;
     Call in more women. When I am dead, good wench,
     Let me be us'd with honour; strew me over
     With maiden flowers, that all the world may know
     I was a chaste wife to my grave. Embalm me,
     Then lay me forth; although unqueen'd, yet like
     A queen, and daughter to a king, inter me.
     I can no more.                          Exeunt, leading KATHARINE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE 1.
 
 London. A gallery in the palace
 
 Enter GARDINER, BISHOP OF WINCHESTER, a PAGE with a torch before him,
 met by SIR THOMAS LOVELL
 
   GARDINER. It's one o'clock, boy, is't not?
   BOY. It hath struck.
   GARDINER. These should be hours for necessities,
     Not for delights; times to repair our nature
     With comforting repose, and not for us
     To waste these times. Good hour of night, Sir Thomas!
     Whither so late?
   LOVELL. Came you from the King, my lord?
   GARDINER. I did, Sir Thomas, and left him at primero
     With the Duke of Suffolk.
   LOVELL. I must to him too,
     Before he go to bed. I'll take my leave.
   GARDINER. Not yet, Sir Thomas Lovell. What's the matter?
     It seems you are in haste. An if there be
     No great offence belongs to't, give your friend
     Some touch of your late business. Affairs that walk-
     As they say spirits do-at midnight, have
     In them a wilder nature than the business
     That seeks despatch by day.
   LOVELL. My lord, I love you;
     And durst commend a secret to your ear
     Much weightier than this work. The Queen's in labour,
     They say in great extremity, and fear'd
     She'll with the labour end.
--**--**--
   KING. Ha, 'tis he indeed.
     Is this the honour they do one another?
     'Tis well there's one above 'em yet. I had thought
     They had parted so much honesty among 'em-
     At least good manners-as not thus to suffer
     A man of his place, and so near our favour,
     To dance attendance on their lordships' pleasures,
     And at the door too, like a post with packets.
     By holy Mary, Butts, there's knavery!
     Let 'em alone, and draw the curtain close;
     We shall hear more anon.                                   Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE 3.
 
 The Council Chamber
 
 A Council table brought in, with chairs and stools, and placed
 under the state. Enter LORD CHANCELLOR, places himself at the upper end
 of the table on the left band, a seat being left void above him,
 as for Canterbury's seat. DUKE OF SUFFOLK, DUKE OF NORFOLK, SURREY,
 LORD CHAMBERLAIN, GARDINER, seat themselves in order on each side;
 CROMWELL at lower end, as secretary. KEEPER at the door
 
   CHANCELLOR. Speak to the business, master secretary;
     Why are we met in council?
   CROMWELL. Please your honours,
     The chief cause concerns his Grace of Canterbury.
   GARDINER. Has he had knowledge of it?
   CROMWELL. Yes.
   NORFOLK. Who waits there?
   KEEPER. Without, my noble lords?
   GARDINER. Yes.
   KEEPER. My Lord Archbishop;
     And has done half an hour, to know your pleasures.
   CHANCELLOR. Let him come in.
   KEEPER. Your Grace may enter now.
 
       CRANMER approaches the Council table
 
   CHANCELLOR. My good Lord Archbishop, I am very sorry
     To sit here at this present, and behold
     That chair stand empty; but we all are men,
     In our own natures frail and capable
     Of our flesh; few are angels; out of which frailty
     And want of wisdom, you, that best should teach us,
     Have misdemean'd yourself, and not a little,
     Toward the King first, then his laws, in filling
--**--**--
     Remember your bold life too.
   CHANCELLOR. This is too much;
     Forbear, for shame, my lords.
   GARDINER. I have done.
   CROMWELL. And I.
   CHANCELLOR. Then thus for you, my lord: it stands agreed,
     I take it, by all voices, that forthwith
     You be convey'd to th' Tower a prisoner;
     There to remain till the King's further pleasure
     Be known unto us. Are you all agreed, lords?
   ALL. We are.
   CRANMER. Is there no other way of mercy,
     But I must needs to th' Tower, my lords?
   GARDINER. What other
     Would you expect? You are strangely troublesome.
     Let some o' th' guard be ready there.
 
            Enter the guard
 
   CRANMER. For me?
     Must I go like a traitor thither?
   GARDINER. Receive him,
     And see him safe i' th' Tower.
   CRANMER. Stay, good my lords,
     I have a little yet to say. Look there, my lords;
     By virtue of that ring I take my cause
     Out of the gripes of cruel men and give it
     To a most noble judge, the King my master.
   CHAMBERLAIN. This is the King's ring.
   SURREY. 'Tis no counterfeit.
   SUFFOLK. 'Tis the right ring, by heav'n. I told ye all,
     When we first put this dangerous stone a-rolling,
     'Twould fall upon ourselves.
   NORFOLK. Do you think, my lords,
     The King will suffer but the little finger
     Of this man to be vex'd?
   CHAMBERLAIN. 'Tis now too certain;
     How much more is his life in value with him!
     Would I were fairly out on't!
   CROMWELL. My mind gave me,
     In seeking tales and informations
     Against this man-whose honesty the devil
     And his disciples only envy at-
     Ye blew the fire that burns ye. Now have at ye!
 
       Enter the KING frowning on them; he takes his seat
 
   GARDINER. Dread sovereign, how much are we bound to heaven
     In daily thanks, that gave us such a prince;
--**--**--
     she was quartered. They fell on; I made good my place.
     At length they came to th' broomstaff to me; I defied 'em
     still; when suddenly a file of boys behind 'em, loose shot,
     deliver'd such a show'r of pebbles that I was fain to draw
     mine honour in and let 'em win the work: the devil was
     amongst 'em, I think surely.
   PORTER. These are the youths that thunder at a playhouse
     and fight for bitten apples; that no audience but the tribulation
     of Tower-hill or the limbs of Limehouse, their dear
     brothers, are able to endure. I have some of 'em in Limbo
     Patrum, and there they are like to dance these three days;
     besides the running banquet of two beadles that is to come.
 
           Enter the LORD CHAMBERLAIN
 
   CHAMBERLAIN. Mercy o' me, what a multitude are here!
     They grow still too; from all parts they are coming,
     As if we kept a fair here! Where are these porters,
     These lazy knaves? Y'have made a fine hand, fellows.
     There's a trim rabble let in: are all these
     Your faithful friends o' th' suburbs? We shall have
     Great store of room, no doubt, left for the ladies,
     When they pass back from the christening.
   PORTER. An't please your honour,
     We are but men; and what so many may do,
     Not being torn a pieces, we have done.
     An army cannot rule 'em.
   CHAMBERLAIN. As I live,
     If the King blame me for't, I'll lay ye an
     By th' heels, and suddenly; and on your heads
     Clap round fines for neglect. Y'are lazy knaves;
     And here ye lie baiting of bombards, when
     Ye should do service. Hark! the trumpets sound;
     Th' are come already from the christening.
     Go break among the press and find a way out
     To let the troops pass fairly, or I'll find
--**--**--
   KING JOHN. A good blunt fellow. Why, being younger born,
     Doth he lay claim to thine inheritance?
   BASTARD. I know not why, except to get the land.
     But once he slander'd me with bastardy;
     But whe'er I be as true begot or no,
     That still I lay upon my mother's head;
     But that I am as well begot, my liege-
     Fair fall the bones that took the pains for me!-
     Compare our faces and be judge yourself.
     If old Sir Robert did beget us both
     And were our father, and this son like him-
     O old Sir Robert, father, on my knee
     I give heaven thanks I was not like to thee!
   KING JOHN. Why, what a madcap hath heaven lent us here!
   ELINOR. He hath a trick of Coeur-de-lion's face;
     The accent of his tongue affecteth him.
     Do you not read some tokens of my son
     In the large composition of this man?
   KING JOHN. Mine eye hath well examined his parts
     And finds them perfect Richard. Sirrah, speak,
     What doth move you to claim your brother's land?
   BASTARD. Because he hath a half-face, like my father.
     With half that face would he have all my land:
     A half-fac'd groat five hundred pound a year!
   ROBERT. My gracious liege, when that my father liv'd,
     Your brother did employ my father much-
   BASTARD. Well, sir, by this you cannot get my land:
     Your tale must be how he employ'd my mother.
   ROBERT. And once dispatch'd him in an embassy
     To Germany, there with the Emperor
     To treat of high affairs touching that time.
     Th' advantage of his absence took the King,
     And in the meantime sojourn'd at my father's;
     Where how he did prevail I shame to speak-
     But truth is truth: large lengths of seas and shores
     Between my father and my mother lay,
--**--**--
     'Tis too respective and too sociable
     For your conversion. Now your traveller,
     He and his toothpick at my worship's mess-
     And when my knightly stomach is suffic'd,
     Why then I suck my teeth and catechize
     My picked man of countries: 'My dear sir,'
     Thus leaning on mine elbow I begin
     'I shall beseech you'-That is question now;
     And then comes answer like an Absey book:
     'O sir,' says answer 'at your best command,
     At your employment, at your service, sir!'
     'No, sir,' says question 'I, sweet sir, at yours.'
     And so, ere answer knows what question would,
     Saving in dialogue of compliment,
     And talking of the Alps and Apennines,
     The Pyrenean and the river Po-
     It draws toward supper in conclusion so.
     But this is worshipful society,
     And fits the mounting spirit like myself;
     For he is but a bastard to the time
     That doth not smack of observation-
     And so am I, whether I smack or no;
     And not alone in habit and device,
     Exterior form, outward accoutrement,
     But from the inward motion to deliver
     Sweet, sweet, sweet poison for the age's tooth;
     Which, though I will not practise to deceive,
     Yet, to avoid deceit, I mean to learn;
     For it shall strew the footsteps of my rising.
     But who comes in such haste in riding-robes?
     What woman-post is this? Hath she no husband
     That will take pains to blow a horn before her?
 
       Enter LADY FAULCONBRIDGE, and JAMES GURNEY
 
     O me, 'tis my mother! How now, good lady!
     What brings you here to court so hastily?
   LADY FAULCONBRIDGE. Where is that slave, thy brother?
       Where is he
     That holds in chase mine honour up and down?
   BASTARD. My brother Robert, old Sir Robert's son?
     Colbrand the giant, that same mighty man?
     Is it Sir Robert's son that you seek so?
--**--**--
     It cannot be, an if thou wert his mother.
   ELINOR. There's a good mother, boy, that blots thy father.
   CONSTANCE. There's a good grandam, boy, that would blot thee.
   AUSTRIA. Peace!
   BASTARD. Hear the crier.
   AUSTRIA. What the devil art thou?
   BASTARD. One that will play the devil, sir, with you,
     An 'a may catch your hide and you alone.
     You are the hare of whom the proverb goes,
     Whose valour plucks dead lions by the beard;
     I'll smoke your skin-coat an I catch you right;
     Sirrah, look to 't; i' faith I will, i' faith.
   BLANCH. O, well did he become that lion's robe
     That did disrobe the lion of that robe!
   BASTARD. It lies as sightly on the back of him
     As great Alcides' shows upon an ass;
     But, ass, I'll take that burden from your back,
     Or lay on that shall make your shoulders crack.
   AUSTRIA. What cracker is this same that deafs our ears
     With this abundance of superfluous breath?
     King Philip, determine what we shall do straight.
   KING PHILIP. Women and fools, break off your conference.
     King John, this is the very sum of all:
     England and Ireland, Anjou, Touraine, Maine,
     In right of Arthur, do I claim of thee;
     Wilt thou resign them and lay down thy arms?
   KING JOHN. My life as soon. I do defy thee, France.
     Arthur of Britaine, yield thee to my hand,
     And out of my dear love I'll give thee more
     Than e'er the coward hand of France can win.
     Submit thee, boy.
   ELINOR. Come to thy grandam, child.
   CONSTANCE. Do, child, go to it grandam, child;
     Give grandam kingdom, and it grandam will
     Give it a plum, a cherry, and a fig.
     There's a good grandam!
   ARTHUR. Good my mother, peace!
     I would that I were low laid in my grave:
--**--**--
     The sea enraged is not half so deaf,
     Lions more confident, mountains and rocks
     More free from motion-no, not Death himself
     In mortal fury half so peremptory
     As we to keep this city.
   BASTARD. Here's a stay
     That shakes the rotten carcass of old Death
     Out of his rags! Here's a large mouth, indeed,
     That spits forth death and mountains, rocks and seas;
     Talks as familiarly of roaring lions
     As maids of thirteen do of puppy-dogs!
     What cannoneer begot this lusty blood?
     He speaks plain cannon-fire, and smoke and bounce;
     He gives the bastinado with his tongue;
     Our ears are cudgell'd; not a word of his
     But buffets better than a fist of France.
     Zounds! I was never so bethump'd with words
     Since I first call'd my brother's father dad.
   ELINOR. Son, list to this conjunction, make this match;
     Give with our niece a dowry large enough;
     For by this knot thou shalt so surely tie
     Thy now unsur'd assurance to the crown
     That yon green boy shall have no sun to ripe
     The bloom that promiseth a mighty fruit.
     I see a yielding in the looks of France;
     Mark how they whisper. Urge them while their souls
     Are capable of this ambition,
     Lest zeal, now melted by the windy breath
     Of soft petitions, pity, and remorse,
     Cool and congeal again to what it was.
   CITIZEN. Why answer not the double majesties
     This friendly treaty of our threat'ned town?
   KING PHILIP. Speak England first, that hath been forward first
     To speak unto this city: what say you?
   KING JOHN. If that the Dauphin there, thy princely son,
     Can in this book of beauty read 'I love,'
     Her dowry shall weigh equal with a queen;
     For Anjou, and fair Touraine, Maine, Poictiers,
     And all that we upon this side the sea-
--**--**--
 
 
 
 ACT III. SCENE 1.
 
 France. The FRENCH KING'S camp
 
 Enter CONSTANCE, ARTHUR, and SALISBURY
 
   CONSTANCE. Gone to be married! Gone to swear a peace!
     False blood to false blood join'd! Gone to be friends!
     Shall Lewis have Blanch, and Blanch those provinces?
     It is not so; thou hast misspoke, misheard;
     Be well advis'd, tell o'er thy tale again.
     It cannot be; thou dost but say 'tis so;
     I trust I may not trust thee, for thy word
     Is but the vain breath of a common man:
     Believe me I do not believe thee, man;
     I have a king's oath to the contrary.
     Thou shalt be punish'd for thus frighting me,
     For I am sick and capable of fears,
     Oppress'd with wrongs, and therefore full of fears;
     A widow, husbandless, subject to fears;
     A woman, naturally born to fears;
     And though thou now confess thou didst but jest,
     With my vex'd spirits I cannot take a truce,
     But they will quake and tremble all this day.
     What dost thou mean by shaking of thy head?
     Why dost thou look so sadly on my son?
     What means that hand upon that breast of thine?
     Why holds thine eye that lamentable rheum,
     Like a proud river peering o'er his bounds?
     Be these sad signs confirmers of thy words?
     Then speak again-not all thy former tale,
     But this one word, whether thy tale be true.
   SALISBURY. As true as I believe you think them false
     That give you cause to prove my saying true.
   CONSTANCE. O, if thou teach me to believe this sorrow,
     Teach thou this sorrow how to make me die;
     And let belief and life encounter so
     As doth the fury of two desperate men
     Which in the very meeting fall and die!
     Lewis marry Blanch! O boy, then where art thou?
--**--**--
     No bargains break that are not this day made;
     This day, all things begun come to ill end,
     Yea, faith itself to hollow falsehood change!
   KING PHILIP. By heaven, lady, you shall have no cause
     To curse the fair proceedings of this day.
     Have I not pawn'd to you my majesty?
   CONSTANCE. You have beguil'd me with a counterfeit
     Resembling majesty, which, being touch'd and tried,
     Proves valueless; you are forsworn, forsworn;
     You came in arms to spill mine enemies' blood,
     But now in arms you strengthen it with yours.
     The grappling vigour and rough frown of war
     Is cold in amity and painted peace,
     And our oppression hath made up this league.
     Arm, arm, you heavens, against these perjur'd kings!
     A widow cries: Be husband to me, heavens!
     Let not the hours of this ungodly day
     Wear out the day in peace; but, ere sunset,
     Set armed discord 'twixt these perjur'd kings!
     Hear me, O, hear me!
   AUSTRIA. Lady Constance, peace!
   CONSTANCE. War! war! no peace! Peace is to me a war.
     O Lymoges! O Austria! thou dost shame
     That bloody spoil. Thou slave, thou wretch, thou coward!
     Thou little valiant, great in villainy!
     Thou ever strong upon the stronger side!
     Thou Fortune's champion that dost never fight
     But when her humorous ladyship is by
     To teach thee safety! Thou art perjur'd too,
     And sooth'st up greatness. What a fool art thou,
     A ramping fool, to brag and stamp and swear
     Upon my party! Thou cold-blooded slave,
     Hast thou not spoke like thunder on my side,
     Been sworn my soldier, bidding me depend
     Upon thy stars, thy fortune, and thy strength,
     And dost thou now fall over to my foes?
     Thou wear a lion's hide! Doff it for shame,
     And hang a calf's-skin on those recreant limbs.
   AUSTRIA. O that a man should speak those words to me!
--**--**--
     And the conjunction of our inward souls
     Married in league, coupled and link'd together
     With all religious strength of sacred vows;
     The latest breath that gave the sound of words
     Was deep-sworn faith, peace, amity, true love,
     Between our kingdoms and our royal selves;
     And even before this truce, but new before,
     No longer than we well could wash our hands,
     To clap this royal bargain up of peace,
     Heaven knows, they were besmear'd and overstain'd
     With slaughter's pencil, where revenge did paint
     The fearful difference of incensed kings.
     And shall these hands, so lately purg'd of blood,
     So newly join'd in love, so strong in both,
     Unyoke this seizure and this kind regreet?
     Play fast and loose with faith? so jest with heaven,
     Make such unconstant children of ourselves,
     As now again to snatch our palm from palm,
     Unswear faith sworn, and on the marriage-bed
     Of smiling peace to march a bloody host,
     And make a riot on the gentle brow
     Of true sincerity? O, holy sir,
     My reverend father, let it not be so!
     Out of your grace, devise, ordain, impose,
     Some gentle order; and then we shall be blest
     To do your pleasure, and continue friends.
   PANDULPH. All form is formless, order orderless,
     Save what is opposite to England's love.
     Therefore, to arms! be champion of our church,
     Or let the church, our mother, breathe her curse-
     A mother's curse-on her revolting son.
     France, thou mayst hold a serpent by the tongue,
     A chafed lion by the mortal paw,
     A fasting tiger safer by the tooth,
     Than keep in peace that hand which thou dost hold.
   KING PHILIP. I may disjoin my hand, but not my faith.
   PANDULPH. So mak'st thou faith an enemy to faith;
     And like. a civil war set'st oath to oath.
     Thy tongue against thy tongue. O, let thy vow
--**--**--
   KING PHILIP. So by a roaring tempest on the flood
     A whole armado of convicted sail
     Is scattered and disjoin'd from fellowship.
   PANDULPH. Courage and comfort! All shall yet go well.
   KING PHILIP. What can go well, when we have run so ill.
     Are we not beaten? Is not Angiers lost?
     Arthur ta'en prisoner? Divers dear friends slain?
     And bloody England into England gone,
     O'erbearing interruption, spite of France?
   LEWIS. he hath won, that hath he fortified;
     So hot a speed with such advice dispos'd,
     Such temperate order in so fierce a cause,
     Doth want example; who hath read or heard
     Of any kindred action like to this?
   KING PHILIP. Well could I bear that England had this praise,
     So we could find some pattern of our shame.
 
                    Enter CONSTANCE
 
     Look who comes here! a grave unto a soul;
     Holding th' eternal spirit, against her will,
     In the vile prison of afflicted breath.
     I prithee, lady, go away with me.
   CONSTANCE. Lo now! now see the issue of your peace!
   KING PHILIP. Patience, good lady! Comfort, gentle Constance!
   CONSTANCE. No, I defy all counsel, all redress,
     But that which ends all counsel, true redress-
     Death, death; O amiable lovely death!
     Thou odoriferous stench! sound rottenness!
     Arise forth from the couch of lasting night,
     Thou hate and terror to prosperity,
     And I will kiss thy detestable bones,
     And put my eyeballs in thy vaulty brows,
     And ring these fingers with thy household worms,
     And stop this gap of breath with fulsome dust,
     And be a carrion monster like thyself.
     Come, grin on me, and I will think thou smil'st,
     And buss thee as thy wife. Misery's love,
     O, come to me!
   KING PHILIP. O fair affliction, peace!
   CONSTANCE. No, no, I will not, having breath to cry.
     O that my tongue were in the thunder's mouth!
--**--**--
     The fit is strongest; evils that take leave
     On their departure most of all show evil;
     What have you lost by losing of this day?
   LEWIS. All days of glory, joy, and happiness.
   PANDULPH. If you had won it, certainly you had.
     No, no; when Fortune means to men most good,
     She looks upon them with a threat'ning eye.
     'Tis strange to think how much King John hath lost
     In this which he accounts so clearly won.
     Are not you griev'd that Arthur is his prisoner?
   LEWIS. As heartily as he is glad he hath him.
   PANDULPH. Your mind is all as youthful as your blood.
     Now hear me speak with a prophetic spirit;
     For even the breath of what I mean to speak
     Shall blow each dust, each straw, each little rub,
     Out of the path which shall directly lead
     Thy foot to England's throne. And therefore mark:
     John hath seiz'd Arthur; and it cannot be
     That, whiles warm life plays in that infant's veins,
     The misplac'd John should entertain an hour,
     One minute, nay, one quiet breath of rest.
     A sceptre snatch'd with an unruly hand
     Must be boisterously maintain'd as gain'd,
     And he that stands upon a slipp'ry place
     Makes nice of no vile hold to stay him up;
     That John may stand then, Arthur needs must fall;
     So be it, for it cannot be but so.
   LEWIS. But what shall I gain by young Arthur's fall?
   PANDULPH. You, in the right of Lady Blanch your wife,
     May then make all the claim that Arthur did.
   LEWIS. And lose it, life and all, as Arthur did.
   PANDULPH. How green you are and fresh in this old world!
     John lays you plots; the times conspire with you;
     For he that steeps his safety in true blood
     Shall find but bloody safety and untrue.
--**--**--
     Let him come back, that his compassion may
     Give life to yours.
   HUBERT. Come, boy, prepare yourself.
   ARTHUR. Is there no remedy?
   HUBERT. None, but to lose your eyes.
   ARTHUR. O heaven, that there were but a mote in yours,
     A grain, a dust, a gnat, a wandering hair,
     Any annoyance in that precious sense!
     Then, feeling what small things are boisterous there,
     Your vile intent must needs seem horrible.
   HUBERT. Is this your promise? Go to, hold your tongue.
   ARTHUR. Hubert, the utterance of a brace of tongues
     Must needs want pleading for a pair of eyes.
     Let me not hold my tongue, let me not, Hubert;
     Or, Hubert, if you will, cut out my tongue,
     So I may keep mine eyes. O, spare mine eyes,
     Though to no use but still to look on you!
     Lo, by my troth, the instrument is cold
     And would not harm me.
   HUBERT. I can heat it, boy.
   ARTHUR. No, in good sooth; the fire is dead with grief,
     Being create for comfort, to be us'd
     In undeserved extremes. See else yourself:
     There is no malice in this burning coal;
     The breath of heaven hath blown his spirit out,
     And strew'd repentant ashes on his head.
   HUBERT. But with my breath I can revive it, boy.
   ARTHUR. An if you do, you will but make it blush
     And glow with shame of your proceedings, Hubert.
     Nay, it perchance will sparkle in your eyes,
     And, like a dog that is compell'd to fight,
     Snatch at his master that doth tarre him on.
     All things that you should use to do me wrong
     Deny their office; only you do lack
     That mercy which fierce fire and iron extends,
     Creatures of note for mercy-lacking uses.
   HUBERT. Well, see to live; I will not touch thine eye
--**--**--
     Another lean unwash'd artificer
     Cuts off his tale, and talks of Arthur's death.
   KING JOHN. Why seek'st thou to possess me with these fears?
     Why urgest thou so oft young Arthur's death?
     Thy hand hath murd'red him. I had a mighty cause
     To wish him dead, but thou hadst none to kill him.
   HUBERT. No had, my lord! Why, did you not provoke me?
   KING JOHN. It is the curse of kings to be attended
     By slaves that take their humours for a warrant
     To break within the bloody house of life,
     And on the winking of authority
     To understand a law; to know the meaning
     Of dangerous majesty, when perchance it frowns
     More upon humour than advis'd respect.
   HUBERT. Here is your hand and seal for what I did.
   KING JOHN. O, when the last account 'twixt heaven and earth
     Is to be made, then shall this hand and seal
     Witness against us to damnation!
     How oft the sight of means to do ill deeds
     Make deeds ill done! Hadst not thou been by,
     A fellow by the hand of nature mark'd,
     Quoted and sign'd to do a deed of shame,
     This murder had not come into my mind;
     But, taking note of thy abhorr'd aspect,
     Finding thee fit for bloody villainy,
     Apt, liable to be employ'd in danger,
     I faintly broke with thee of Arthur's death;
     And thou, to be endeared to a king,
     Made it no conscience to destroy a prince.
   HUBERT. My lord-
   KING JOHN. Hadst thou but shook thy head or made pause,
     When I spake darkly what I purposed,
     Or turn'd an eye of doubt upon my face,
     As bid me tell my tale in express words,
     Deep shame had struck me dumb, made me break off,
     And those thy fears might have wrought fears in me.
--**--**--
     She lov'd not the savour of tar nor of pitch,
     Yet a tailor might scratch her where'er she did itch.
     Then to sea, boys, and let her go hang!
 
     This is a scurvy tune too; but here's my comfort.
                                                         [Drinks]
   CALIBAN. Do not torment me. O!
   STEPHANO. What's the matter? Have we devils here? Do you
     put tricks upon 's with savages and men of Ind? Ha! I
     have not scap'd drowning to be afeard now of your four
     legs; for it hath been said: As proper a man as ever
     went on four legs cannot make him give ground; and it
     shall be said so again, while Stephano breathes at
     nostrils.
   CALIBAN. The spirit torments me. O!
   STEPHANO. This is some monster of the isle with four legs,
     who hath got, as I take it, an ague. Where the devil
     should he learn our language? I will give him some
     relief, if it be but for that. If I can recover him, and
     keep him tame, and get to Naples with him, he's a
     present for any emperor that ever trod on neat's
     leather.
   CALIBAN. Do not torment me, prithee; I'll bring my wood
     home faster.
   STEPHANO. He's in his fit now, and does not talk after the
     wisest. He shall taste of my bottle; if he have never
     drunk wine afore, it will go near to remove his fit. If
     I can recover him, and keep him tame, I will not take
     too much for him; he shall pay for him that hath him,
     and that soundly.
   CALIBAN. Thou dost me yet but little hurt; thou wilt anon,
     I know it by thy trembling; now Prosper works upon thee.
   STEPHANO. Come on your ways; open your mouth; here is
     that which will give language to you, cat. Open your
--**--**--
     I afeard of him! A very weak monster! The Man i' th'
     Moon! A most poor credulous monster! Well drawn,
     monster, in good sooth!
   CALIBAN. I'll show thee every fertile inch o' th' island;
     and will kiss thy foot. I prithee be my god.
   TRINCULO. By this light, a most perfidious and drunken
     monster! When's god's asleep he'll rob his bottle.
   CALIBAN. I'll kiss thy foot; I'll swear myself thy
     subject.
   STEPHANO. Come on, then; down, and swear.
   TRINCULO. I shall laugh myself to death at this puppy-
     headed monster. A most scurvy monster! I could find in
     my heart to beat him-
   STEPHANO. Come, kiss.
   TRINCULO. But that the poor monster's in drink. An
     abominable monster!
   CALIBAN. I'll show thee the best springs; I'll pluck thee
     berries;
     I'll fish for thee, and get thee wood enough.
     A plague upon the tyrant that I serve!
     I'll bear him no more sticks, but follow thee,
     Thou wondrous man.
   TRINCULO. A most ridiculous monster, to make a wonder of
     a poor drunkard!
   CALIBAN. I prithee let me bring thee where crabs grow;
     And I with my long nails will dig thee pig-nuts;
     Show thee a jay's nest, and instruct thee how
     To snare the nimble marmoset; I'll bring thee
     To clust'ring filberts, and sometimes I'll get thee
     Young scamels from the rock. Wilt thou go with me?
   STEPHANO. I prithee now, lead the way without any more
     talking. Trinculo, the King and all our company else
     being drown'd, we will inherit here. Here, bear my bottle.
     Fellow Trinculo, we'll fill him by and by again.
   CALIBAN.  [Sings drunkenly]  Farewell, master; farewell,
     farewell!
   TRINCULO. A howling monster; a drunken monster!
   CALIBAN. No more dams I'll make for fish;
     Nor fetch in firing
     At requiring,
     Nor scrape trenchering, nor wash dish.
     'Ban 'Ban, Ca-Caliban,
--**--**--
     For yet ere supper time must I perform
     Much business appertaining.                             Exit
 
 
 
 
 SCENE 2
 
 Another part of the island
 
 Enter CALIBAN, STEPHANO, and TRINCULO
 
   STEPHANO. Tell not me-when the butt is out we will drink
     water, not a drop before; therefore bear up, and board
     'em. Servant-monster, drink to me.
   TRINCULO. Servant-monster! The folly of this island! They
     say there's but five upon this isle: we are three of
     them; if th' other two be brain'd like us, the state
     totters.
   STEPHANO. Drink, servant-monster, when I bid thee; thy
     eyes are almost set in thy head.
   TRINCULO. Where should they be set else? He were a brave
     monster indeed, if they were set in his tail.
   STEPHANO. My man-monster hath drown'd his tongue in
     sack. For my part, the sea cannot drown me; I swam, ere
     I could recover the shore, five and thirty leagues, off
     and on. By this light, thou shalt be my lieutenant,
     monster, or my standard.
   TRINCULO. Your lieutenant, if you list; he's no standard.
   STEPHANO. We'll not run, Monsieur Monster.
   TRINCULO. Nor go neither; but you'll lie like dogs, and
     yet say nothing neither.
   STEPHANO. Moon-calf, speak once in thy life, if thou beest
     a good moon-calf.
   CALIBAN. How does thy honour? Let me lick thy shoe.
     I'll not serve him; he is not valiant.
   TRINCULO. Thou liest, most ignorant monster: I am in case
     to justle a constable. Why, thou debosh'd fish, thou,
     was there ever man a coward that hath drunk so much sack
     as I to-day? Wilt thou tell a monstrous lie, being but
     half fish and half a monster?
   CALIBAN. Lo, how he mocks me! Wilt thou let him, my
     lord?
   TRINCULO. 'Lord' quoth he! That a monster should be such
     a natural!
   CALIBAN. Lo, lo again! Bite him to death, I prithee.
--**--**--
     There is one tree, the phoenix' throne, one phoenix
     At this hour reigning-there.
   ANTONIO. I'll believe both;
     And what does else want credit, come to me,
     And I'll be sworn 'tis true; travellers ne'er did lie,
     Though fools at home condemn 'em.
   GONZALO. If in Naples
     I should report this now, would they believe me?
     If I should say, I saw such islanders,
     For certes these are people of the island,
     Who though they are of monstrous shape yet, note,
     Their manners are more gentle-kind than of
     Our human generation you shall find
     Many, nay, almost any.
   PROSPERO.  [Aside]  Honest lord,
     Thou hast said well; for some of you there present
     Are worse than devils.
   ALONSO. I cannot too much muse
     Such shapes, such gesture, and such sound, expressing,
     Although they want the use of tongue, a kind
     Of excellent dumb discourse.
   PROSPERO.  [Aside]  Praise in departing.
   FRANCISCO. They vanish'd strangely.
   SEBASTIAN. No matter, since
     They have left their viands behind; for we have stomachs.
     Will't please you taste of what is here?
   ALONSO. Not I.
   GONZALO. Faith, sir, you need not fear. When we were boys,
     Who would believe that there were mountaineers,
     Dewlapp'd like bulls, whose throats had hanging at 'em
     Wallets of flesh? or that there were such men
     Whose heads stood in their breasts? which now we find
     Each putter-out of five for one will bring us
     Good warrant of.
   ALONSO. I will stand to, and feed,
     Although my last; no matter, since I feel
     The best is past. Brother, my lord the Duke,
     Stand to, and do as we.
 
        Thunder and lightning. Enter ARIEL, like a harpy;
        claps his wings upon the table; and, with a quaint
                 device, the banquet vanishes
 
   ARIEL. You are three men of sin, whom Destiny,
     That hath to instrument this lower world
--**--**--
     With such love as 'tis now, the murkiest den,
     The most opportune place, the strong'st suggestion
     Our worser genius can, shall never melt
     Mine honour into lust, to take away
     The edge of that day's celebration,
     When I shall think or Phoebus' steeds are founder'd
     Or Night kept chain'd below.
   PROSPERO. Fairly spoke.
     Sit, then, and talk with her; she is thine own.
     What, Ariel! my industrious servant, Ariel!
 
                            Enter ARIEL
 
   ARIEL. What would my potent master? Here I am.
   PROSPERO. Thou and thy meaner fellows your last service
     Did worthily perform; and I must use you
     In such another trick. Go bring the rabble,
     O'er whom I give thee pow'r, here to this place.
     Incite them to quick motion; for I must
     Bestow upon the eyes of this young couple
     Some vanity of mine art; it is my promise,
     And they expect it from me.
   ARIEL. Presently?
   PROSPERO. Ay, with a twink.
   ARIEL. Before you can say 'come' and 'go,'
     And breathe twice, and cry 'so, so,'
     Each one, tripping on his toe,
     Will be here with mop and mow.
     Do you love me, master? No?
   PROSPERO. Dearly, my delicate Ariel. Do not approach
     Till thou dost hear me call.
   ARIEL. Well! I conceive.                                  Exit
   PROSPERO. Look thou be true; do not give dalliance
     Too much the rein; the strongest oaths are straw
     To th' fire i' th' blood. Be more abstemious,
     Or else good night your vow!
   FERDINAND. I warrant you, sir,
     The white cold virgin snow upon my heart
     Abates the ardour of my liver.
   PROSPERO. Well!
     Now come, my Ariel, bring a corollary,
     Rather than want a spirit; appear, and pertly.
     No tongue! All eyes! Be silent.                 [Soft music]
 
                          Enter IRIS
 
   IRIS. Ceres, most bounteous lady, thy rich leas
     Of wheat, rye, barley, vetches, oats, and pease;
--**--**--
     your harmless fairy, monster.
   STEPHANO. I will fetch off my bottle, though I be o'er
     ears for my labour.
   CALIBAN. Prithee, my king, be quiet. Seest thou here,
     This is the mouth o' th' cell; no noise, and enter.
     Do that good mischief which may make this island
     Thine own for ever, and I, thy Caliban,
     For aye thy foot-licker.
   STEPHANO. Give me thy hand. I do begin to have bloody
     thoughts.
   TRINCULO. O King Stephano! O peer! O worthy Stephano!
     Look what a wardrobe here is for thee!
   CALIBAN. Let it alone, thou fool; it is but trash.
   TRINCULO. O, ho, monster; we know what belongs to a
     frippery. O King Stephano!
   STEPHANO. Put off that gown, Trinculo; by this hand, I'll
     have that gown.
   TRINCULO. Thy Grace shall have it.
   CALIBAN. The dropsy drown this fool! What do you mean
     To dote thus on such luggage? Let 't alone,
     And do the murder first. If he awake,
     From toe to crown he'll fill our skins with pinches;
     Make us strange stuff.
   STEPHANO. Be you quiet, monster. Mistress line, is not
     this my jerkin? Now is the jerkin under the line; now,
     jerkin, you are like to lose your hair, and prove a bald
     jerkin.
   TRINCULO. Do, do. We steal by line and level, an't like
     your Grace.
   STEPHANO. I thank thee for that jest; here's a garment
     for't. Wit shall not go unrewarded while I am king of
     this country. 'Steal by line and level' is an excellent
     pass of pate; there's another garmet for't.
   TRINCULO. Monster, come, put some lime upon your fingers,
     and away with the rest.
   CALIBAN. I will have none on't. We shall lose our time,
     And all be turn'd to barnacles, or to apes
     With foreheads villainous low.
   STEPHANO. Monster, lay-to your fingers; help to bear this
--**--**--
     Though with their high wrongs I am struck to th' quick,
     Yet with my nobler reason 'gainst my fury
     Do I take part; the rarer action is
     In virtue than in vengeance; they being penitent,
     The sole drift of my purpose doth extend
     Not a frown further. Go release them, Ariel;
     My charms I'll break, their senses I'll restore,
     And they shall be themselves.
   ARIEL. I'll fetch them, sir.                              Exit
   PROSPERO. Ye elves of hills, brooks, standing lakes, and
     groves;
     And ye that on the sands with printless foot
     Do chase the ebbing Neptune, and do fly him
     When he comes back; you demi-puppets that
     By moonshine do the green sour ringlets make,
     Whereof the ewe not bites; and you whose pastime
     Is to make midnight mushrooms, that rejoice
     To hear the solemn curfew; by whose aid-
     Weak masters though ye be-I have be-dimm'd
     The noontide sun, call'd forth the mutinous winds,
     And 'twixt the green sea and the azur'd vault
     Set roaring war. To the dread rattling thunder
     Have I given fire, and rifted Jove's stout oak
     With his own bolt; the strong-bas'd promontory
     Have I made shake, and by the spurs pluck'd up
     The pine and cedar. Graves at my command
     Have wak'd their sleepers, op'd, and let 'em forth,
     By my so potent art. But this rough magic
     I here abjure; and, when I have requir'd
     Some heavenly music-which even now I do-
     To work mine end upon their senses that
     This airy charm is for, I'll break my staff,
     Bury it certain fathoms in the earth,
     And deeper than did ever plummet sound
     I'll drown my book.                            [Solem music]
 
             Here enters ARIEL before; then ALONSO, with
           frantic gesture, attended by GONZALO; SEBASTIAN
            and ANTONIO in like manner, attended by ADRIAN
            and FRANCISCO. They all enter the circle which
--**--**--
     He will chastise me.
   SEBASTIAN. Ha, ha!
     What things are these, my lord Antonio?
     Will money buy'em?
   ANTONIO. Very like; one of them
     Is a plain fish, and no doubt marketable.
   PROSPERO. Mark but the badges of these men, my lords,
     Then say if they be true. This mis-shapen knave-
     His mother was a witch, and one so strong
     That could control the moon, make flows and ebbs,
     And deal in her command without her power.
     These three have robb'd me; and this demi-devil-
     For he's a bastard one-had plotted with them
     To take my life. Two of these fellows you
     Must know and own; this thing of darkness I
     Acknowledge mine.
   CALIBAN. I shall be pinch'd to death.
   ALONSO. Is not this Stephano, my drunken butler?
   SEBASTIAN. He is drunk now; where had he wine?
   ALONSO. And Trinculo is reeling ripe; where should they
     Find this grand liquor that hath gilded 'em?
     How cam'st thou in this pickle?
   TRINCULO. I have been in such a pickle since I saw you
     last that, I fear me, will never out of my bones. I
     shall not fear fly-blowing.
   SEBASTIAN. Why, how now, Stephano!
   STEPHANO. O, touch me not; I am not Stephano, but a
     cramp.
   PROSPERO. You'd be king o' the isle, sirrah?
   STEPHANO. I should have been a sore one, then.
   ALONSO.  [Pointing to CALIBAN]  This is as strange a thing
     as e'er I look'd on.
   PROSPERO. He is as disproportioned in his manners
     As in his shape. Go, sirrah, to my cell;
     Take with you your companions; as you look
     To have my pardon, trim it handsomely.
   CALIBAN. Ay, that I will; and I'll be wise hereafter,
     And seek for grace. What a thrice-double ass
     Was I to take this drunkard for a god,
     And worship this dull fool!
--**--**--
     A gentleman that well deserves a help,
     Which he shall have. I'll pay the debt, and free him.
   MESSENGER. Your lordship ever binds him.
   TIMON. Commend me to him; I will send his ransom;
     And being enfranchis'd, bid him come to me.
     'Tis not enough to help the feeble up,
     But to support him after. Fare you well.
   MESSENGER. All happiness to your honour!                  Exit
 
                       Enter an OLD ATHENIAN
 
   OLD ATHENIAN. Lord Timon, hear me speak.
   TIMON. Freely, good father.
   OLD ATHENIAN. Thou hast a servant nam'd Lucilius.
   TIMON. I have so; what of him?
   OLD ATHENIAN. Most noble Timon, call the man before thee.
   TIMON. Attends he here, or no? Lucilius!
   LUCILIUS. Here, at your lordship's service.
   OLD ATHENIAN. This fellow here, Lord Timon, this thy creature,
     By night frequents my house. I am a man
     That from my first have been inclin'd to thrift,
     And my estate deserves an heir more rais'd
     Than one which holds a trencher.
   TIMON. Well; what further?
   OLD ATHENIAN. One only daughter have I, no kin else,
     On whom I may confer what I have got.
     The maid is fair, o' th' youngest for a bride,
     And I have bred her at my dearest cost
     In qualities of the best. This man of thine
     Attempts her love; I prithee, noble lord,
     Join with me to forbid him her resort;
     Myself have spoke in vain.
   TIMON. The man is honest.
   OLD ATHENIAN. Therefore he will be, Timon.
     His honesty rewards him in itself;
     It must not bear my daughter.
   TIMON. Does she love him?
   OLD ATHENIAN. She is young and apt:
     Our own precedent passions do instruct us
     What levity's in youth.
   TIMON. Love you the maid?
   LUCILIUS. Ay, my good lord, and she accepts of it.
   OLD ATHENIAN. If in her marriage my consent be missing,
--**--**--
     There's much example for't; the fellow that sits next him now,
     parts bread with him, pledges the breath of him in a divided
     draught, is the readiest man to kill him. 'T has been proved. If
     I were a huge man I should fear to drink at meals.
     Lest they should spy my windpipe's dangerous notes:
     Great men should drink with harness on their throats.
   TIMON. My lord, in heart! and let the health go round.
   SECOND LORD. Let it flow this way, my good lord.
   APEMANTUS. Flow this way! A brave fellow! He keeps his tides well.
     Those healths will make thee and thy state look ill, Timon.
     Here's that which is too weak to be a sinner, honest water, which
     ne'er left man i' th' mire.
     This and my food are equals; there's no odds.'
     Feasts are too proud to give thanks to the gods.
 
                   APEMANTUS' Grace
 
            Immortal gods, I crave no pelf;
            I pray for no man but myself.
            Grant I may never prove so fond
            To trust man on his oath or bond,
            Or a harlot for her weeping,
            Or a dog that seems a-sleeping,
            Or a keeper with my freedom,
            Or my friends, if I should need 'em.
            Amen. So fall to't.
            Rich men sin, and I eat root.       [Eats and drinks]
 
     Much good dich thy good heart, Apemantus!
   TIMON. Captain Alcibiades, your heart's in the field now.
   ALCIBIADES. My heart is ever at your service, my lord.
   TIMON. You had rather be at a breakfast of enemies than dinner of
     friends.
   ALCIBIADES. So they were bleeding new, my lord, there's no meat
     like 'em; I could wish my best friend at such a feast.
   APEMANTUS. Would all those flatterers were thine enemies then, that
     then thou mightst kill 'em, and bid me to 'em.
--**--**--
   CAPHIS. Here comes the lord.
 
             Enter TIMON and his train, with ALCIBIADES
 
   TIMON. So soon as dinner's done we'll forth again,
     My Alcibiades.- With me? What is your will?
   CAPHIS. My lord, here is a note of certain dues.
   TIMON. Dues! Whence are you?
   CAPHIS. Of Athens here, my lord.
   TIMON. Go to my steward.
   CAPHIS. Please it your lordship, he hath put me off
     To the succession of new days this month.
     My master is awak'd by great occasion
     To call upon his own, and humbly prays you
     That with your other noble parts you'll suit
     In giving him his right.
   TIMON. Mine honest friend,
     I prithee but repair to me next morning.
   CAPHIS. Nay, good my lord-
   TIMON. Contain thyself, good friend.
   VARRO'S SERVANT. One Varro's servant, my good lord-
   ISIDORE'S SERVANT. From Isidore: he humbly prays your speedy
     payment-
   CAPHIS. If you did know, my lord, my master's wants-
   VARRO'S SERVANT. 'Twas due on forfeiture, my lord, six weeks and
     past.
   ISIDORE'S SERVANT. Your steward puts me off, my lord; and
     I am sent expressly to your lordship.
   TIMON. Give me breath.
     I do beseech you, good my lords, keep on;
     I'll wait upon you instantly.
                                      Exeunt ALCIBIADES and LORDS
     [To FLAVIUS] Come hither. Pray you,
     How goes the world that I am thus encount'red
     With clamorous demands of date-broke bonds
     And the detention of long-since-due debts,
     Against my honour?
   FLAVIUS. Please you, gentlemen,
     The time is unagreeable to this business.
     Your importunacy cease till after dinner,
     That I may make his lordship understand
     Wherefore you are not paid.
   TIMON. Do so, my friends.
     See them well entertain'd.                              Exit
   FLAVIUS. Pray draw near.                                  Exit
 
                       Enter APEMANTUS and FOOL
 
   CAPHIS. Stay, stay, here comes the fool with Apemantus.
     Let's ha' some sport with 'em.
   VARRO'S SERVANT. Hang him, he'll abuse us!
--**--**--
                            Enter LUCULLUS
 
   SERVANT. Here's my lord.
   LUCULLUS. [Aside] One of Lord Timon's men? A gift, I warrant. Why,
     this hits right; I dreamt of a silver basin and ewer to-night-
     Flaminius, honest Flaminius, you are very respectively welcome,
     sir. Fill me some wine. [Exit SERVANT] And how does that
     honourable, complete, freehearted gentleman of Athens, thy very
     bountiful good lord and master?
   FLAMINIUS. His health is well, sir.
   LUCULLUS. I am right glad that his health is well, sir. And what
     hast thou there under thy cloak, pretty Flaminius?
   FLAMINIUS. Faith, nothing but an empty box, sir, which in my lord's
     behalf I come to entreat your honour to supply;  who, having
     great and instant occasion to use fifty talents, hath sent to
     your lordship to furnish him, nothing doubting your present
     assistance therein.
   LUCULLIUS. La, la, la, la! 'Nothing doubting' says he? Alas, good
     lord! a noble gentleman 'tis, if he would not keep so good a
     house. Many a time and often I ha' din'd with him and told him
     on't; and come again to supper to him of purpose to have him
     spend less; and yet he would embrace no counsel, take no warning
     by my coming. Every man has his fault, and honesty is his. I ha'
     told him on't, but I could ne'er get him from't.
 
                     Re-enter SERVANT, with wine
 
   SERVANT. Please your lordship, here is the wine.
   LUCULLUS. Flaminius, I have noted thee always wise. Here's to thee.
   FLAMINIUS. Your lordship speaks your pleasure.
   LUCULLUS. I have observed thee always for a towardly prompt spirit,
     give thee thy due, and one that knows what belongs to reason, and
     canst use the time well, if the time use thee well. Good parts in
     thee. [To SERVANT] Get you gone, sirrah. [Exit SERVANT] Draw
     nearer, honest Flaminius. Thy lord's a bountiful gentleman; but
--**--**--
     For which I wait for money.
   HORTENSIUS. It is against my heart.
   LUCIUS' SERVANT. Mark how strange it shows
     Timon in this should pay more than he owes;
     And e'en as if your lord should wear rich jewels
     And send for money for 'em.
   HORTENSIUS. I'm weary of this charge, the gods can witness;
     I know my lord hath spent of Timon's wealth,
     And now ingratitude makes it worse than stealth.
   FIRST VARRO'S SERVANT. Yes, mine's three thousand crowns; what's
     yours?
   LUCIUS' SERVANT. Five thousand mine.
   FIRST VARRO'S SERVANT. 'Tis much deep; and it should seem by th'
       sum
     Your master's confidence was above mine,
     Else surely his had equall'd.
 
                            Enter FLAMINIUS
 
   TITUS. One of Lord Timon's men.
   LUCIUS' SERVANT. Flaminius! Sir, a word. Pray, is my lord ready to
     come forth?
   FLAMINIUS. No, indeed, he is not.
   TITUS. We attend his lordship; pray signify so much.
   FLAMINIUS. I need not tell him that; he knows you are to diligent.
  Exit
 
                  Enter FLAVIUS, in a cloak, muffled
 
   LUCIUS' SERVANT. Ha! Is not that his steward muffled so?
     He goes away in a cloud. Call him, call him.
   TITUS. Do you hear, sir?
   SECOND VARRO'S SERVANT. By your leave, sir.
   FLAVIUS. What do ye ask of me, my friend?
   TITUS. We wait for certain money here, sir.
   FLAVIUS. Ay,
     If money were as certain as your waiting,
     'Twere sure enough.
     Why then preferr'd you not your sums and bills
     When your false masters eat of my lord's meat?
     Then they could smile, and fawn upon his debts,
     And take down th' int'rest into their glutt'nous maws.
     You do yourselves but wrong to stir me up;
     Let me pass quietly.
     Believe't, my lord and I have made an end:
     I have no more to reckon, he to spend.
   LUCIUS' SERVANT. Ay, but this answer will not serve.
--**--**--
   FIRST LORD. Royal cheer, I warrant you.
   THIRD LORD. Doubt not that, if money and the season can yield it.
   FIRST LORD. How do you? What's the news?
   THIRD LORD. Alcibiades is banish'd. Hear you of it?
   FIRST AND SECOND LORDS. Alcibiades banish'd!
   THIRD LORD. 'Tis so, be sure of it.
   FIRST LORD. How? how?
   SECOND LORD. I pray you, upon what?
   TIMON. My worthy friends, will you draw near?
   THIRD LORD. I'll tell you more anon. Here's a noble feast toward.
   SECOND LORD. This is the old man still.
   THIRD LORD. Will't hold? Will't hold?
   SECOND LORD. It does; but time will- and so-
   THIRD LORD. I do conceive.
   TIMON. Each man to his stool with that spur as he would to the lip
     of his mistress; your diet shall be in all places alike. Make not
     a city feast of it, to let the meat cool ere we can agree upon
     the first place. Sit, sit. The gods require our thanks:
 
     You great benefactors, sprinkle our society with thankfulness.
     For your own gifts make yourselves prais'd; but reserve still to
     give, lest your deities be despised. Lend to each man enough,
     that one need not lend to another; for were your god-heads to
     borrow of men, men would forsake the gods. Make the meat be
     beloved more than the man that gives it. Let no assembly of
     twenty be without a score of villains. If there sit twelve women
     at the table, let a dozen of them be- as they are. The rest of
     your foes, O gods, the senators of Athens, together with the
     common lag of people, what is amiss in them, you gods, make
     suitable for destruction. For these my present friends, as they
     are to me nothing, so in nothing bless them, and to nothing are
--**--**--
     But yet I'll bury thee. Thou't go, strong thief,
     When gouty keepers of thee cannot stand.
     Nay, stay thou out for earnest.          [Keeping some gold]
 
           Enter ALCIBIADES, with drum and fife, in warlike
                   manner; and PHRYNIA and TIMANDRA
 
   ALCIBIADES. What art thou there? Speak.
   TIMON. A beast, as thou art. The canker gnaw thy heart
     For showing me again the eyes of man!
   ALCIBIADES. What is thy name? Is man so hateful to thee
     That art thyself a man?
   TIMON. I am Misanthropos, and hate mankind.
     For thy part, I do wish thou wert a dog,
     That I might love thee something.
   ALCIBIADES. I know thee well;
     But in thy fortunes am unlearn'd and strange.
   TIMON. I know thee too; and more than that I know thee
     I not desire to know. Follow thy drum;
     With man's blood paint the ground, gules, gules.
     Religious canons, civil laws, are cruel;
     Then what should war be? This fell whore of thine
     Hath in her more destruction than thy sword
     For all her cherubin look.
   PHRYNIA. Thy lips rot off!
   TIMON. I will not kiss thee; then the rot returns
     To thine own lips again.
   ALCIBIADES. How came the noble Timon to this change?
   TIMON. As the moon does, by wanting light to give.
     But then renew I could not, like the moon;
     There were no suns to borrow of.
   ALCIBIADES. Noble Timon,
     What friendship may I do thee?
   TIMON. None, but to
     Maintain my opinion.
   ALCIBIADES. What is it, Timon?
   TIMON. Promise me friendship, but perform none. If thou wilt not
     promise, the gods plague thee, for thou art man! If thou dost
     perform, confound thee, for thou art a man!
   ALCIBIADES. I have heard in some sort of thy miseries.
   TIMON. Thou saw'st them when I had prosperity.
   ALCIBIADES. I see them now; then was a blessed time.
--**--**--
     Th' immortal gods that hear you. Spare your oaths;
     I'll trust to your conditions. Be whores still;
     And he whose pious breath seeks to convert you-
     Be strong in whore, allure him, burn him up;
     Let your close fire predominate his smoke,
     And be no turncoats. Yet may your pains six months
     Be quite contrary! And thatch your poor thin roofs
     With burdens of the dead- some that were hang'd,
     No matter. Wear them, betray with them. Whore still;
     Paint till a horse may mire upon your face.
     A pox of wrinkles!
   PHRYNIA AND TIMANDRA. Well, more gold. What then?
     Believe't that we'll do anything for gold.
   TIMON. Consumptions sow
     In hollow bones of man; strike their sharp shins,
     And mar men's spurring. Crack the lawyer's voice,
     That he may never more false title plead,
     Nor sound his quillets shrilly. Hoar the flamen,
     That scolds against the quality of flesh
     And not believes himself. Down with the nose,
     Down with it flat, take the bridge quite away
     Of him that, his particular to foresee,
     Smells from the general weal. Make curl'd-pate ruffians bald,
     And let the unscarr'd braggarts of the war
     Derive some pain from you. Plague all,
     That your activity may defeat and quell
     The source of all erection. There's more gold.
     Do you damn others, and let this damn you,
     And ditches grave you all!
   PHRYNIA AND TIMANDRA. More counsel with more money, bounteous
     Timon.
   TIMON. More whore, more mischief first; I have given you earnest.
   ALCIBIADES. Strike up the drum towards Athens. Farewell, Timon;
     If I thrive well, I'll visit thee again.
   TIMON. If I hope well, I'll never see thee more.
   ALCIBIADES. I never did thee harm.
   TIMON. Yes, thou spok'st well of me.
   ALCIBIADES. Call'st thou that harm?
   TIMON. Men daily find it. Get thee away, and take
--**--**--
     Set them into confounding odds, that beasts
     May have the world in empire!
   APEMANTUS. Would 'twere so!
     But not till I am dead. I'll say th' hast gold.
     Thou wilt be throng'd to shortly.
   TIMON. Throng'd to?
   APEMANTUS. Ay.
   TIMON. Thy back, I prithee.
   APEMANTUS. Live, and love thy misery!
   TIMON. Long live so, and so die! [Exit APEMANTUS] I am quit. More
     things like men? Eat, Timon, and abhor them.
 
                        Enter the BANDITTI
 
   FIRST BANDIT. Where should he have this gold? It is some poor
     fragment, some slender ort of his remainder. The mere want of
     gold and the falling-from of his friends drove him into this
     melancholy.
   SECOND BANDIT. It is nois'd he hath a mass of treasure.
   THIRD BANDIT. Let us make the assay upon him; if he care not for't,
     he will supply us easily; if he covetously reserve it, how
     shall's get it?
   SECOND BANDIT. True; for he bears it not about him. 'Tis hid.
   FIRST BANDIT. Is not this he?
   BANDITTI. Where?
   SECOND BANDIT. 'Tis his description.
   THIRD BANDIT. He; I know him.
   BANDITTI. Save thee, Timon!
   TIMON. Now, thieves?
   BANDITTI. Soldiers, not thieves.
   TIMON. Both too, and women's sons.
   BANDITTI. We are not thieves, but men that much do want.
   TIMON. Your greatest want is, you want much of meat.
     Why should you want? Behold, the earth hath roots;
     Within this mile break forth a hundred springs;
     The oaks bear mast, the briars scarlet hips;
     The bounteous housewife Nature on each bush
     Lays her full mess before you. Want! Why want?
   FIRST BANDIT. We cannot live on grass, on berries, water,
     As beasts and birds and fishes.
   TIMON. Nor on the beasts themselves, the birds, and fishes;
     You must eat men. Yet thanks I must you con
     That you are thieves profess'd, that you work not
--**--**--
   FIRST SENATOR. The senators of Athens greet thee, Timon.
   TIMON. I thank them; and would send them back the plague,
     Could I but catch it for them.
   FIRST SENATOR. O, forget
     What we are sorry for ourselves in thee.
     The senators with one consent of love
     Entreat thee back to Athens, who have thought
     On special dignities, which vacant lie
     For thy best use and wearing.
   SECOND SENATOR. They confess
     Toward thee forgetfulness too general, gross;
     Which now the public body, which doth seldom
     Play the recanter, feeling in itself
     A lack of Timon's aid, hath sense withal
     Of it own fail, restraining aid to Timon,
     And send forth us to make their sorrowed render,
     Together with a recompense more fruitful
     Than their offence can weigh down by the dram;
     Ay, even such heaps and sums of love and wealth
     As shall to thee blot out what wrongs were theirs
     And write in thee the figures of their love,
     Ever to read them thine.
   TIMON. You witch me in it;
     Surprise me to the very brink of tears.
     Lend me a fool's heart and a woman's eyes,
     And I'll beweep these comforts, worthy senators.
   FIRST SENATOR. Therefore so please thee to return with us,
     And of our Athens, thine and ours, to take
     The captainship, thou shalt be met with thanks,
     Allow'd with absolute power, and thy good name
     Live with authority. So soon we shall drive back
     Of Alcibiades th' approaches wild,
     Who, like a boar too savage, doth root up
     His country's peace.
   SECOND SENATOR. And shakes his threat'ning sword
     Against the walls of Athens.
   FIRST SENATOR. Therefore, Timon-
   TIMON. Well, sir, I will. Therefore I will, sir, thus:
     If Alcibiades kill my countrymen,
     Let Alcibiades know this of Timon,
     That Timon cares not. But if he sack fair Athens,
--**--**--
   FIRST SENATOR. These words become your lips as they pass through
     them.
   SECOND SENATOR. And enter in our ears like great triumphers
     In their applauding gates.
   TIMON. Commend me to them,
     And tell them that, to ease them of their griefs,
     Their fears of hostile strokes, their aches, losses,
     Their pangs of love, with other incident throes
     That nature's fragile vessel doth sustain
     In life's uncertain voyage, I will some kindness do them-
     I'll teach them to prevent wild Alcibiades' wrath.
   FIRST SENATOR. I like this well; he will return again.
   TIMON. I have a tree, which grows here in my close,
     That mine own use invites me to cut down,
     And shortly must I fell it. Tell my friends,
     Tell Athens, in the sequence of degree
     From high to low throughout, that whoso please
     To stop affliction, let him take his haste,
     Come hither, ere my tree hath felt the axe,
     And hang himself. I pray you do my greeting.
   FLAVIUS. Trouble him no further; thus you still shall find him.
   TIMON. Come not to me again; but say to Athens
     Timon hath made his everlasting mansion
     Upon the beached verge of the salt flood,
     Who once a day with his embossed froth
     The turbulent surge shall cover. Thither come,
     And let my gravestone be your oracle.
     Lips, let sour words go by and language end:
     What is amiss, plague and infection mend!
     Graves only be men's works and death their gain!
     Sun, hide thy beams. Timon hath done his reign.
                                         Exit TIMON into his cave
   FIRST SENATOR. His discontents are unremovably
     Coupled to nature.
   SECOND SENATOR. Our hope in him is dead. Let us return
     And strain what other means is left unto us
     In our dear peril.
   FIRST SENATOR. It requires swift foot.                  Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
--**--**--
 
   TAMORA, Queen of the Goths
   LAVINIA, daughter to Titus Andronicus
   A NURSE, and a black CHILD
 
   Romans and Goths, Senators, Tribunes, Officers, Soldiers, and
     Attendants
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                           SCENE:
                Rome and the neighbourhood
 
 
 ACT 1. SCENE I.
 Rome. Before the Capitol
 
 Flourish. Enter the TRIBUNES and SENATORS aloft; and then enter below
 SATURNINUS and his followers at one door, and BASSIANUS and his followers
 at the other, with drums and trumpets
 
   SATURNINUS. Noble patricians, patrons of my right,
     Defend the justice of my cause with arms;
     And, countrymen, my loving followers,
     Plead my successive title with your swords.
     I am his first born son that was the last
     That ware the imperial diadem of Rome;
     Then let my father's honours live in me,
     Nor wrong mine age with this indignity.
   BASSIANUS. Romans, friends, followers, favourers of my right,
     If ever Bassianus, Caesar's son,
     Were gracious in the eyes of royal Rome,
     Keep then this passage to the Capitol;
     And suffer not dishonour to approach
     The imperial seat, to virtue consecrate,
     To justice, continence, and nobility;
     But let desert in pure election shine;
     And, Romans, fight for freedom in your choice.
 
         Enter MARCUS ANDRONICUS aloft, with the crown
 
   MARCUS. Princes, that strive by factions and by friends
     Ambitiously for rule and empery,
     Know that the people of Rome, for whom we stand
     A special party, have by common voice
     In election for the Roman empery
     Chosen Andronicus, surnamed Pius
     For many good and great deserts to Rome.
     A nobler man, a braver warrior,
     Lives not this day within the city walls.
     He by the Senate is accited home,
     From weary wars against the barbarous Goths,
     That with his sons, a terror to our foes,
     Hath yok'd a nation strong, train'd up in arms.
     Ten years are spent since first he undertook
     This cause of Rome, and chastised with arms
--**--**--
 
   LAVINIA. In peace and honour live Lord Titus long;
     My noble lord and father, live in fame!
     Lo, at this tomb my tributary tears
     I render for my brethren's obsequies;
     And at thy feet I kneel, with tears of joy
     Shed on this earth for thy return to Rome.
     O, bless me here with thy victorious hand,
     Whose fortunes Rome's best citizens applaud!
   TITUS. Kind Rome, that hast thus lovingly reserv'd
     The cordial of mine age to glad my heart!
     Lavinia, live; outlive thy father's days,
     And fame's eternal date, for virtue's praise!
 
           Enter, above, MARCUS ANDRONICUS and TRIBUNES;
           re-enter SATURNINUS, BASSIANUS, and attendants
 
   MARCUS. Long live Lord Titus, my beloved brother,
     Gracious triumpher in the eyes of Rome!
   TITUS. Thanks, gentle Tribune, noble brother Marcus.
   MARCUS. And welcome, nephews, from successful wars,
     You that survive and you that sleep in fame.
     Fair lords, your fortunes are alike in all
     That in your country's service drew your swords;
     But safer triumph is this funeral pomp
     That hath aspir'd to Solon's happiness
     And triumphs over chance in honour's bed.
     Titus Andronicus, the people of Rome,
     Whose friend in justice thou hast ever been,
     Send thee by me, their Tribune and their trust,
     This par]iament of white and spotless hue;
     And name thee in election for the empire
     With these our late-deceased Emperor's sons:
     Be candidatus then, and put it on,
     And help to set a head on headless Rome.
   TITUS. A better head her glorious body fits
     Than his that shakes for age and feebleness.
     What should I don this robe and trouble you?
     Be chosen with proclamations to-day,
     To-morrow yield up rule, resign my life,
     And set abroad new business for you all?
     Rome, I have been thy soldier forty years,
     And led my country's strength successfully,
     And buried one and twenty valiant sons,
--**--**--
   TAMORA. Not so, my lord; the gods of Rome forfend
     I should be author to dishonour you!
     But on mine honour dare I undertake
     For good Lord Titus' innocence in all,
     Whose fury not dissembled speaks his griefs.
     Then at my suit look graciously on him;
     Lose not so noble a friend on vain suppose,
     Nor with sour looks afflict his gentle heart.
     [Aside to SATURNINUS]  My lord, be rul'd by me,
       be won at last;
     Dissemble all your griefs and discontents.
     You are but newly planted in your throne;
     Lest, then, the people, and patricians too,
     Upon a just survey take Titus' part,
     And so supplant you for ingratitude,
     Which Rome reputes to be a heinous sin,
     Yield at entreats, and then let me alone:
     I'll find a day to massacre them all,
     And raze their faction and their family,
     The cruel father and his traitorous sons,
     To whom I sued for my dear son's life;
     And make them know what 'tis to let a queen
     Kneel in the streets and beg for grace in vain.-
     Come, come, sweet Emperor; come, Andronicus.
     Take up this good old man, and cheer the heart
     That dies in tempest of thy angry frown.
   SATURNINUS. Rise, Titus, rise; my Empress hath prevail'd.
   TITUS. I thank your Majesty and her, my lord;
     These words, these looks, infuse new life in me.
   TAMORA. Titus, I am incorporate in Rome,
     A Roman now adopted happily,
     And must advise the Emperor for his good.
     This day all quarrels die, Andronicus;
     And let it be mine honour, good my lord,
     That I have reconcil'd your friends and you.
     For you, Prince Bassianus, I have pass'd
     My word and promise to the Emperor
     That you will be more mild and tractable.
     And fear not, lords- and you, Lavinia.
--**--**--
     To square for this? Would it offend you, then,
     That both should speed?
   CHIRON. Faith, not me.
   DEMETRIUS. Nor me, so I were one.
   AARON. For shame, be friends, and join for that you jar.
     'Tis policy and stratagem must do
     That you affect; and so must you resolve
     That what you cannot as you would achieve,
     You must perforce accomplish as you may.
     Take this of me: Lucrece was not more chaste
     Than this Lavinia, Bassianus' love.
     A speedier course than ling'ring languishment
     Must we pursue, and I have found the path.
     My lords, a solemn hunting is in hand;
     There will the lovely Roman ladies troop;
     The forest walks are wide and spacious,
     And many unfrequented plots there are
     Fitted by kind for rape and villainy.
     Single you thither then this dainty doe,
     And strike her home by force if not by words.
     This way, or not at all, stand you in hope.
     Come, come, our Empress, with her sacred wit
     To villainy and vengeance consecrate,
     Will we acquaint with all what we intend;
     And she shall file our engines with advice
     That will not suffer you to square yourselves,
     But to your wishes' height advance you both.
     The Emperor's court is like the house of Fame,
     The palace full of tongues, of eyes, and ears;
     The woods are ruthless, dreadful, deaf, and dull.
     There speak and strike, brave boys, and take your turns;
     There serve your lust, shadowed from heaven's eye,
     And revel in Lavinia's treasury.
   CHIRON. Thy counsel, lad, smells of no cowardice.
   DEMETRIUS. Sit fas aut nefas, till I find the stream
     To cool this heat, a charm to calm these fits,
     Per Styga, per manes vehor.                           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 A forest near Rome
 
 Enter TITUS ANDRONICUS, and his three sons, LUCIUS, QUINTUS, MARTIUS,
--**--**--
     They told me, here, at dead time of the night,
     A thousand fiends, a thousand hissing snakes,
     Ten thousand swelling toads, as many urchins,
     Would make such fearful and confused cries
     As any mortal body hearing it
     Should straight fall mad or else die suddenly.
     No sooner had they told this hellish tale
     But straight they told me they would bind me here
     Unto the body of a dismal yew,
     And leave me to this miserable death.
     And then they call'd me foul adulteress,
     Lascivious Goth, and all the bitterest terms
     That ever ear did hear to such effect;
     And had you not by wondrous fortune come,
     This vengeance on me had they executed.
     Revenge it, as you love your mother's life,
     Or be ye not henceforth call'd my children.
   DEMETRIUS. This is a witness that I am thy son.
                                                [Stabs BASSIANUS]
   CHIRON. And this for me, struck home to show my strength.
                                                     [Also stabs]
   LAVINIA. Ay, come, Semiramis- nay, barbarous Tamora,
     For no name fits thy nature but thy own!
   TAMORA. Give me the poniard; you shall know, my boys,
     Your mother's hand shall right your mother's wrong.
   DEMETRIUS. Stay, madam, here is more belongs to her;
     First thrash the corn, then after burn the straw.
     This minion stood upon her chastity,
     Upon her nuptial vow, her loyalty,
     And with that painted hope braves your mightiness;
     And shall she carry this unto her grave?
   CHIRON. An if she do, I would I were an eunuch.
     Drag hence her husband to some secret hole,
     And make his dead trunk pillow to our lust.
   TAMORA. But when ye have the honey we desire,
     Let not this wasp outlive, us both to sting.
   CHIRON. I warrant you, madam, we will make that sure.
     Come, mistress, now perforce we will enjoy
     That nice-preserved honesty of yours.
--**--**--
     My heart suspects more than mine eye can see.
   MARTIUS. To prove thou hast a true divining heart,
     Aaron and thou look down into this den,
     And see a fearful sight of blood and death.
   QUINTUS. Aaron is gone, and my compassionate heart
     Will not permit mine eyes once to behold
     The thing whereat it trembles by surmise;
     O, tell me who it is, for ne'er till now
     Was I a child to fear I know not what.
   MARTIUS. Lord Bassianus lies beray'd in blood,
     All on a heap, like to a slaughtered lamb,
     In this detested, dark, blood-drinking pit.
   QUINTUS. If it be dark, how dost thou know 'tis he?
   MARTIUS. Upon his bloody finger he doth wear
     A precious ring that lightens all this hole,
     Which, like a taper in some monument,
     Doth shine upon the dead man's earthy cheeks,
     And shows the ragged entrails of this pit;
     So pale did shine the moon on Pyramus
     When he by night lay bath'd in maiden blood.
     O brother, help me with thy fainting hand-
     If fear hath made thee faint, as me it hath-
     Out of this fell devouring receptacle,
     As hateful as Cocytus' misty mouth.
   QUINTUS. Reach me thy hand, that I may help thee out,
     Or, wanting strength to do thee so much good,
     I may be pluck'd into the swallowing womb
     Of this deep pit, poor Bassianus' grave.
     I have no strength to pluck thee to the brink.
   MARTIUS. Nor I no strength to climb without thy help.
   QUINTUS. Thy hand once more; I will not loose again,
     Till thou art here aloft, or I below.
     Thou canst not come to me- I come to thee.        [Falls in]
 
             Enter the EMPEROR and AARON the Moor
 
   SATURNINUS. Along with me! I'll see what hole is here,
--**--**--
     How they are stain'd, like meadows yet not dry
     With miry slime left on them by a flood?
     And in the fountain shall we gaze so long,
     Till the fresh taste be taken from that clearness,
     And made a brine-pit with our bitter tears?
     Or shall we cut away our hands like thine?
     Or shall we bite our tongues, and in dumb shows
     Pass the remainder of our hateful days?
     What shall we do? Let us that have our tongues
     Plot some device of further misery
     To make us wonder'd at in time to come.
   LUCIUS. Sweet father, cease your tears; for at your grief
     See how my wretched sister sobs and weeps.
   MARCUS. Patience, dear niece. Good Titus, dry thine eyes.
   TITUS. Ah, Marcus, Marcus! Brother, well I wot
     Thy napkin cannot drink a tear of mine,
     For thou, poor man, hast drown'd it with thine own.
   LUCIUS. Ah, my Lavinia, I will wipe thy cheeks.
   TITUS. Mark, Marcus, mark! I understand her signs.
     Had she a tongue to speak, now would she say
     That to her brother which I said to thee:
     His napkin, with his true tears all bewet,
     Can do no service on her sorrowful cheeks.
     O, what a sympathy of woe is this
     As far from help as Limbo is from bliss!
 
                    Enter AARON the Moor
 
   AARON. Titus Andronicus, my lord the Emperor
     Sends thee this word, that, if thou love thy sons,
     Let Marcus, Lucius, or thyself, old Titus,
     Or any one of you, chop off your hand
     And send it to the King: he for the same
     Will send thee hither both thy sons alive,
     And that shall be the ransom for their fault.
   TITUS. O gracious Emperor! O gentle Aaron!
     Did ever raven sing so like a lark
     That gives sweet tidings of the sun's uprise?
--**--**--
 
                  Re-enter LUCIUS and MARCUS
 
  TITUS. Now stay your strife. What shall be is dispatch'd.
     Good Aaron, give his Majesty my hand;
     Tell him it was a hand that warded him
     From thousand dangers; bid him bury it.
     More hath it merited- that let it have.
     As for my sons, say I account of them
     As jewels purchas'd at an easy price;
     And yet dear too, because I bought mine own.
   AARON. I go, Andronicus; and for thy hand
     Look by and by to have thy sons with thee.
     [Aside]  Their heads I mean. O, how this villainy
     Doth fat me with the very thoughts of it!
     Let fools do good, and fair men call for grace:
     Aaron will have his soul black like his face.           Exit
   TITUS. O, here I lift this one hand up to heaven,
     And bow this feeble ruin to the earth;
     If any power pities wretched tears,
     To that I call!  [To LAVINIA]  What, would'st thou kneel with me?
     Do, then, dear heart; for heaven shall hear our prayers,
     Or with our sighs we'll breathe the welkin dim
     And stain the sun with fog, as sometime clouds
     When they do hug him in their melting bosoms.
   MARCUS. O brother, speak with possibility,
     And do not break into these deep extremes.
   TITUS. Is not my sorrow deep, having no bottom?
     Then be my passions bottomless with them.
   MARCUS. But yet let reason govern thy lament.
   TITUS. If there were reason for these miseries,
     Then into limits could I bind my woes.
     When heaven doth weep, doth not the earth o'erflow?
     If the winds rage, doth not the sea wax mad,
     Threat'ning the welkin with his big-swol'n face?
     And wilt thou have a reason for this coil?
     I am the sea; hark how her sighs do blow.
--**--**--
     Then pardon me for reprehending thee,
     For thou hast done a charitable deed.
     Give me thy knife, I will insult on him,
     Flattering myself as if it were the Moor
     Come hither purposely to poison me.
     There's for thyself, and that's for Tamora.
     Ah, sirrah!
     Yet, I think, we are not brought so low
     But that between us we can kill a fly
     That comes in likeness of a coal-black Moor.
   MARCUS. Alas, poor man! grief has so wrought on him,
     He takes false shadows for true substances.
   TITUS. Come, take away. Lavinia, go with me;
     I'll to thy closet, and go read with thee
     Sad stories chanced in the times of old.
     Come, boy, and go with me; thy sight is young,
     And thou shalt read when mine begin to dazzle.        Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV. SCENE I.
 Rome. TITUS' garden
 
 Enter YOUNG LUCIUS and LAVINIA running after him,
 and the boy flies from her with his books under his arm.
 
 Enter TITUS and MARCUS
 
   BOY. Help, grandsire, help! my aunt Lavinia
     Follows me everywhere, I know not why.
     Good uncle Marcus, see how swift she comes!
     Alas, sweet aunt, I know not what you mean.
   MARCUS. Stand by me, Lucius; do not fear thine aunt.
   TITUS. She loves thee, boy, too well to do thee harm.
   BOY. Ay, when my father was in Rome she did.
   MARCUS. What means my niece Lavinia by these signs?
   TITUS. Fear her not, Lucius; somewhat doth she mean.
     See, Lucius, see how much she makes of thee.
     Somewhither would she have thee go with her.
     Ah, boy, Cornelia never with more care
     Read to her sons than she hath read to thee
     Sweet poetry and Tully's Orator.
   MARCUS. Canst thou not guess wherefore she plies thee thus?
   BOY. My lord, I know not, I, nor can I guess,
--**--**--
     The dam will wake; and if she wind ye once,
     She's with the lion deeply still in league,
     And lulls him whilst she playeth on her back,
     And when he sleeps will she do what she list.
     You are a young huntsman, Marcus; let alone;
     And come, I will go get a leaf of brass,
     And with a gad of steel will write these words,
     And lay it by. The angry northern wind
     Will blow these sands like Sibyl's leaves abroad,
     And where's our lesson, then? Boy, what say you?
   BOY. I say, my lord, that if I were a man
     Their mother's bedchamber should not be safe
     For these base bondmen to the yoke of Rome.
   MARCUS. Ay, that's my boy! Thy father hath full oft
     For his ungrateful country done the like.
   BOY. And, uncle, so will I, an if I live.
   TITUS. Come, go with me into mine armoury.
     Lucius, I'll fit thee; and withal my boy
     Shall carry from me to the Empress' sons
     Presents that I intend to send them both.
     Come, come; thou'lt do my message, wilt thou not?
   BOY. Ay, with my dagger in their bosoms, grandsire.
   TITUS. No, boy, not so; I'll teach thee another course.
     Lavinia, come. Marcus, look to my house.
     Lucius and I'll go brave it at the court;
     Ay, marry, will we, sir! and we'll be waited on.
                          Exeunt TITUS, LAVINIA, and YOUNG LUCIUS
   MARCUS. O heavens, can you hear a good man groan
     And not relent, or not compassion him?
     Marcus, attend him in his ecstasy,
     That hath more scars of sorrow in his heart
     Than foemen's marks upon his batt'red shield,
     But yet so just that he will not revenge.
     Revenge the heavens for old Andronicus!                 Exit
 
 
 
 
 SCENE II.
 Rome. The palace
 
 Enter AARON, DEMETRIUS and CHIRON, at one door; and at the other door,
--**--**--
   AARON. My mistress is my mistress: this my self,
     The vigour and the picture of my youth.
     This before all the world do I prefer;
     This maugre all the world will I keep safe,
     Or some of you shall smoke for it in Rome.
   DEMETRIUS. By this our mother is for ever sham'd.
   CHIRON. Rome will despise her for this foul escape.
   NURSE. The Emperor in his rage will doom her death.
   CHIRON. I blush to think upon this ignomy.
   AARON. Why, there's the privilege your beauty bears:
     Fie, treacherous hue, that will betray with blushing
     The close enacts and counsels of thy heart!
     Here's a young lad fram'd of another leer.
     Look how the black slave smiles upon the father,
     As who should say 'Old lad, I am thine own.'
     He is your brother, lords, sensibly fed
     Of that self-blood that first gave life to you;
     And from your womb where you imprisoned were
     He is enfranchised and come to light.
     Nay, he is your brother by the surer side,
     Although my seal be stamped in his face.
   NURSE. Aaron, what shall I say unto the Empress?
   DEMETRIUS. Advise thee, Aaron, what is to be done,
     And we will all subscribe to thy advice.
     Save thou the child, so we may all be safe.
   AARON. Then sit we down and let us all consult.
     My son and I will have the wind of you:
     Keep there; now talk at pleasure of your safety.
                                                       [They sit]
   DEMETRIUS. How many women saw this child of his?
   AARON. Why, so, brave lords! When we join in league
     I am a lamb; but if you brave the Moor,
     The chafed boar, the mountain lioness,
     The ocean swells not so as Aaron storms.
     But say, again, how many saw the child?
   NURSE. Cornelia the midwife and myself;
--**--**--
     [To AEMILIUS]  Go thou before to be our ambassador;
     Say that the Emperor requests a parley
     Of warlike Lucius, and appoint the meeting
     Even at his father's house, the old Andronicus.
   SATURNINUS. Aemilius, do this message honourably;
     And if he stand on hostage for his safety,
     Bid him demand what pledge will please him best.
   AEMILIUS. Your bidding shall I do effectually.            Exit
   TAMORA. Now will I to that old Andronicus,
     And temper him with all the art I have,
     To pluck proud Lucius from the warlike Goths.
     And now, sweet Emperor, be blithe again,
     And bury all thy fear in my devices.
   SATURNINUS. Then go successantly, and plead to him.
                                                           Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE I.
 Plains near Rome
 
 Enter LUCIUS with an army of GOTHS with drums and colours
 
   LUCIUS. Approved warriors and my faithful friends,
     I have received letters from great Rome
     Which signifies what hate they bear their Emperor
     And how desirous of our sight they are.
     Therefore, great lords, be, as your titles witness,
     Imperious and impatient of your wrongs;
     And wherein Rome hath done you any scath,
     Let him make treble satisfaction.
   FIRST GOTH. Brave slip, sprung from the great Andronicus,
     Whose name was once our terror, now our comfort,
     Whose high exploits and honourable deeds
     Ingrateful Rome requites with foul contempt,
     Be bold in us: we'll follow where thou lead'st,
     Like stinging bees in hottest summer's day,
     Led by their master to the flow'red fields,
     And be aveng'd on cursed Tamora.
   ALL THE GOTHS. And as he saith, so say we all with him.
   LUCIUS. I humbly thank him, and I thank you all.
     But who comes here, led by a lusty Goth?
 
      Enter a GOTH, leading AARON with his CHILD in his arms
 
   SECOND GOTH. Renowned Lucius, from our troops I stray'd
--**--**--
   TITUS. Art thou Revenge? and art thou sent to me
     To be a torment to mine enemies?
   TAMORA. I am; therefore come down and welcome me.
   TITUS. Do me some service ere I come to thee.
     Lo, by thy side where Rape and Murder stands;
     Now give some surance that thou art Revenge-
     Stab them, or tear them on thy chariot wheels;
     And then I'll come and be thy waggoner
     And whirl along with thee about the globes.
     Provide thee two proper palfreys, black as jet,
     To hale thy vengeful waggon swift away,
     And find out murderers in their guilty caves;
     And when thy car is loaden with their heads,
     I will dismount, and by thy waggon wheel
     Trot, like a servile footman, all day long,
     Even from Hyperion's rising in the east
     Until his very downfall in the sea.
     And day by day I'll do this heavy task,
     So thou destroy Rapine and Murder there.
   TAMORA. These are my ministers, and come with me.
   TITUS. Are they thy ministers? What are they call'd?
   TAMORA. Rape and Murder; therefore called so
     'Cause they take vengeance of such kind of men.
   TITUS. Good Lord, how like the Empress' sons they are!
     And you the Empress! But we worldly men
     Have miserable, mad, mistaking eyes.
     O sweet Revenge, now do I come to thee;
     And, if one arm's embracement will content thee,
     I will embrace thee in it by and by.
   TAMORA. This closing with him fits his lunacy.
     Whate'er I forge to feed his brain-sick humours,
     Do you uphold and maintain in your speeches,
     For now he firmly takes me for Revenge;
     And, being credulous in this mad thought,
     I'll make him send for Lucius his son,
     And whilst I at a banquet hold him sure,
     I'll find some cunning practice out of hand
--**--**--
     As he regards his aged father's life.
   MARCUS. This will I do, and soon return again.            Exit
   TAMORA. Now will I hence about thy business,
     And take my ministers along with me.
   TITUS. Nay, nay, let Rape and Murder stay with me,
     Or else I'll call my brother back again,
     And cleave to no revenge but Lucius.
   TAMORA.  [Aside to her sons]  What say you, boys? Will you abide
       with him,
     Whiles I go tell my lord the Emperor
     How I have govern'd our determin'd jest?
     Yield to his humour, smooth and speak him fair,
     And tarry with him till I turn again.
   TITUS.  [Aside]  I knew them all, though they suppos'd me mad,
     And will o'er reach them in their own devices,
     A pair of cursed hell-hounds and their dam.
   DEMETRIUS. Madam, depart at pleasure; leave us here.
   TAMORA. Farewell, Andronicus, Revenge now goes
     To lay a complot to betray thy foes.
   TITUS. I know thou dost; and, sweet Revenge, farewell.
                                                      Exit TAMORA
   CHIRON. Tell us, old man, how shall we be employ'd?
   TITUS. Tut, I have work enough for you to do.
     Publius, come hither, Caius, and Valentine.
 
           Enter PUBLIUS, CAIUS, and VALENTINE
 
   PUBLIUS. What is your will?
   TITUS. Know you these two?
   PUBLIUS. The Empress' sons, I take them: Chiron, Demetrius.
   TITUS. Fie, Publius, fie! thou art too much deceiv'd.
     The one is Murder, and Rape is the other's name;
     And therefore bind them, gentle Publius-
     Caius and Valentine, lay hands on them.
     Oft have you heard me wish for such an hour,
     And now I find it; therefore bind them sure,
     And stop their mouths if they begin to cry.             Exit
                          [They lay hold on CHIRON and DEMETRIUS]
   CHIRON. Villains, forbear! we are the Empress' sons.
   PUBLIUS. And therefore do we what we are commanded.
--**--**--
     If one good deed in all my life I did,
     I do repent it from my very soul.
   LUCIUS. Some loving friends convey the Emperor hence,
     And give him burial in his father's grave.
     My father and Lavinia shall forthwith
     Be closed in our household's monument.
     As for that ravenous tiger, Tamora,
     No funeral rite, nor man in mourning weed,
     No mournful bell shall ring her burial;
     But throw her forth to beasts and birds to prey.
     Her life was beastly and devoid of pity,
     And being dead, let birds on her take pity.           Exeunt
 
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 1602
 
 THE HISTORY OF TROILUS AND CRESSIDA
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
   PRIAM, King of Troy
 
     His sons:
   HECTOR
   TROILUS
   PARIS
   DEIPHOBUS
   HELENUS
 
   MARGARELON, a bastard son of Priam
 
      Trojan commanders:
   AENEAS
   ANTENOR
 
   CALCHAS, a Trojan priest, taking part with the Greeks
   PANDARUS, uncle to Cressida
   AGAMEMNON, the Greek general
   MENELAUS, his brother
 
     Greek commanders:
   ACHILLES
   AJAX
   ULYSSES
   NESTOR
   DIOMEDES
   PATROCLUS
 
   THERSITES, a deformed and scurrilous Greek
   ALEXANDER, servant to Cressida
   SERVANT to Troilus
   SERVANT to Paris
   SERVANT to Diomedes
 
   HELEN, wife to Menelaus
   ANDROMACHE, wife to Hector
   CASSANDRA, daughter to Priam, a prophetess
   CRESSIDA, daughter to Calchas
 
   Trojan and Greek Soldiers, and Attendants
 
                           SCENE:
              Troy and the Greek camp before it
 
 PROLOGUE
                   TROILUS AND CRESSIDA
                         PROLOGUE
 
     In Troy, there lies the scene. From isles of Greece
     The princes orgillous, their high blood chaf'd,
     Have to the port of Athens sent their ships
     Fraught with the ministers and instruments
     Of cruel war. Sixty and nine that wore
     Their crownets regal from th' Athenian bay
     Put forth toward Phrygia; and their vow is made
     To ransack Troy, within whose strong immures
     The ravish'd Helen, Menelaus' queen,
     With wanton Paris sleeps-and that's the quarrel.
     To Tenedos they come,
     And the deep-drawing barks do there disgorge
     Their war-like fraughtage. Now on Dardan plains
--**--**--
   PANDARUS. Good morrow, cousin Cressid. What do you talk of?- Good
     morrow, Alexander.-How do you, cousin? When were you at Ilium?
   CRESSIDA. This morning, uncle.
   PANDARUS. What were you talking of when I came? Was Hector arm'd
     and gone ere you came to Ilium? Helen was not up, was she?
   CRESSIDA. Hector was gone; but Helen was not up.
   PANDARUS. E'en so. Hector was stirring early.
   CRESSIDA. That were we talking of, and of his anger.
   PANDARUS. Was he angry?
   CRESSIDA. So he says here.
   PANDARUS. True, he was so; I know the cause too; he'll lay about
     him today, I can tell them that. And there's Troilus will not
     come far behind him; let them take heed of Troilus, I can tell
     them that too.
   CRESSIDA. What, is he angry too?
   PANDARUS. Who, Troilus? Troilus is the better man of the two.
   CRESSIDA. O Jupiter! there's no comparison.
   PANDARUS. What, not between Troilus and Hector? Do you know a man
     if you see him?
   CRESSIDA. Ay, if I ever saw him before and knew him.
   PANDARUS. Well, I say Troilus is Troilus.
   CRESSIDA. Then you say as I say, for I am sure he is not Hector.
   PANDARUS. No, nor Hector is not Troilus in some degrees.
   CRESSIDA. 'Tis just to each of them: he is himself.
   PANDARUS. Himself! Alas, poor Troilus! I would he were!
   CRESSIDA. So he is.
   PANDARUS. Condition I had gone barefoot to India.
   CRESSIDA. He is not Hector.
   PANDARUS. Himself! no, he's not himself. Would 'a were himself!
     Well, the gods are above; time must friend or end. Well, Troilus,
     well! I would my heart were in her body! No, Hector is not a
     better man than Troilus.
   CRESSIDA. Excuse me.
   PANDARUS. He is elder.
   CRESSIDA. Pardon me, pardon me.
   PANDARUS. Th' other's not come to't; you shall tell me another tale
--**--**--
   CRESSIDA. And I'll spring up in his tears, an 'twere a nettle
     against May.                                    [Sound a retreat]
   PANDARUS. Hark! they are coming from the field. Shall we stand up
     here and see them as they pass toward Ilium? Good niece, do,
     sweet niece Cressida.
   CRESSIDA. At your pleasure.
   PANDARUS. Here, here, here's an excellent place; here we may see
     most bravely. I'll tell you them all by their names as they pass
     by; but mark Troilus above the rest.
 
                        AENEAS passes
 
   CRESSIDA. Speak not so loud.
   PANDARUS. That's Aeneas. Is not that a brave man? He's one of the
     flowers of Troy, I can tell you. But mark Troilus; you shall see
     anon.
 
                        ANTENOR passes
 
   CRESSIDA. Who's that?
   PANDARUS. That's Antenor. He has a shrewd wit, I can tell you; and
     he's a man good enough; he's one o' th' soundest judgments in
     Troy, whosoever, and a proper man of person. When comes Troilus?
     I'll show you Troilus anon. If he see me, you shall see him nod
     at me.
   CRESSIDA. Will he give you the nod?
   PANDARUS. You shall see.
   CRESSIDA. If he do, the rich shall have more.
 
                      HECTOR passes
 
   PANDARUS. That's Hector, that, that, look you, that; there's a
     fellow! Go thy way, Hector! There's a brave man, niece. O brave
     Hector! Look how he looks. There's a countenance! Is't not a
     brave man?
   CRESSIDA. O, a brave man!
   PANDARUS. Is 'a not? It does a man's heart good. Look you what
     hacks are on his helmet! Look you yonder, do you see? Look you
     there. There's no jesting; there's laying on; take't off who
     will, as they say. There be hacks.
   CRESSIDA. Be those with swords?
   PANDARUS. Swords! anything, he cares not; an the devil come to him,
     it's all one. By God's lid, it does one's heart good. Yonder
--**--**--
     To weaken and discredit our exposure,
     How rank soever rounded in with danger.
   ULYSSES. They tax our policy and call it cowardice,
     Count wisdom as no member of the war,
     Forestall prescience, and esteem no act
     But that of hand. The still and mental parts
     That do contrive how many hands shall strike
     When fitness calls them on, and know, by measure
     Of their observant toil, the enemies' weight-
     Why, this hath not a finger's dignity:
     They call this bed-work, mapp'ry, closet-war;
     So that the ram that batters down the wall,
     For the great swinge and rudeness of his poise,
     They place before his hand that made the engine,
     Or those that with the fineness of their souls
     By reason guide his execution.
   NESTOR. Let this be granted, and Achilles' horse
     Makes many Thetis' sons.                                 [Tucket]
   AGAMEMNON. What trumpet? Look, Menelaus.
   MENELAUS. From Troy.
 
                       Enter AENEAS
 
   AGAMEMNON. What would you fore our tent?
   AENEAS. Is this great Agamemnon's tent, I pray you?
   AGAMEMNON. Even this.
   AENEAS. May one that is a herald and a prince
     Do a fair message to his kingly eyes?
   AGAMEMNON. With surety stronger than Achilles' an
     Fore all the Greekish heads, which with one voice
     Call Agamemnon head and general.
   AENEAS. Fair leave and large security. How may
     A stranger to those most imperial looks
     Know them from eyes of other mortals?
   AGAMEMNON. How?
   AENEAS. Ay;
     I ask, that I might waken reverence,
     And bid the cheek be ready with a blush
     Modest as Morning when she coldly eyes
     The youthful Phoebus.
     Which is that god in office, guiding men?
     Which is the high and mighty Agamemnon?
   AGAMEMNON. This Troyan scorns us, or the men of Troy
     Are ceremonious courtiers.
   AENEAS. Courtiers as free, as debonair, unarm'd,
     As bending angels; that's their fame in peace.
--**--**--
     sinews, or else there be liars. Hector shall have a great catch
     an he knock out either of your brains: 'a were as good crack a
     fusty nut with no kernel.
   ACHILLES. What, with me too, Thersites?
   THERSITES. There's Ulysses and old Nestor-whose wit was mouldy ere
     your grandsires had nails on their toes-yoke you like draught
     oxen, and make you plough up the wars.
   ACHILLES. What, what?
   THERSITES. Yes, good sooth. To Achilles, to Ajax, to-
   AJAX. I shall cut out your tongue.
   THERSITES. 'Tis no matter; I shall speak as much as thou
     afterwards.
   PATROCLUS. No more words, Thersites; peace!
   THERSITES. I will hold my peace when Achilles' brach bids me, shall
     I?
   ACHILLES. There's for you, Patroclus.
   THERSITES. I will see you hang'd like clotpoles ere I come any more
     to your tents. I will keep where there is wit stirring, and leave
     the faction of fools.                                        Exit
   PATROCLUS. A good riddance.
   ACHILLES. Marry, this, sir, is proclaim'd through all our host,
     That Hector, by the fifth hour of the sun,
     Will with a trumpet 'twixt our tents and Troy,
     To-morrow morning, call some knight to arms
     That hath a stomach; and such a one that dare
     Maintain I know not what; 'tis trash. Farewell.
   AJAX. Farewell. Who shall answer him?
   ACHILLES. I know not; 'tis put to lott'ry. Otherwise. He knew his
     man.
   AJAX. O, meaning you! I will go learn more of it.            Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 ACT II. SCENE 2.
 Troy. PRIAM'S palace
 
 Enter PRIAM, HECTOR, TROILUS, PARIS, and HELENUS
 
   PRIAM. After so many hours, lives, speeches, spent,
     Thus once again says Nestor from the Greeks:
     'Deliver Helen, and all damage else-
     As honour, loss of time, travail, expense,
     Wounds, friends, and what else dear that is consum'd
     In hot digestion of this cormorant war-
     Shall be struck off.' Hector, what say you to't?
--**--**--
     When Helen is defended; nor none so noble
     Whose life were ill bestow'd or death unfam'd
     Where Helen is the subject. Then, I say,
     Well may we fight for her whom we know well
     The world's large spaces cannot parallel.
   HECTOR. Paris and Troilus, you have both said well;
     And on the cause and question now in hand
     Have gloz'd, but superficially; not much
     Unlike young men, whom Aristode thought
     Unfit to hear moral philosophy.
     The reasons you allege do more conduce
     To the hot passion of distemp'red blood
     Than to make up a free determination
     'Twixt right and wrong; for pleasure and revenge
     Have ears more deaf than adders to the voice
     Of any true decision. Nature craves
     All dues be rend'red to their owners. Now,
     What nearer debt in all humanity
     Than wife is to the husband? If this law
     Of nature be corrupted through affection;
     And that great minds, of partial indulgence
     To their benumbed wills, resist the same;
     There is a law in each well-order'd nation
     To curb those raging appetites that are
     Most disobedient and refractory.
     If Helen, then, be wife to Sparta's king-
     As it is known she is-these moral laws
     Of nature and of nations speak aloud
     To have her back return'd. Thus to persist
     In doing wrong extenuates not wrong,
     But makes it much more heavy. Hector's opinion
     Is this, in way of truth. Yet, ne'er the less,
     My spritely brethren, I propend to you
     In resolution to keep Helen still;
     For 'tis a cause that hath no mean dependence
     Upon our joint and several dignities.
   TROILUS. Why, there you touch'd the life of our design.
     Were it not glory that we more affected
     Than the performance of our heaving spleens,
     I would not wish a drop of Troyan blood
     Spent more in her defence. But, worthy Hector,
--**--**--
     Of that we hold an idol more than he?
     No, this thrice-worthy and right valiant lord
     Shall not so stale his palm, nobly acquir'd,
     Nor, by my will, assubjugate his merit,
     As amply titled as Achilles is,
     By going to Achilles.
     That were to enlard his fat-already pride,
     And add more coals to Cancer when he burns
     With entertaining great Hyperion.
     This lord go to him! Jupiter forbid,
     And say in thunder 'Achilles go to him.'
   NESTOR. [Aside] O, this is well! He rubs the vein of him.
   DIOMEDES. [Aside] And how his silence drinks up this applause!
   AJAX. If I go to him, with my armed fist I'll pash him o'er the
     face.
   AGAMEMNON. O, no, you shall not go.
   AJAX. An 'a be proud with me I'll pheeze his pride.
     Let me go to him.
   ULYSSES. Not for the worth that hangs upon our quarrel.
   AJAX. A paltry, insolent fellow!
   NESTOR. [Aside] How he describes himself!
   AJAX. Can he not be sociable?
   ULYSSES. [Aside] The raven chides blackness.
   AJAX. I'll let his humours blood.
   AGAMEMNON. [Aside] He will be the physician that should be the
     patient.
   AJAX. An all men were a my mind-
   ULYSSES. [Aside] Wit would be out of fashion.
   AJAX. 'A should not bear it so, 'a should eat's words first.
     Shall pride carry it?
   NESTOR. [Aside] An 'twould, you'd carry half.
   ULYSSES. [Aside] 'A would have ten shares.
   AJAX. I will knead him, I'll make him supple.
   NESTOR. [Aside] He's not yet through warm. Force him with praises;
     pour in, pour in; his ambition is dry.
   ULYSSES. [To AGAMEMNON] My lord, you feed too much on this dislike.
   NESTOR. Our noble general, do not do so.
   DIOMEDES. You must prepare to fight without Achilles.
   ULYSSES. Why 'tis this naming of him does him harm.
--**--**--
   PANDARUS. Fair be to you, my lord, and to all this fair company!
     Fair desires, in all fair measure, fairly guide them- especially
     to you, fair queen! Fair thoughts be your fair pillow.
   HELEN. Dear lord, you are full of fair words.
   PANDARUS. You speak your fair pleasure, sweet queen. Fair prince,
     here is good broken music.
   PARIS. You have broke it, cousin; and by my life, you shall make it
     whole again; you shall piece it out with a piece of your
     performance.
   HELEN. He is full of harmony.
   PANDARUS. Truly, lady, no.
   HELEN. O, sir-
   PANDARUS. Rude, in sooth; in good sooth, very rude.
   PARIS. Well said, my lord. Well, you say so in fits.
   PANDARUS. I have business to my lord, dear queen. My lord, will you
     vouchsafe me a word?
   HELEN. Nay, this shall not hedge us out. We'll hear you sing,
     certainly-
   PANDARUS. Well sweet queen, you are pleasant with me. But, marry,
     thus, my lord: my dear lord and most esteemed friend, your
     brother Troilus-
   HELEN. My Lord Pandarus, honey-sweet lord-
   PANDARUS. Go to, sweet queen, go to-commends himself most
     affectionately to you-
   HELEN. You shall not bob us out of our melody. If you do, our
     melancholy upon your head!
   PANDARUS. Sweet queen, sweet queen; that's a sweet queen, i' faith.
   HELEN. And to make a sweet lady sad is a sour offence.
   PANDARUS. Nay, that shall not serve your turn; that shall it not,
     in truth, la. Nay, I care not for such words; no, no. -And, my
     lord, he desires you that, if the King call for him at supper,
     you will make his excuse.
   HELEN. My Lord Pandarus!
   PANDARUS. What says my sweet queen, my very very sweet queen?
   PARIS. What exploit's in hand? Where sups he to-night?
   HELEN. Nay, but, my lord-
--**--**--
     For many weary months.
   TROILUS. Why was my Cressid then so hard to win?
   CRESSIDA. Hard to seem won; but I was won, my lord,
     With the first glance that ever-pardon me.
     If I confess much, you will play the tyrant.
     I love you now; but till now not so much
     But I might master it. In faith, I lie;
     My thoughts were like unbridled children, grown
     Too headstrong for their mother. See, we fools!
     Why have I blabb'd? Who shall be true to us,
     When we are so unsecret to ourselves?
     But, though I lov'd you well, I woo'd you not;
     And yet, good faith, I wish'd myself a man,
     Or that we women had men's privilege
     Of speaking first. Sweet, bid me hold my tongue,
     For in this rapture I shall surely speak
     The thing I shall repent. See, see, your silence,
     Cunning in dumbness, from my weakness draws
     My very soul of counsel. Stop my mouth.
   TROILUS. And shall, albeit sweet music issues thence.
   PANDARUS. Pretty, i' faith.
   CRESSIDA. My lord, I do beseech you, pardon me;
     'Twas not my purpose thus to beg a kiss.
     I am asham'd. O heavens! what have I done?
     For this time will I take my leave, my lord.
   TROILUS. Your leave, sweet Cressid!
   PANDARUS. Leave! An you take leave till to-morrow morning-
   CRESSIDA. Pray you, content you.
   TROILUS. What offends you, lady?
   CRESSIDA. Sir, mine own company.
   TROILUS. You cannot shun yourself.
   CRESSIDA. Let me go and try.
     I have a kind of self resides with you;
     But an unkind self, that itself will leave
     To be another's fool. I would be gone.
     Where is my wit? I know not what I speak.
   TROILUS. Well know they what they speak that speak so wisely.
   CRESSIDA. Perchance, my lord, I show more craft than love;
--**--**--
     As they have often given. Here is Ulysses.
     I'll interrupt his reading.
     How now, Ulysses!
   ULYSSES. Now, great Thetis' son!
   ACHILLES. What are you reading?
   ULYSSES. A strange fellow here
     Writes me that man-how dearly ever parted,
     How much in having, or without or in-
     Cannot make boast to have that which he hath,
     Nor feels not what he owes, but by reflection;
     As when his virtues shining upon others
     Heat them, and they retort that heat again
     To the first giver.
   ACHILLES. This is not strange, Ulysses.
     The beauty that is borne here in the face
     The bearer knows not, but commends itself
     To others' eyes; nor doth the eye itself-
     That most pure spirit of sense-behold itself,
     Not going from itself; but eye to eye opposed
     Salutes each other with each other's form;
     For speculation turns not to itself
     Till it hath travell'd, and is mirror'd there
     Where it may see itself. This is not strange at all.
   ULYSSES. I do not strain at the position-
     It is familiar-but at the author's drift;
     Who, in his circumstance, expressly proves
     That no man is the lord of anything,
     Though in and of him there be much consisting,
     Till he communicate his parts to others;
     Nor doth he of himself know them for aught
     Till he behold them formed in th' applause
     Where th' are extended; who, like an arch, reverb'rate
     The voice again; or, like a gate of steel
     Fronting the sun, receives and renders back
     His figure and his heat. I was much rapt in this;
     And apprehended here immediately
     Th' unknown Ajax. Heavens, what a man is there!
     A very horse that has he knows not what!
     Nature, what things there are
     Most abject in regard and dear in use!
     What things again most dear in the esteem
--**--**--
     To see great Hector in his weeds of peace;
     To talk with him, and to behold his visage,
     Even to my full of view.
 
                      Enter THERSITES
 
     A labour sav'd!
   THERSITES. A wonder!
   ACHILLES. What?
   THERSITES. Ajax goes up and down the field asking for himself.
   ACHILLES. How so?
   THERSITES. He must fight singly to-morrow with Hector, and is so
     prophetically proud of an heroical cudgelling that he raves in
     saying nothing.
   ACHILLES. How can that be?
   THERSITES. Why, 'a stalks up and down like a peacock-a stride and a
     stand; ruminaies like an hostess that hath no arithmetic but her
     brain to set down her reckoning, bites his lip with a politic
     regard, as who should say 'There were wit in this head, an
     'twould out'; and so there is; but it lies as coldly in him as
     fire in a flint, which will not show without knocking. The man's
     undone for ever; for if Hector break not his neck i' th' combat,
     he'll break't himself in vainglory. He knows not me. I said 'Good
     morrow, Ajax'; and he replies 'Thanks, Agamemnon.' What think you
     of this man that takes me for the general? He's grown a very land
     fish, languageless, a monster. A plague of opinion! A man may
     wear it on both sides, like leather jerkin.
   ACHILLES. Thou must be my ambassador to him, Thersites.
   THERSITES. Who, I? Why, he'll answer nobody; he professes not
     answering. Speaking is for beggars: he wears his tongue in's
     arms. I will put on his presence. Let Patroclus make his demands
     to me, you shall see the pageant of Ajax.
   ACHILLES. To him, Patroclus. Tell him I humbly desire the valiant
     Ajax to invite the most valorous Hector to come unarm'd to my
     tent; and to procure safe conduct for his person of the
--**--**--
     You told how Diomed, a whole week by days,
     Did haunt you in the field.
   AENEAS. Health to you, valiant sir,
     During all question of the gentle truce;
     But when I meet you arm'd, as black defiance
     As heart can think or courage execute.
   DIOMEDES. The one and other Diomed embraces.
     Our bloods are now in calm; and so long health!
     But when contention and occasion meet,
     By Jove, I'll play the hunter for thy life
     With all my force, pursuit, and policy.
   AENEAS. And thou shalt hunt a lion, that will fly
     With his face backward. In humane gentleness,
     Welcome to Troy! now, by Anchises' life,
     Welcome indeed! By Venus' hand I swear
     No man alive can love in such a sort
     The thing he means to kill, more excellently.
   DIOMEDES. We sympathise. Jove let Aeneas live,
     If to my sword his fate be not the glory,
     A thousand complete courses of the sun!
     But in mine emulous honour let him die
     With every joint a wound, and that to-morrow!
   AENEAS. We know each other well.
   DIOMEDES.We do; and long to know each other worse.
   PARIS. This is the most despiteful'st gentle greeting
     The noblest hateful love, that e'er I heard of.
     What business, lord, so early?
   AENEAS. I was sent for to the King; but why, I know not.
   PARIS. His purpose meets you: 'twas to bring this Greek
     To Calchas' house, and there to render him,
     For the enfreed Antenor, the fair Cressid.
     Let's have your company; or, if you please,
     Haste there before us. I constantly believe-
     Or rather call my thought a certain knowledge-
     My brother Troilus lodges there to-night.
     Rouse him and give him note of our approach,
     With the whole quality wherefore; I fear
     We shall be much unwelcome.
   AENEAS. That I assure you:
--**--**--
     And dreaming night will hide our joys no longer,
     I would not from thee.
   CRESSIDA. Night hath been too brief.
   TROILUS. Beshrew the witch! with venomous wights she stays
     As tediously as hell, but flies the grasps of love
     With wings more momentary-swift than thought.
     You will catch cold, and curse me.
   CRESSIDA. Prithee tarry.
     You men will never tarry.
     O foolish Cressid! I might have still held off,
     And then you would have tarried. Hark! there's one up.
   PANDARUS. [Within] What's all the doors open here?
   TROILUS. It is your uncle.
 
                      Enter PANDARUS
 
   CRESSIDA. A pestilence on him! Now will he be mocking.
     I shall have such a life!
   PANDARUS. How now, how now! How go maidenheads?
     Here, you maid! Where's my cousin Cressid?
   CRESSIDA. Go hang yourself, you naughty mocking uncle.
     You bring me to do, and then you flout me too.
   PANDARUS. To do what? to do what? Let her say what.
     What have I brought you to do?
   CRESSIDA. Come, come, beshrew your heart! You'll ne'er be good,
     Nor suffer others.
   PANDARUS. Ha, ha! Alas, poor wretch! a poor capocchia! hast not
     slept to-night? Would he not, a naughty man, let it sleep? A
     bugbear take him!
   CRESSIDA. Did not I tell you? Would he were knock'd i' th' head!
                                                          [One knocks]
     Who's that at door? Good uncle, go and see.
     My lord, come you again into my chamber.
     You smile and mock me, as if I meant naughtily.
   TROILUS. Ha! ha!
   CRESSIDA. Come, you are deceiv'd, I think of no such thing.
    [Knock]
     How earnestly they knock! Pray you come in:
     I would not for half Troy have you seen here.
                                           Exeunt TROILUS and CRESSIDA
   PANDARUS. Who's there? What's the matter? Will you beat down the
     door? How now? What's the matter?
 
                           Enter AENEAS
--**--**--
     On his fair worth and single chivalry.                     Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV. SCENE 5.
 The Grecian camp. Lists set out
 
 Enter AJAX, armed; AGAMEMNON, ACHILLES, PATROCLUS, MENELAUS, ULYSSES,
 NESTOR, and others
 
   AGAMEMNON. Here art thou in appointment fresh and fair,
     Anticipating time with starting courage.
     Give with thy trumpet a loud note to Troy,
     Thou dreadful Ajax, that the appalled air
     May pierce the head of the great combatant,
     And hale him hither.
   AJAX. Thou, trumpet, there's my purse.
     Now crack thy lungs and split thy brazen pipe;
     Blow, villain, till thy sphered bias cheek
     Out-swell the colic of puff Aquilon'd.
     Come, stretch thy chest, and let thy eyes spout blood:
     Thou blowest for Hector.                         [Trumpet sounds]
   ULYSSES. No trumpet answers.
   ACHILLES. 'Tis but early days.
 
                 Enter DIOMEDES, with CRESSIDA
 
   AGAMEMNON. Is not yond Diomed, with Calchas' daughter?
   ULYSSES. 'Tis he, I ken the manner of his gait:
     He rises on the toe. That spirit of his
     In aspiration lifts him from the earth.
   AGAMEMNON. Is this the lady Cressid?
   DIOMEDES. Even she.
   AGAMEMNON. Most dearly welcome to the Greeks, sweet lady.
   NESTOR. Our general doth salute you with a kiss.
   ULYSSES. Yet is the kindness but particular;
     'Twere better she were kiss'd in general.
   NESTOR. And very courtly counsel: I'll begin.
     So much for Nestor.
   ACHILLES. I'll take that winter from your lips, fair lady.
     Achilles bids you welcome.
   MENELAUS. I had good argument for kissing once.
   PATROCLUS. But that's no argument for kissing now;
     For thus popp'd Paris in his hardiment,
     And parted thus you and your argument.
   ULYSSES. O deadly gall, and theme of all our scorns!
     For which we lose our heads to gild his horns.
   PATROCLUS. The first was Menelaus' kiss; this, mine-
                                                    [Kisses her again]
     Patroclus kisses you.
   MENELAUS. O, this is trim!
   PATROCLUS. Paris and I kiss evermore for him.
--**--**--
     Till accident or purpose bring you to't.
     You may have every day enough of Hector,
     If you have stomach. The general state, I fear,
     Can scarce entreat you to be odd with him.
   HECTOR. I pray you let us see you in the field;
     We have had pelting wars since you refus'd
     The Grecians' cause.
   ACHILLES. Dost thou entreat me, Hector?
     To-morrow do I meet thee, fell as death;
     To-night all friends.
   HECTOR. Thy hand upon that match.
   AGAMEMNON. First, all you peers of Greece, go to my tent;
     There in the full convive we; afterwards,
     As Hector's leisure and your bounties shall
     Concur together, severally entreat him.
     Beat loud the tambourines, let the trumpets blow,
     That this great soldier may his welcome know.
                                    Exeunt all but TROILUS and ULYSSES
   TROILUS. My Lord Ulysses, tell me, I beseech you,
     In what place of the field doth Calchas keep?
   ULYSSES. At Menelaus' tent, most princely Troilus.
     There Diomed doth feast with him to-night,
     Who neither looks upon the heaven nor earth,
     But gives all gaze and bent of amorous view
     On the fair Cressid.
   TROILUS. Shall I, sweet lord, be bound to you so much,
     After we part from Agamemnon's tent,
     To bring me thither?
   ULYSSES. You shall command me, sir.
     As gentle tell me of what honour was
     This Cressida in Troy? Had she no lover there
     That wails her absence?
   TROILUS. O, sir, to such as boasting show their scars
     A mock is due. Will you walk on, my lord?
     She was belov'd, she lov'd; she is, and doth;
     But still sweet love is food for fortune's tooth.          Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE 1.
 The Grecian camp. Before the tent of ACHILLES
 
 Enter ACHILLES and PATROCLUS
 
   ACHILLES. I'll heat his blood with Greekish wine to-night,
     Which with my scimitar I'll cool to-morrow.
--**--**--
     Instance, O instance! strong as heaven itself:
     The bonds of heaven are slipp'd, dissolv'd, and loos'd;
     And with another knot, five-finger-tied,
     The fractions of her faith, orts of her love,
     The fragments, scraps, the bits, and greasy relics
     Of her o'er-eaten faith, are bound to Diomed.
   ULYSSES. May worthy Troilus be half-attach'd
     With that which here his passion doth express?
   TROILUS. Ay, Greek; and that shall be divulged well
     In characters as red as Mars his heart
     Inflam'd with Venus. Never did young man fancy
     With so eternal and so fix'd a soul.
     Hark, Greek: as much as I do Cressid love,
     So much by weight hate I her Diomed.
     That sleeve is mine that he'll bear on his helm;
     Were it a casque compos'd by Vulcan's skill
     My sword should bite it. Not the dreadful spout
     Which shipmen do the hurricano call,
     Constring'd in mass by the almighty sun,
     Shall dizzy with more clamour Neptune's ear
     In his descent than shall my prompted sword
     Falling on Diomed.
   THERSITES. He'll tickle it for his concupy.
   TROILUS. O Cressid! O false Cressid! false, false, false!
     Let all untruths stand by thy stained name,
     And they'll seem glorious.
   ULYSSES. O, contain yourself;
     Your passion draws ears hither.
 
                        Enter AENEAS
 
   AENEAS. I have been seeking you this hour, my lord.
     Hector, by this, is arming him in Troy;
     Ajax, your guard, stays to conduct you home.
   TROILUS. Have with you, Prince. My courteous lord, adieu.
     Fairwell, revolted fair!-and, Diomed,
     Stand fast and wear a castle on thy head.
   ULYSSES. I'll bring you to the gates.
   TROILUS. Accept distracted thanks.
 
             Exeunt TROILUS, AENEAS. and ULYSSES
 
   THERSITES. Would I could meet that rogue Diomed! I would croak like
     a raven; I would bode, I would bode. Patroclus will give me
     anything for the intelligence of this whore; the parrot will not
--**--**--
     Chide me for it.
   TROILUS. When many times the captive Grecian falls,
     Even in the fan and wind of your fair sword,
     You bid them rise and live.
   HECTOR. O, 'tis fair play!
   TROILUS. Fool's play, by heaven, Hector.
   HECTOR. How now! how now!
   TROILUS. For th' love of all the gods,
     Let's leave the hermit Pity with our mother;
     And when we have our armours buckled on,
     The venom'd vengeance ride upon our swords,
     Spur them to ruthful work, rein them from ruth!
   HECTOR. Fie, savage, fie!
   TROILUS. Hector, then 'tis wars.
   HECTOR. Troilus, I would not have you fight to-day.
   TROILUS. Who should withhold me?
     Not fate, obedience, nor the hand of Mars
     Beck'ning with fiery truncheon my retire;
     Not Priamus and Hecuba on knees,
     Their eyes o'ergalled with recourse of tears;
     Nor you, my brother, with your true sword drawn,
     Oppos'd to hinder me, should stop my way,
     But by my ruin.
 
               Re-enter CASSANDRA, with PRIAM
 
   CASSANDRA. Lay hold upon him, Priam, hold him fast;
     He is thy crutch; now if thou lose thy stay,
     Thou on him leaning, and all Troy on thee,
     Fall all together.
   PRIAM. Come, Hector, come, go back.
     Thy wife hath dreamt; thy mother hath had visions;
     Cassandra doth foresee; and I myself
     Am like a prophet suddenly enrapt
     To tell thee that this day is ominous.
     Therefore, come back.
   HECTOR. Aeneas is a-field;
     And I do stand engag'd to many Greeks,
     Even in the faith of valour, to appear
     This morning to them.
   PRIAM. Ay, but thou shalt not go.
   HECTOR. I must not break my faith.
     You know me dutiful; therefore, dear sir,
     Let me not shame respect; but give me leave
     To take that course by your consent and voice
     Which you do here forbid me, royal Priam.
--**--**--
   THERSITES. No, no-I am a rascal; a scurvy railing knave; a very
     filthy rogue.
   HECTOR. I do believe thee. Live.                               Exit
   THERSITES. God-a-mercy, that thou wilt believe me; but a plague
     break thy neck for frighting me! What's become of the wenching
     rogues? I think they have swallowed one another. I would laugh at
     that miracle. Yet, in a sort, lechery eats itself. I'll seek
     them.                                                        Exit
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE 5.
 Another part of the plain
 
 Enter DIOMEDES and A SERVANT
 
   DIOMEDES. Go, go, my servant, take thou Troilus' horse;
     Present the fair steed to my lady Cressid.
     Fellow, commend my service to her beauty;
     Tell her I have chastis'd the amorous Troyan,
     And am her knight by proof.
   SERVANT. I go, my lord.                                        Exit
 
                        Enter AGAMEMNON
 
   AGAMEMNON. Renew, renew! The fierce Polydamus
     Hath beat down enon; bastard Margarelon
     Hath Doreus prisoner,
     And stands colossus-wise, waving his beam,
     Upon the pashed corses of the kings
     Epistrophus and Cedius. Polixenes is slain;
     Amphimacus and Thoas deadly hurt;
     Patroclus ta'en, or slain; and Palamedes
     Sore hurt and bruis'd. The dreadful Sagittary
     Appals our numbers. Haste we, Diomed,
     To reinforcement, or we perish all.
 
                         Enter NESTOR
 
   NESTOR. Go, bear Patroclus' body to Achilles,
     And bid the snail-pac'd Ajax arm for shame.
     There is a thousand Hectors in the field;
     Now here he fights on Galathe his horse,
     And there lacks work; anon he's there afoot,
     And there they fly or die, like scaled sculls
     Before the belching whale; then is he yonder,
     And there the strawy Greeks, ripe for his edge,
     Fall down before him like the mower's swath.
     Here, there, and everywhere, he leaves and takes;
     Dexterity so obeying appetite
     That what he will he does, and does so much
     That proof is call'd impossibility.
 
                        Enter ULYSSES
 
   ULYSSES. O, courage, courage, courage, Princes! Great
--**--**--
   TROILUS. O traitor Diomed! Turn thy false face, thou traitor,
     And pay thy life thou owest me for my horse.
   DIOMEDES. Ha! art thou there?
   AJAX. I'll fight with him alone. Stand, Diomed.
   DIOMEDES. He is my prize. I will not look upon.
   TROILUS. Come, both, you cogging Greeks; have at you
                                                       Exeunt fighting
 
                       Enter HECTOR
 
   HECTOR. Yea, Troilus? O, well fought, my youngest brother!
 
                      Enter ACHILLES
 
   ACHILLES. Now do I see thee, ha! Have at thee, Hector!
   HECTOR. Pause, if thou wilt.
   ACHILLES. I do disdain thy courtesy, proud Troyan.
     Be happy that my arms are out of use;
     My rest and negligence befriends thee now,
     But thou anon shalt hear of me again;
     Till when, go seek thy fortune.                              Exit
   HECTOR. Fare thee well.
     I would have been much more a fresher man,
     Had I expected thee.
 
                      Re-enter TROILUS
 
     How now, my brother!
   TROILUS. Ajax hath ta'en Aeneas. Shall it be?
     No, by the flame of yonder glorious heaven,
     He shall not carry him; I'll be ta'en too,
     Or bring him off. Fate, hear me what I say:
     I reck not though thou end my life to-day.                   Exit
 
                     Enter one in armour
 
   HECTOR. Stand, stand, thou Greek; thou art a goodly mark.
     No? wilt thou not? I like thy armour well;
     I'll frush it and unlock the rivets all
     But I'll be master of it. Wilt thou not, beast, abide?
     Why then, fly on; I'll hunt thee for thy hide.             Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 ACT V. SCENE 7.
 Another part of the plain
 
 Enter ACHILLES, with Myrmidons
 
   ACHILLES. Come here about me, you my Myrmidons;
     Mark what I say. Attend me where I wheel;
     Strike not a stroke, but keep yourselves in breath;
     And when I have the bloody Hector found,
     Empale him with your weapons round about;
     In fellest manner execute your arms.
--**--**--
     And might not be delivered to the world,
     Till I had made mine own occasion mellow,
     What my estate is!
   CAPTAIN. That were hard to compass,
     Because she will admit no kind of suit-
     No, not the Duke's.
   VIOLA. There is a fair behaviour in thee, Captain;
     And though that nature with a beauteous wall
     Doth oft close in pollution, yet of thee
     I will believe thou hast a mind that suits
     With this thy fair and outward character.
     I prithee, and I'll pay thee bounteously,
     Conceal me what I am, and be my aid
     For such disguise as haply shall become
     The form of my intent. I'll serve this duke:
     Thou shalt present me as an eunuch to him;
     It may be worth thy pains, for I can sing
     And speak to him in many sorts of music,
     That will allow me very worth his service.
     What else may hap to time I will commit;
     Only shape thou silence to my wit.
   CAPTAIN. Be you his eunuch and your mute I'll be;
     When my tongue blabs, then let mine eyes not see.
   VIOLA. I thank thee. Lead me on.                        Exeunt
 
 
 
 
 SCENE III.
 OLIVIA'S house
 
 Enter SIR TOBY BELCH and MARIA
 
   SIR TOBY. What a plague means my niece to take the death of her
     brother thus? I am sure care's an enemy to life.
   MARIA. By my troth, Sir Toby, you must come in earlier o' nights;
     your cousin, my lady, takes great exceptions to your ill hours.
   SIR TOBY. Why, let her except before excepted.
   MARIA. Ay, but you must confine yourself within the modest limits
     of order.
   SIR TOBY. Confine! I'll confine myself no finer than I am. These
     clothes are good enough to drink in, and so be these boots too;
     an they be not, let them hang themselves in their own straps.
--**--**--
     believe that does harm to my wit.
   SIR TOBY. No question.
   AGUECHEEK. An I thought that, I'd forswear it. I'll ride home
     to-morrow, Sir Toby.
   SIR TOBY. Pourquoi, my dear knight?
   AGUECHEEK. What is 'pourquoi'- do or not do? I would I had bestowed
     that time in the tongues that I have in fencing, dancing, and
     bear-baiting. Oh, had I but followed the arts!
   SIR TOBY. Then hadst thou had an excellent head of hair.
   AGUECHEEK. Why, would that have mended my hair?
   SIR TOBY. Past question; for thou seest it will not curl by nature.
   AGUECHEEK. But it becomes me well enough, does't not?
   SIR TOBY. Excellent; it hangs like flax on a distaff, and I hope to
     see a huswife take thee between her legs and spin it off.
   AGUECHEEK. Faith, I'll home to-morrow, Sir Toby. Your niece will
     not be seen, or if she be, it's four to one she'll none of me;
     the Count himself here hard by woos her.
   SIR TOBY. She'll none o' th' Count; she'll not match above her
     degree, neither in estate, years, nor wit; I have heard her
     swear't. Tut, there's life in't, man.
   AGUECHEEK. I'll stay a month longer. I am a fellow o' th' strangest
     mind i' th' world; I delight in masques and revels sometimes
     altogether.
   SIR TOBY. Art thou good at these kickshawses, knight?
   AGUECHEEK. As any man in Illyria, whatsoever he be, under the
     degree of my betters; and yet I will not compare with an old man.
   SIR TOBY. What is thy excellence in a galliard, knight?
   AGUECHEEK. Faith, I can cut a caper.
   SIR TOBY. And I can cut the mutton to't.
   AGUECHEEK. And I think I have the back-trick simply as strong as
     any man in Illyria.
   SIR TOBY. Wherefore are these things hid? Wherefore have these
--**--**--
     increasing your folly! Sir Toby will be sworn that I am no fox;
     but he will not pass his word for twopence that you are no fool.
   OLIVIA. How say you to that, Malvolio?
   MALVOLIO. I marvel your ladyship takes delight in such a barren
     rascal; I saw him put down the other day with an ordinary fool
     that has no more brain than a stone. Look you now, he's out of
     his guard already; unless you laugh and minister occasion to him,
     he is gagg'd. I protest I take these wise men that crow so at
     these set kind of fools no better than the fools' zanies.
   OLIVIA. O, you are sick of self-love, Malvolio, and taste with a
     distemper'd appetite. To be generous, guiltless, and of free
     disposition, is to take those things for bird-bolts that you deem
     cannon bullets. There is no slander in an allow'd fool, though he
     do nothing but rail; nor no railing in known discreet man, though
     he do nothing but reprove.
   CLOWN. Now Mercury endue thee with leasing, for thou speak'st well
     of fools!
 
                              Re-enter MARIA
 
   MARIA. Madam, there is at the gate a young gentleman much desires
     to speak with you.
   OLIVIA. From the Count Orsino, is it?
   MARIA. I know not, madam; 'tis a fair young man, and well attended.
   OLIVIA. Who of my people hold him in delay?
   MARIA. Sir Toby, madam, your kinsman.
   OLIVIA. Fetch him off, I pray you; he speaks nothing but madman.
     Fie on him! [Exit MARIA] Go you, Malvolio: if it be a suit from
     the Count, I am sick, or not at home- what you will to dismiss
     it. [Exit MALVOLIO] Now you see, sir, how your fooling grows old,
     and people dislike it.
   CLOWN. Thou hast spoke for us, madonna, as if thy eldest son should
--**--**--
     the least sinister usage.
   OLIVIA. Whence came you, sir?
   VIOLA. I can say little more than I have studied, and that
     question's out of my part. Good gentle one, give me modest
     assurance if you be the lady of the house, that I may proceed in
     my speech.
   OLIVIA. Are you a comedian?
   VIOLA. No, my profound heart; and yet, by the very fangs of malice
     I swear, I am not that I play. Are you the lady of the house?
   OLIVIA. If I do not usurp myself, I am.
   VIOLA. Most certain, if you are she, you do usurp yourself; for
     what is yours to bestow is not yours to reserve. But this is from
     my commission. I will on with my speech in your praise, and then
     show you the heart of my message.
   OLIVIA. Come to what is important in't. I forgive you the praise.
   VIOLA. Alas, I took great pains to study it, and 'tis poetical.
   OLIVIA. It is the more like to be feigned; I pray you keep it in. I
     heard you were saucy at my gates, and allow'd your approach
     rather to wonder at you than to hear you. If you be not mad, be
     gone; if you have reason, be brief; 'tis not that time of moon
     with me to make one in so skipping dialogue.
   MARIA. Will you hoist sail, sir? Here lies your way.
   VIOLA. No, good swabber, I am to hull here a little longer.
     Some mollification for your giant, sweet lady.
   OLIVIA. Tell me your mind.
   VIOLA. I am a messenger.
   OLIVIA. Sure, you have some hideous matter to deliver, when the
     courtesy of it is so fearful. Speak your office.
   VIOLA. It alone concerns your ear. I bring no overture of war, no
     taxation of homage: I hold the olive in my hand; my words are as
--**--**--
   AGUECHEEK. Excellent! Why, this is the best fooling, when all is
     done. Now, a song.
   SIR TOBY. Come on, there is sixpence for you. Let's have a song.
   AGUECHEEK. There's a testril of me too; if one knight give a-
 CLOWN. Would you have a love-song, or a song of good life?
   SIR TOBY. A love-song, a love-song.
   AGUECHEEK. Ay, ay; I care not for good life.
 
                          CLOWN sings
 
          O mistress mine, where are you roaming?
          O, stay and hear; your true love's coming,
            That can sing both high and low.
            Trip no further, pretty sweeting;
            Journeys end in lovers meeting,
            Every wise man's son doth know.
 
   AGUECHEEK. Excellent good, i' faith!
   SIR TOBY. Good, good!
 
                          CLOWN sings
 
            What is love? 'Tis not hereafter;
            Present mirth hath present laughter;
              What's to come is still unsure.
            In delay there lies no plenty,
            Then come kiss me, sweet and twenty;
              Youth's a stuff will not endure.
 
   AGUECHEEK. A mellifluous voice, as I am true knight.
   SIR TOBY. A contagious breath.
   AGUECHEEK. Very sweet and contagious, i' faith.
   SIR TOBY. To hear by the nose, it is dulcet in contagion. But shall
     we make the welkin dance indeed? Shall we rouse the night-owl in
     a catch that will draw three souls out of one weaver? Shall we do
     that?
   AGUECHEEK. An you love me, let's do't. I am dog at a catch.
   CLOWN. By'r lady, sir, and some dogs will catch well.
   AGUECHEEK. Most certain. Let our catch be 'Thou knave.'
   CLOWN. 'Hold thy peace, thou knave' knight? I shall be constrain'd
     in't to call thee knave, knight.
   AGUECHEEK. 'Tis not the first time I have constrained one to call
     me knave. Begin, fool: it begins 'Hold thy peace.'
   CLOWN. I shall never begin if I hold my peace.
   AGUECHEEK. Good, i' faith! Come, begin.           [Catch sung]
--**--**--
   VIOLA. Sooth, but you must.
     Say that some lady, as perhaps there is,
     Hath for your love as great a pang of heart
     As you have for Olivia. You cannot love her;
     You tell her so. Must she not then be answer'd?
   DUKE. There is no woman's sides
     Can bide the beating of so strong a passion
     As love doth give my heart; no woman's heart
     So big to hold so much; they lack retention.
     Alas, their love may be call'd appetite-
     No motion of the liver, but the palate-
     That suffer surfeit, cloyment, and revolt;
     But mine is all as hungry as the sea,
     And can digest as much. Make no compare
     Between that love a woman can bear me
     And that I owe Olivia.
   VIOLA. Ay, but I know-
   DUKE. What dost thou know?
   VIOLA. Too well what love women to men may owe.
     In faith, they are as true of heart as we.
     My father had a daughter lov'd a man,
     As it might be perhaps, were I a woman,
     I should your lordship.
   DUKE. And what's her history?
   VIOLA. A blank, my lord. She never told her love,
     But let concealment, like a worm i' th' bud,
     Feed on her damask cheek. She pin'd in thought;
     And with a green and yellow melancholy
     She sat like Patience on a monument,
     Smiling at grief. Was not this love indeed?
     We men may say more, swear more, but indeed
     Our shows are more than will; for still we prove
     Much in our vows, but little in our love.
   DUKE. But died thy sister of her love, my boy?
   VIOLA. I am all the daughters of my father's house,
     And all the brothers too- and yet I know not.
     Sir, shall I to this lady?
   DUKE. Ay, that's the theme.
--**--**--
     as a fox.
   MALVOLIO. M- Malvolio; M- why, that begins my name.
   FABIAN. Did not I say he would work it out?
     The cur is excellent at faults.
   MALVOLIO. M- But then there is no consonancy in the sequel; that
     suffers under probation: A should follow, but O does.
   FABIAN. And O shall end, I hope.
   SIR TOBY. Ay, or I'll cudgel him, and make him cry 'O!'
   MALVOLIO. And then I comes behind.
   FABIAN. Ay, an you had any eye behind you, you might see more
     detraction at your heels than fortunes before you.
   MALVOLIO. M. O. A. I. This simulation is not as the former; and
     yet, to crush this a little, it would bow to me, for every one of
     these letters are in my name. Soft! here follows prose.
                                                          [Reads]
       'If this fall into thy hand, revolve. In my stars I am above
     thee; but be not afraid of greatness. Some are born great, some
     achieve greatness, and some have greatness thrust upon 'em. Thy
     Fates open their hands; let thy blood and spirit embrace them;
     and, to inure thyself to what thou art like to be, cast thy
     humble slough and appear fresh. Be opposite with a kinsman, surly
     with servants; let thy tongue tang arguments of state; put
     thyself into the trick of singularity. She thus advises thee that
     sighs for thee. Remember who commended thy yellow stockings, and
     wish'd to see thee ever cross-garter'd. I say, remember, Go to,
     thou art made, if thou desir'st to be so; if not, let me see thee
     a steward still, the fellow of servants, and not worthy to touch
     Fortune's fingers. Farewell. She that would alter services with
     thee,
                                          THE FORTUNATE-UNHAPPY.'
 
     Daylight and champain discovers not more. This is open. I will be
     proud, I will read politic authors, I will baffle Sir Toby, I
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 SCENE III.
 A street
 
 Enter SEBASTIAN and ANTONIO
 
   SEBASTIAN. I would not by my will have troubled you;
     But since you make your pleasure of your pains,
     I will no further chide you.
   ANTONIO. I could not stay behind you: my desire,
     More sharp than filed steel, did spur me forth;
     And not all love to see you- though so much
     As might have drawn one to a longer voyage-
     But jealousy what might befall your travel,
     Being skilless in these parts; which to a stranger,
     Unguided and unfriended, often prove
     Rough and unhospitable. My willing love,
     The rather by these arguments of fear,
     Set forth in your pursuit.
   SEBASTIAN. My kind Antonio,
     I can no other answer make but thanks,
     And thanks, and ever thanks; and oft good turns
     Are shuffl'd off with such uncurrent pay;
     But were my worth as is my conscience firm,
     You should find better dealing. What's to do?
     Shall we go see the reliques of this town?
   ANTONIO. To-morrow, sir; best first go see your lodging.
   SEBASTIAN. I am not weary, and 'tis long to night;
     I pray you, let us satisfy our eyes
     With the memorials and the things of fame
     That do renown this city.
   ANTONIO. Would you'd pardon me.
     I do not without danger walk these streets:
     Once in a sea-fight 'gainst the Count his galleys
     I did some service; of such note, indeed,
     That, were I ta'en here, it would scarce be answer'd.
   SEBASTIAN. Belike you slew great number of his people.
   ANTONIO.Th' offence is not of such a bloody nature;
     Albeit the quality of the time and quarrel
     Might well have given us bloody argument.
     It might have since been answer'd in repaying
     What we took from them; which, for traffic's sake,
     Most of our city did. Only myself stood out;
--**--**--
     the matter I challenge thee for.'
   FABIAN. Very brief, and to exceeding good sense- less.
   SIR TOBY. [Reads] 'I will waylay thee going home; where if it be
     thy chance to kill me'-
   FABIAN. Good.
   SIR TOBY. 'Thou kill'st me like a rogue and a villain.'
   FABIAN. Still you keep o' th' windy side of the law. Good!
   SIR TOBY. [Reads] 'Fare thee well; and God have mercy upon one of
     our souls! He may have mercy upon mine; but my hope is better,
     and so look to thyself. Thy friend, as thou usest him, and thy
     sworn enemy,
                                               ANDREW AGUECHEEK.'
 
     If this letter move him not, his legs cannot. I'll give't him.
   MARIA. You may have very fit occasion for't; he is now in some
     commerce with my lady, and will by and by depart.
   SIR TOBY. Go, Sir Andrew; scout me for him at the corner of the
     orchard, like a bum-baily; so soon as ever thou seest him, draw;
     and as thou draw'st, swear horrible; for it comes to pass oft
     that a terrible oath, with a swaggering accent sharply twang'd
     off, gives manhood more approbation than ever proof itself would
     have earn'd him. Away.
   AGUECHEEK. Nay, let me alone for swearing.                Exit
   SIR TOBY. Now will not I deliver his letter; for the behaviour of
     the young gentleman gives him out to be of good capacity and
     breeding; his employment between his lord and my niece confirms
     no less. Therefore this letter, being so excellently ignorant,
     will breed no terror in the youth: he will find it comes from a
     clodpole. But, sir, I will deliver his challenge by word of
     mouth, set upon Aguecheek notable report of valour, and drive the
     gentleman- as know his youth will aptly receive it- into a most
     hideous opinion of his rage, skill, fury, and impetuosity. This
--**--**--
     will not hurt you.
   VIOLA. [Aside] Pray God defend me! A little thing would make me
     tell them how much I lack of a man.
   FABIAN. Give ground if you see him furious.
   SIR TOBY. Come, Sir Andrew, there's no remedy; the gentleman will,
     for his honour's sake, have one bout with you; he cannot by the
     duello avoid it; but he has promis'd me, as he is a gentleman and
     a soldier, he will not hurt you. Come on; to't.
   AGUECHEEK. Pray God he keep his oath!                [They draw]
 
                       Enter ANTONIO
 
   VIOLA. I do assure you 'tis against my will.
   ANTONIO. Put up your sword. If this young gentleman
     Have done offence, I take the fault on me:
     If you offend him, I for him defy you.
   SIR TOBY. You, sir! Why, what are you?
   ANTONIO. One, sir, that for his love dares yet do more
     Than you have heard him brag to you he will.
   SIR TOBY. Nay, if you be an undertaker, I am for you.
                                                      [They draw]
 
                          Enter OFFICERS
 
   FABIAN. O good Sir Toby, hold! Here come the officers.
   SIR TOBY. [To ANTONIO] I'll be with you anon.
   VIOLA. Pray, sir, put your sword up, if you please.
   AGUECHEEK. Marry, will I, sir; and for that I promis'd you, I'll be
     as good as my word. He will bear you easily and reins well.
   FIRST OFFICER. This is the man; do thy office.
   SECOND OFFICER. Antonio, I arrest thee at the suit
     Of Count Orsino.
   ANTONIO. You do mistake me, sir.
   FIRST OFFICER. No, sir, no jot; I know your favour well,
     Though now you have no sea-cap on your head.
     Take him away; he knows I know him well.
   ANTONIO. I Must obey. [To VIOLA] This comes with seeking you;
     But there's no remedy; I shall answer it.
--**--**--
   MALVOLIO. Ay, good fool.
   CLOWN. Alas, sir, how fell you besides your five wits?
   MALVOLIO. Fool, there was never man so notoriously abus'd;
     I am as well in my wits, fool, as thou art.
   CLOWN. But as well? Then you are mad indeed, if you be no better in
     your wits than a fool.
   MALVOLIO. They have here propertied me; keep me in darkness, send
     ministers to me, asses, and do all they can to face me out of my
     wits.
   CLOWN. Advise you what. you say: the minister is here.
     [Speaking as SIR TOPAS] Malvolio, thy wits the heavens restore!
     Endeavour thyself to sleep, and leave thy vain bibble-babble.
   MALVOLIO. Sir Topas!
   CLOWN. Maintain no words with him, good fellow.- Who, I, sir? Not
     I, sir. God buy you, good Sir Topas.- Marry, amen.- I will sir, I
     will.
   MALVOLIO. Fool, fool, fool, I say!
   CLOWN. Alas, sir, be patient. What say you, sir? I am shent for
     speaking to you.
   MALVOLIO. Good fool, help me to some light and some paper.
     I tell thee I am as well in my wits as any man in Illyria.
   CLOWN. Well-a-day that you were, sir!
   MALVOLIO. By this hand, I am. Good fool, some ink, paper, and
     light; and convey what I will set down to my lady. It shall
     advantage thee more than ever the bearing of letter did.
   CLOWN. I will help you to't. But tell me true, are you not mad
     indeed, or do you but counterfeit?
   MALVOLIO. Believe me, I am not; I tell thee true.
   CLOWN. Nay, I'll ne'er believe a madman till I see his brains.
     I will fetch you light and paper and ink.
   MALVOLIO. Fool, I'll requite it in the highest degree; I prithe be
     gone.
   CLOWN. [Singing]
                    I am gone, sir,
--**--**--
   DUKE. How can that be?
   CLOWN. Marry, sir, they praise me and make an ass of me. Now my
     foes tell me plainly I am an ass; so that by my foes, sir, I
     profit in the knowledge of myself, and by my friends I am abused;
     so that, conclusions to be as kisses, if your four negatives make
     your two affirmatives, why then, the worse for my friends, and
     the better for my foes.
   DUKE. Why, this is excellent.
   CLOWN. By my troth, sir, no; though it please you to be one of my
     friends.
   DUKE. Thou shalt not be the worse for me. There's gold.
   CLOWN. But that it would be double-dealing, sir, I would you could
     make it another.
   DUKE. O, you give me ill counsel.
   CLOWN. Put your grace in your pocket, sir, for this once, and let
     your flesh and blood obey it.
   DUKE. Well, I will be so much a sinner to be a double-dealer.
     There's another.
   CLOWN. Primo, secundo, tertio, is a good play; and the old saying
     is 'The third pays for all.' The triplex, sir, is a good tripping
     measure; or the bells of Saint Bennet, sir, may put you in mind-
     one, two, three.
   DUKE. You can fool no more money out of me at this throw; if you
     will let your lady know I am here to speak with her, and bring
     her along with you, it may awake my bounty further.
   CLOWN. Marry, sir, lullaby to your bounty till I come again. I go,
     sir; but I would not have you to think that my desire of having
     is the sin of covetousness. But, as you say, sir, let your bounty
     take a nap; I will awake it anon.                       Exit
 
                  Enter ANTONIO and OFFICERS
 
   VIOLA. Here comes the man, sir, that did rescue me.
--**--**--
   OLIVIA. What do you say, Cesario? Good my lord-
   VIOLA. My lord would speak; my duty hushes me.
   OLIVIA. If it be aught to the old tune, my lord,
     It is as fat and fulsome to mine ear
     As howling after music.
   DUKE. Still so cruel?
   OLIVIA. Still so constant, lord.
   DUKE. What, to perverseness? You uncivil lady,
     To whose ingrate and unauspicious altars
     My soul the faithfull'st off'rings hath breath'd out
     That e'er devotion tender'd! What shall I do?
   OLIVIA. Even what it please my lord, that shall become him.
   DUKE. Why should I not, had I the heart to do it,
     Like to the Egyptian thief at point of death,
     Kill what I love?- a savage jealousy
     That sometime savours nobly. But hear me this:
     Since you to non-regardance cast my faith,
     And that I partly know the instrument
     That screws me from my true place in your favour,
     Live you the marble-breasted tyrant still;
     But this your minion, whom I know you love,
     And whom, by heaven I swear, I tender dearly,
     Him will I tear out of that cruel eye
     Where he sits crowned in his master's spite.
     Come, boy, with me; my thoughts are ripe in mischief:
     I'll sacrifice the lamb that I do love
     To spite a raven's heart within a dove.
   VIOLA. And I, most jocund, apt, and willingly,
     To do you rest, a thousand deaths would die.
   OLIVIA. Where goes Cesario?
   VIOLA. After him I love
     More than I love these eyes, more than my life,
     More, by all mores, than e'er I shall love wife.
     If I do feign, you witnesses above
     Punish my life for tainting of my love!
   OLIVIA. Ay me, detested! How am I beguil'd!
   VIOLA. Who does beguile you? Who does do you wrong?
   OLIVIA. Hast thou forgot thyself? Is it so long?
--**--**--
     And in such forms which here were presuppos'd
     Upon thee in the letter. Prithee, be content;
     This practice hath most shrewdly pass'd upon thee,
     But, when we know the grounds and authors of it,
     Thou shalt be both the plaintiff and the judge
     Of thine own cause.
   FABIAN. Good madam, hear me speak,
     And let no quarrel nor no brawl to come
     Taint the condition of this present hour,
     Which I have wond'red at. In hope it shall not,
     Most freely I confess myself and Toby
     Set this device against Malvolio here,
     Upon some stubborn and uncourteous parts
     We had conceiv'd against him. Maria writ
     The letter, at Sir Toby's great importance,
     In recompense whereof he hath married her.
     How with a sportful malice it was follow'd
     May rather pluck on laughter than revenge,
     If that the injuries be justly weigh'd
     That have on both sides pass'd.
   OLIVIA. Alas, poor fool, how have they baffl'd thee!
   CLOWN. Why, 'Some are born great, some achieve greatness, and some
     have greatness thrown upon them.' I was one, sir, in this
     interlude- one Sir Topas, sir; but that's all one. 'By the Lord,
     fool, I am not mad!' But do you remember- 'Madam, why laugh you
     at such a barren rascal? An you smile not, he's gagg'd'? And thus
     the whirligig of time brings in his revenges.
   MALVOLIO. I'll be reveng'd on the whole pack of you.
  Exit
   OLIVIA. He hath been most notoriously abus'd.
   DUKE. Pursue him, and entreat him to a peace;
     He hath not told us of the captain yet.
     When that is known, and golden time convents,
     A solemn combination shall be made
     Of our dear souls. Meantime, sweet sister,
     We will not part from hence. Cesario, come;
     For so you shall be while you are a man;
--**--**--
   VALENTINE. 'Tis true; for you are over boots in love,
     And yet you never swum the Hellespont.
   PROTEUS. Over the boots! Nay, give me not the boots.
   VALENTINE. No, I will not, for it boots thee not.
   PROTEUS. What?
   VALENTINE. To be in love- where scorn is bought with groans,
     Coy looks with heart-sore sighs, one fading moment's mirth
     With twenty watchful, weary, tedious nights;
     If haply won, perhaps a hapless gain;
     If lost, why then a grievous labour won;
     However, but a folly bought with wit,
     Or else a wit by folly vanquished.
   PROTEUS. So, by your circumstance, you call me fool.
   VALENTINE. So, by your circumstance, I fear you'll prove.
   PROTEUS. 'Tis love you cavil at; I am not Love.
   VALENTINE. Love is your master, for he masters you;
     And he that is so yoked by a fool,
     Methinks, should not be chronicled for wise.
   PROTEUS. Yet writers say, as in the sweetest bud
     The eating canker dwells, so eating love
     Inhabits in the finest wits of all.
   VALENTINE. And writers say, as the most forward bud
     Is eaten by the canker ere it blow,
     Even so by love the young and tender wit
     Is turn'd to folly, blasting in the bud,
     Losing his verdure even in the prime,
     And all the fair effects of future hopes.
     But wherefore waste I time to counsel the
     That art a votary to fond desire?
     Once more adieu. My father at the road
     Expects my coming, there to see me shipp'd.
   PROTEUS. And thither will I bring thee, Valentine.
   VALENTINE. Sweet Proteus, no; now let us take our leave.
     To Milan let me hear from thee by letters
     Of thy success in love, and what news else
     Betideth here in absence of thy friend;
     And I likewise will visit thee with mine.